REAUTHORIZING  THE  VISION 
FOR  SPACE  EXPLORATION 

S.  HRG.  110–1134 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND 

RELATED SCIENCES 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

MAY  7,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–618 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SPACE,  AERONAUTICS,  AND  RELATED  SCIENCES 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana,  Ranking 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 7, 2008 
.................................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

ment, Naval War College 

Dickman, Major General Robert S., (Ret.), U.S. Air Force; Executive Director, 
American Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics (AIAA)  ...........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Johnson-Freese,  Dr.  Joan,  Chair,  National  Security  Decision  Making  Depart-
....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kranz,  Eugene  F.,  Advisory  Board  Member,  Coalition  for  Space  Exploration; 
and Former Flight Director and Director, Mission Operations; NASA  ...........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Tarantino, Dr. Frederick A., CEO and President, Universities Space Research 
Association  ............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
...................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Whitesides, George T., Executive Director, National Space Society 

Page 
1 
1 
3 

29 
30 

12 
14 

5 
9 

19 
21 
33 
35 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

REAUTHORIZING  THE  VISION 

FOR  SPACE  EXPLORATION 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  7,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND RELATED 
SCIENCES, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9:30  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bill  Nelson,  Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator NELSON. Good morning, everybody. 
And  we  are  delighted  to  have  a  very  distinguished  panel  as  we 
discuss NASA and where it should be going. Ultimately we will try 
to  etch  that  into  law  through  the  NASA  authorization  legislation. 
The  purpose  of  this  hearing  is  to  get  the  ideas  of  this  distin-
guished panel as we bring to a conclusion the drafting of this legis-
lation.  We  will  then  go  into  what  is  called  a  markup,  which  is  the 
discussing, amending, and passing of a bill in Committee, and then 
sending it on, ready for action on the floor. 

It’s my hope that we can get the NASA authorization bill moving 
on a fairly rapid track. With all the other distractions of this year, 
such  as  the  appropriations  bills  that  we  have  to  do,  and  particu-
larly in the political crucible of a presidential election year, we are 
trying to get all of these things done. 

NASA  is  in  trouble.  This  little  agency  has  been  asked  to  do  too 
much  with  too  little.  And  that  is  the  problem.  It’s  my  hope  that, 
within the last 8 months or so of the Bush Administration, we can 
get the President and the Vice President, who set the vision for the 
future  of  NASA,  to  adequately  fund  it.  And,  of  course,  in,  how 
many  months  have  we  got  to  go?  May,  June,  July,  August,  Sep-
tember,  October,  November,  December,  8  months,  we  can  convince 
the  new  President  to  properly  fund  all  that  NASA  is  being  asked 
to do. And it’s a lot. 

We have payloads that have to be launched by the Space Shuttle 
in  order  to  complete  the  Space  Station.  Then  it  must  be  equipped. 
It  must  have  supplies.  And  it  must  have  scientific  experiments. 
One of those scientific experiments is still sitting on the ground, al-
ready  paid  for,  a  billion  and  a  half  dollars.  The  Alpha  Magnetic 
Spectrometer.  Fifty  universities  and  25  nations  have  participated 
in the creation and building of this scientific experiment which will 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

go onboard the Space Station, but is configured to ride to the Space 
Station aboard the Space Shuttle. 

It  is  a  complementary  experiment  to  the  one  that  is  going  to  be 
turned  on  in  Geneva,  Switzerland,  in  the  next  couple  of  months. 
That  experiment  is  this  accelerator  that  is  about  15  miles  in  cir-
cumference and is going to smash two protons together in order for 
us  to  try  to  understand  subatomic  particles.  The  AMS  experiment 
for  the  Space  Station  is  a  complement  to  that.  It’s  going  to  collect 
subatomic  particles  out  there  in  space  called  cosmic  rays.  And  so, 
you  see,  NASA,  at  this  point,  can’t  even  get  around  to  flying  the 
Alpha Magnetic Spectrometer to the Space Station. 

If  that’s  not  enough,  NASA  says  it’s  going  to  have  to  shut  down 
Space  Shuttle  so  it  can  use  that  money  to  proceed  with  the  Con-
stellation  program,  which  is  the  rocket,  Ares,  and  the  capsule, 
Orion.  NASA  doesn’t  have  enough  money  to  do  both,  so  it  has  to 
shut  down  the  Space  Shuttle  first  before  it  has  the  money  to  pro-
ceed with the Constellation program. Resulting in the situation we 
are  now  in,  where  we  are  going  to  have  at  the  very  least  a  5-year 
gap. And what happens in that 5 years? We will not be able to get 
to  the  Space  Station  on  an  American  vehicle.  We’re  going  to  have 
to  pay  for  the  Russians  to  build  additional  Soyuz  vehicles  in  order 
for  us  to  get  to  the  International  Space  Station,  which  is  about 
$100-billion investment that we have paid $75 billion. 

Now, to put it in my Southern vernacular, that’s pitiful. And yet, 

that’s the situation that we find ourselves in. 

Who  knows  what  Vladimir  Putin  is  going  to  charge  us.  And,  oh, 
by  the  way,  is  he  going  to  let  us  have  a  ride?  What  are  the  geo-
politics going to be like in 2013–2014? Is Russia going to be cozied 
up to China? China clearly has an ascendant space program. They 
have  their  sites  on  the  moon,  in  the  published  reports,  they  say, 
2020. That’s NASA’s target, as well, if we get ourselves geared up. 
But, at the rate we’re going, we’re not geared up. 

And  yet,  this  is  the  50th  anniversary  of  NASA.  I  didn’t  know 
they had produced a coffee table-size book on the 50th anniversary, 
but  I  started  flipping  through  that,  and,  oh,  all  that  glory  came 
back.  All  of  those  exceptional  achievements  of  NASA  captured  in 
those photographs. 

Yesterday, John Glenn, Bart Gordon, and I introduced John Hen-
dricks,  the  head  and  founder  of  the  Discovery  Channel,  and  Dr. 
Griffin.  NASA  found  this  old  crinkled-up  9-millimeter  film  of  some 
of the glory of things that have never been seen, going back to Mer-
cury  and  Gemini  and  Apollo,  and  they  collaborated  with  the  Dis-
covery  Channel,  digitized  it,  and  put  it  into  high  definition  tele-
vision.  They  showed  us  some  snippets  yesterday  when  we  an-
nounced  this  project.  I’m  telling  you,  when  you  see  Ed  White  for 
the first time open up that door of Gemini and start to float freely 
out there, this is stuff that we’ve never seen, and this is all in high 
definition, living color. It’s incredible. 

The future holds a myriad of challenges, and if these trends that 
we  see  right  now  don’t  change,  then  the  bottom  line  is  that  NASA 
has  to  do  too  many  things  with  too  few  resources.  We’re  going  to 
rue  the  day  that  this  occurred,  because  either  we’re  going  to  have 
another  accident,  which  everybody  in  the  space  team  works  day 
and night to avoid, but, spaceflight is risky business, or we’re going 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

to  see  ourselves  drift,  and  we’re  going  to  be  overtaken  by  other 
countries, and it could be the Chinese. 

I  can  tell  you,  and  I  know  the  Senator  from  Louisiana  feels  the 
same  way,  no  American  wants  us  to  be  a  second-rate  power  in 
space. We were before, when the Soviets took the high ground. And 
with  a  lot  of  grit,  determination,  and  political  will,  we  decided  to 
overcome.  And  we  did.  And  we  have.  And  we  still  are,  every  day, 
overcoming.  But,  that  could  be  slipping.  And  we  don’t  want  that. 
So, the purpose of this hearing is to find out what you think from 
the  experts.  Where  do  you  think  we  ought  to  go?  And  then  we’ll 
be fashioning this authorization bill. 

So, let me turn to our Ranking Member, Senator Vitter. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator VITTER. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I  agree  with  all  of  your  comments  and  all  of  your  perspective. 
This  is  not  a  partisan  issue,  this  is  not  an  ideological  divide.  I 
agree completely. 

And, indeed, as a conservative, I believe the Federal Government 
should  concentrate  on  select  things  that  really  only  the  Federal 
Government  can  do  properly  or  adequately.  And,  at  least  for  the 
time  being,  well  into  the  future,  space  is  definitely  one  of  those 
things which can also have enormous benefit to other advances for 
our economy. So, I agree with you completely, and I want to thank 
you  for  this  hearing,  but  also  for  this  hearing  in  the  context  of  a 
path  leading  to  the  drafting  and  introduction  and  passage—this 
year, hopefully—of a NASA reauthorization bill. 

I know the conventional wisdom up here is that nothing can hap-
pen  this  year.  Well,  I  don’t  buy  that  conventional  wisdom  in  a  lot 
of respects, and I believe a NASA reauthorization bill can disprove 
it;  and  I  think  we  can  do  it  this  year,  and  we  should  sure  as  heck 
try very, very hard, for all of the reasons you have laid out. 

We  do  have  enormous  challenges  in  moving  forward  with  our 
space  program.  We’re  facing,  as  you  said,  a  period  of  time  when, 
for  purely  budgetary  reasons,  we’ll  have  no  U.S.-owned  or  U.S.- 
based  option  for  delivering  crews  and  cargo  to  what  will  finally  be 
a  completed  International  Space  Station,  including  the  U.S.  Na-
tional  Laboratory  finally  ready  to  be  used  for  research,  promised, 
really,  for  the  past  15  years.  And  in  order  to  protect  that  invest-
ment, in order to minimize that period of time when we don’t have 
that  capability,  in  order  to  do  the  research  we’ve  been  building  to-
ward for 15-plus years, we need to look very hard at this gap, and 
shrink it, and mitigate it in any way possible. 

I think that’s very important—again, for all the reasons you have 
laid out. Even the NASA Administrator, Dr. Griffin, has called the 
current  situation,  ‘‘unseemly  in  the  extreme.’’  And  I  believe  that’s 
an understatement. 

So, this hearing is important, and this process, hopefully leading 
to  a  reauthorization  bill  this  year,  is  important,  to  look  at  how  we 
close the gap, to look at anything—the COTS Program, an accelera-
tion  of  that  can  possibly  lend  to  that  effort;  to  look  at  how  we  try 
to  come  up  with  one  to  two  billion  additional  dollars,  and  how  ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

actly we would best use that as we move on to the next generation 
of NASA. 

Now, we have, understandably, focused on the challenges. I think 
it’s important, though, to also note the opportunities. I had a great 
honor  of  meeting  with  Gene  Kranz  yesterday,  and  we  had  a  great 
visit,  and  he  underscored  a  couple  of  things,  in  terms  of  those  op-
portunities. 

First  of  all,  he  said,  and  I  agree  with  him,  that  we  have  a  truly 
great plan that makes a lot of sense, that is on a par or better than 
any plan for the next step that NASA’s ever had in its history. We 
also have, he said, and I agree, a great administrator, who has the 
confidence  of  the  whole  agency  and  the  whole  community,  very  re-
spected  here  on  Capitol  Hill.  So,  we  have  a  lot  of  things  going  for 
us  as  we  take  this  next  big  step,  but  if  that  gap  is  too  large,  the 
big  step  is  going  to  be  too  big  to  take,  folks  are  going  to  become 
disenchanted, and we’re going to lose a lot of talent in the program, 
which will set us back even further. 

And  so,  clearly  our  biggest  challenge  is  to  shrink  and  minimize 
that  gap,  and  move  forward  with  this  next-generation  activity  to 
stay at the cutting edge. 

Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  your  commitment  to  push-
ing  that  process  forward  through  a  reauthorization  bill.  And,  like 
you, I’m very eager to hear the thoughts of all of our distinguished 
witnesses. 

Senator  NELSON.  As  we  get  on  down  the  line,  we  will  try  again, 
like  we  did  last  year,  to  get  additional  resources  for  NASA.  Last 
year, we were unsuccessful in persuading the White House Budget 
Office  to  support  us  in  a  billion  extra  dollars  for  NASA  so  that  we 
could  shorten  the  gap  that  Senator  Vitter  mentioned  from  5  years 
down to 3 years. We are going to try to do that again. And my ar-
gument will be very simple, ‘‘Mr. President, you laid out the vision. 
The  vision  is  there;  but  with  no  money,  it’s  a  pipedream  and  the 
vision does not come into reality.’’ 

That will be an effort by an awful lot of us here on Capitol Hill, 
in a bipartisan fashion, just as it was last year, and of which it ul-
timately fell because of lack of support. 

Poor  NASA,  in  the  aftermath  of  the  Columbia  disaster,  spent 
$2.8 billion in recovery and return to flight operations. But, NASA 
had  to  eat  that  out  of  its  operating  funds.  That  was  not  the  case 
22  years  earlier,  in  the  destruction  of  Challenger.  The  costs  of  re-
covery were additionally supplied over and above NASA’s operating 
funds. So, the attempt that we will make again this year is just to 
reimburse NASA $1 billion of the $2.8 billion that NASA had to eat 
in  the  repair  and  rejuvenation  after  the  destruction  of  Columbia. 
We  have  an  exceptionally  distinguished  panel.  Gene  Kranz,  the 
former  director  of  NASA’s  mission  operations.  He’s  best  known  as 
one of the leaders of the team of NASA flight directors that created 
a  miracle.  The  miracle  was  bringing  back  three  astronauts  when 
they  had  an  explosion  on  the  way  to  the  moon,  and  how  they  did 
that in real-time. He’s the one that came up with the phrase, ‘‘Fail-
ure  is  not  an  option.’’  How  much  has  that  symbolized  the  excep-
tional  success  of  NASA  over  50  years?  Failure  is  not  a  option,  and 
they figure it out. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

In  the  back  of  the  room,  we’re  pleased  to  have  one  of  the  early 
pioneers,  Wally  Nelson,  and  his  wife,  Mrs.  Nelson.  Will  you  stand 
up and be recognized? 

[Applause.] 
Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Joan  Johnson-Freese,  the  Chairman  of  the 
National  Security  Decision  Making  Department  at  the  U.S.  Naval 
War College. She has served on the National Research Council, the 
Space Studies Board, and Congress’s Advisory Panel for U.S. Space 
Launch Capability Study. She has focused her research and writing 
on  space  programs  and  policies.  She’s  an  expert  on  China.  I  got  to 
know  her,  years  ago,  when  she  was  at  the  University  of  Central 
Florida, doing her space studies there. 

Then we are pleased to have Dr. Fred Tarantino. He is President 
of  the  Universities  Space  Research  Association.  It’s  a  private,  non-
profit  corporation  founded  back  in  1969  under  the  auspices  of  the 
National  Academy  of  Sciences.  Their  membership  consists  of  over 
100  universities  in  space-related  sciences  or  engineering.  He  has 
previously  served  in  the  White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Policy,  and  as  U.S.  Chair  of  a  Joint  U.S./U.K.  Power  Work-
ing Group. 

And  we  are  pleased  to  have  Major  General  (Retired)  Bob 
Dickman.  He’s  the  Executive  Director  of  the  American  Institute  of 
Aeronautics  and  Astronautics.  They  represent  over  35,000  aero-
space  workers  and  students.  General  Dickman  has  served  in  nu-
merous  senior  positions  in  the  Department  of  Defense,  including 
the  Air  Force’s  director  of  space  programs  and  the  Department  of 
Defense space architect. 

We are pleased to have George Whitesides, who is the Executive 
Director  of  the  National  Space  Society.  It  is  dedicated  to  the  pro-
motion of human spaceflight and exploration, as well as space edu-
cation  and  development.  It  was  founded  in  1974  by  the  legendary 
Dr.  Werner  von  Braun  and  one  of  the  great  space  afficionados, 
broadcaster  Hugh  Downs.  You  thought  I  was  going  to  say  Walter 
Cronkite,  who 
the  number-one  space 
afficionado. Mr. Whitesides is a member of COMSTAC. It’s an advi-
sory committee to the FAA’s Office of Commercial Space Transpor-
tation. 

today  still  remains 

Because  of  the  size  of  the  panel,  I’m  going  to  ask  you  all  to  try 
to  keep  it  to  around  5  minutes  so  it’ll  give  us  time  to  get  into  the 
‘‘warp and woof’’ of questions. But, Mr. Kranz, I’m going to take the 
liberty to say that you are not compelled to obey the 5 minutes. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  NELSON.  I  want  people  to  hear  you.  I  want  people  to 
know  what  a  national  resource  you  are,  and  have  been,  as  a  great 
asset to this country. 

So, Gene Kranz, talk to us. 

STATEMENT OF EUGENE F. KRANZ, ADVISORY BOARD 
MEMBER COALITION FOR SPACE EXPLORATION; AND 

FORMER FLIGHT DIRECTOR AND DIRECTOR, 

MISSION OPERATIONS, NASA 

Mr.  KRANZ.  Thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Nelson  and  Rank-
ing  Member  Vitter.  It’s  a  real  pleasure  to  have  the  opportunity  to 
address you this morning. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

I’ve  been  involved  in  aircraft  or  spaceflight  operations  for  over 
six  decades.  During  that  period  of  time,  I’ve  seen  our  Nation  grow 
in  prosperity  as  a  result  of  our  investments  in  aircraft  and  space 
technologies. 

In  1957,  I  was  a  fighter  pilot  in  Korea,  and,  as  we  would  go  out 
on  our  missions  to  escort  the  reconnaissance  aircraft  along  the 
DMZ,  we  would  be  advised  by  our  radar  controllers  that  we  had 
Russian  MiGs  basically  shadowing  us.  And  the  Russian  MiGs  had 
an altitude advantage of at least to 2,000 feet. Their perch position 
put them on the high ground; and at any time during our mission, 
they could choose to attack if they would cross that DMZ. 

Returning from a mission 1 day in October, I was advised by my 
crew  chief  that  they  had  heard  that  the  Russians  had  launched  a 
satellite, Sputnik. And this satellite was basically circling the globe 
every 90 minutes. We didn’t understand what this new business of 
space  was  about,  but  it  was  obvious  that  the  Soviet  Union  had 
raised the bar on the high ground. They had achieved a new perch 
position that the United States was not capable of reaching. 

I  spent  2  years  as  a  flight  test  engineer  at  Holloman  Air  Force 
Base, adapting various weapons systems to the B–52, and then an-
swered an advertisement in Aviation Week that indicated that they 
were  forming  a  Space  Task  Group.  They  were  looking  for  Ameri-
cans,  young  engineers,  to  establish  the  feasibility  of  putting  an 
American  in  space.  At  that  time,  the  Soviets  had  at  least  a  two- 
and-a-half  year,  possibly  even  a  longer,  lead  on  us.  And  the  young 
engineers  that  we  had  at  the  Cape,  at  Langley  Field  in  Virginia, 
Goddard Space Flight Center, were truly frustrated by the position 
of  dominance  that  the  Soviet  Union  appeared  to  have.  We  were 
frustrated.  We  saw  the  Gagarin  and  the  Titov  flights.  We  couldn’t 
match those flights. 

Finally,  we  answered  with  a  John  Glenn.  The  John  Glenn  mis-
sion  was  basically  our  entry  into  the  big-time  business  of  manned 
spaceflight. But, the Soviets quickly countered with a dual launch, 
attempting  a  rendezvous.  So,  again,  it  was  obvious,  this  high 
ground was owned by the Soviet Union. 

We  continued  to  pursue  the  Soviets.  And  as  we  approached  the 
early  Gemini  program,  we  attempted  to  perform  America’s  first 
EVA  with  Ed  White.  But,  again,  the  Soviets  beat  us  to  that  high 
ground,  they  accomplished  the  first  manned  extravehicular  oper-
ations. So, we battled for position until America reached this domi-
nant  position.  We  had  accomplished  the  rendezvous  during  the 
Gemini 1976 mission. 

We were concerned about the Soviets during that period of time, 
but  we  now  knew  we  had  the  team  in  place,  and  we  had  the  tech-
nology, we had the manufacturing ability, our contractors were de-
livering.  America  was  delivering  the  systems  we  needed  to  main-
tain our perch position now in the high ground. 

We  raised  the  bar  for  the  Soviets  when  we  accomplished  the 
lunar landing, and each one of those successive missions was basi-
cally  a  symbol  of  America’s  technology.  We  basically  were  able  to 
capture  the  minds  and  hearts  and  wills  of  the  people  of  the  free 
world.  We  were  leaders  in  space,  and  we  maintained  that  leader-
ship  in  space  through  the  Skylab  Program.  We  opened  up  a  mar-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

velous  array  of  new  sciences.  We  got  involved  in  Earth  resources 
and the solar astronomy and the medical experiments. 

So,  we  had  now  raised  the  bar  even  further,  from  a  standpoint 
of our earliest and probably the most productive Space Station that 
we had up through that date. We met with the Soviets and accom-
plished  a  relatively  simple  rendezvous,  but  we  were  always  driven 
in space by this vision that we were given by John F. Kennedy. We 
had a vision for space. We knew where we were going. 

We  then  moved  into  the  Shuttle  Program.  The  Shuttle  Program, 
to  some  extent,  was  different,  and  I’d  like  to  come  back  when— 
later on, and talk about the gap between Skylab and Shuttle. But, 
again, we maintained this dominant position in space with the ad-
vent  of  the  Space  Shuttle.  It  was  a  marvelous  flying  machine.  It 
did  everything  that  we  had  asked  for.  We  rendezvoused,  we  con-
ducted  experiments  in  space,  we  recovered  satellites,  we  deployed, 
satellites,  we  supported  the  Department  of  Defense.  We  were  on  a 
roll  there,  as  Americans,  with  this  new  technology,  and  then  we 
had the Challenger accident. 

And  the  Challenger  accident  set  us,  now,  back  on  a  path  where 
we no longer could support the DOD, we no longer could deploy the 
satellites.  We  became  our  own  customer.  We  started  running  from 
the  risks  of  our  business,  and  we  started  to  cede  the  high  ground. 
We are now in a position, in 2007–2008, where we recognize this 
high  ground  will  be  forsaken,  it  will  be  challenged.  New  people, 
new  individuals,  new  countries,  new  leaders  will  emerge  for  that 
high  ground.  And  I  am  very  concerned  about  our  Nation’s  ability 
to  maintain  the  leadership,  not  only  in  space,  but  the  leadership 
that produces the technology that keeps the economic engine of our 
country  going,  the  leadership  that  inspires  our  young  people,  the 
leadership  that  is  basically  going  to  drive  our  factories  and  put 
Americans to work. Leadership is really the key. Technology drives 
the economic engine of our country. 

In the early years in space, it was power and prestige, it was the 
Cold War. Now it is technology and economic benefit. These are the 
fruits that we harvest from our work in space. We’re in great dan-
ger  of  losing  our  ability  to  keep  this  economic  engine  going  at  full 
throttle.  And  this  is  important,  if  we  are  to  have  a  future.  It’s  im-
portant to inspire our young people. 

Now,  back  to  the  gap  in  the  program.  I  faced  a  6-year  gap  be-
tween  the  time  that  we  had  finished  the  Skylab  Program  and  the 
time that we began preparation for launch in the Shuttle. This was 
the  most  difficult  time  I  ever  faced  as  an  engineer  in  spaceflight 
operations,  because  I  saw  many  of  my  very  best  people  leave.  The 
top  leaders  in  the  program  and  in  the  organization—my  flight  di-
rector  stayed  with  us—but  the  mid-level  managers,  these  are  the 
people  who  came  up  through  the  programs—the  Mercury,  Gemini, 
Apollo  Program.  They  became  the  risk  managers.  They  were  the 
ones  who  would  take  the  place  of  those  people  who  would  retire 
shortly  after  the  Shuttle  Program  began.  So,  I  needed  these  mid- 
level leaders, but, basically, they didn’t see that space was in their 
near  vision.  They  were  very  aggressive,  they  were  bold,  they  were 
mobile,  so  they  moved  into  other  business.  We  had  learned  a  lot 
about  space  sciences  from  the  Skylab  Program,  so  some  of  them 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

went into the—solar astronomy, a few of them became medical doc-
tors. I lost these people. 

And  they  were  very  difficult  to  replace,  because  in  the  early 
years, most of our people came in from aircraft flight test. We had 
a  very  healthy  aircraft  program  and  emerging  space  program.  So, 
we  could  draw  people  in  from  our  contractor  base,  and  use  them. 
But,  as  we  moved  into  the  early  1980s,  the  Grummans  had  dis-
appeared, the General Dynamics had disappeared. We did not have 
this  source  of  young  people  that  we  could  bring  in  out  of  our  air-
craft manufacturers, and, in particular, out of flight test. 

So,  in  order  to  meet  this  need  with  the  new  young  leaders,  we 
established  a  boot  camp  to  bring  our  people  through.  We  took  the 
best  of  the  leaders  that  we  had  still  remaining  with  us,  and  used 
these as the teachers. 

So,  it  is  important  that,  as  you  move  through  this  gap,  that 
NASA  does  not  leave  this—lose  this  generation  of  young  people 
who  grew  up  in  Shuttle,  went  through  the  cauldron  of  Challenger 
and Columbia, and emerged smarter and wiser and better. It is im-
portant  that  we  basically  move  this  gap,  basically  reduce  it  to  the 
absolute minimum. 

Next  thing  is  to  address  this  question  of  architecture.  I’ve  been 
involved  with  two  of  the  graybeard  sessions  at  NASA.  That  is  my 
only—the only relations I have with NASA today is to basically do 
a  program  for  all  new  employees,  a  history  program.  I  reviewed, 
after Columbia, some of the simulations, how they’re training, but, 
basically, the graybeard activities, we had two of them related to— 
Jeff  Hanley  would  bring  his  team  in,  and  they  would  go  through 
how  the  architecture  was  responding  to  the  vision  of  President 
Bush. And this vision is respected in your 2005 appropriation. 

This  is  the  best  game  plan  that  I  have  seen  since  the  days  of 
President Kennedy. This blueprint for space was turned into an ar-
chitecture  by  Hanley’s  and  Griffin’s  team,  and  it  represents  the 
very  solid  foundation  that  we  need  to  move  further  into  space.  I 
would  compare  it  to  the  DC–3.  I  worked  in  a  B–52.  Fifty  years 
after  I  worked  as  a  flight  test  engineer,  that  system  is  still  deliv-
ering  for  America.  The  system  that  Griffin’s  team  is  putting  in 
place  will  be  delivering  for  America  50  years  later.  It’s  the  right 
thing. 

So,  the  message  that  I  would  give  to  you  and  to  the  U.S.  Con-

gress is, ‘‘Stay the course. Stay on track.’’ 

A  bit  about  the  team.  Mike  Griffin  is  the  finest  leader  I  have 
seen  in  NASA  in  the  last  couple  of  decades.  He  is  the  leader  that 
we  have  deserved.  He  has  the  respect  of  the  working-level  devils. 
He’s built a fine team. He’s got the ability to make the difficult go/ 
no-go  decisions,  because  there  is  nothing  in  space  that’s  easy. 
There’s  always  some  ambiguity  in  the  decisions  you’re  making.  He 
is the right man at the right time. 

And  the  team  that  he’s  put  in  place—Bill  Gerstenmayer,  Jeff 
Hanley—I  raised  them.  They  were  members  of  Mission  Control. 
They were my risk leaders. They were the people who, again, grew 
up  through  Challenger  and  Columbia.  They  know  what  it  is  to 
make  tough,  visceral  decisions.  They’re  ready  to  do  the  job.  Keep 
them  in  place,  because,  I  think,  in  addition  to  the  funding  issue, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

a big change in leadership in this program also represents a signifi-
cant risk. 

9 

I  would  talk  about  the  issue  of  public  support.  You  know,  I’ve 
seen  notes  in  the  paper  that  says  the  public  support  is  not  there. 
Well, I have talked to—since I’ve retired, I moved into the speaking 
and  bookwriting  business,  I  flew  air  shows,  I  did  all  kinds  of  fun 
stuff, but one of the things that is most enjoyable to me is to meet 
the  public.  I’ve  probably  talked  to  almost  a  million  people  in  700 
corporate  events  throughout  the  United  States.  I  talk  to  the  kids. 
I  see  the  energy  that  these  entrepreneurs  have,  the  Fortune  500 
companies  have.  They  recognize  their  dependence  upon  NASA  for 
the  technology  that  is  going  to  allow  them  to  remain  in  business. 
Just  past  Monday  it  was,  I  spoke  to  Olympus  USA.  Olympus 
USA,  probably  one  of  the  top  optic  countries  in  the—companies  in 
the world, producing the instruments that are used for diagnostics. 
They  are  very  interested  in  learning  what  NASA  intends  to  do, 
where  they  intend  to  go.  I  speak  to  the  young  kids.  I  talk  to  kids 
sponsored by Sprint and Lego. I’ve been in inner cities all through 
the Northeast. I’ve toured Florida, I’ve toured Ohio. The young kids 
want  to  be  astronauts,  and  I’d  rather  have  them  want  to  be  astro-
nauts than mindlessly play this Grand Theft Auto IV game in com-
puters. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  KRANZ.  OK?  It  is  important  to  inspire  these  kids,  because  if 
we  have  an  education  problem,  it  starts  with  motivating  the  kids 
to study engineering, math, science, and remain in school. 

And  finally,  I’d  sort  of  try  at  NASA—one  final  word  here  and 
then I’ll turn on to these people here—my daughter works in the— 
for United Space Alliance, and I always get on her case because of 
all  these  big,  fancy  meetings  they  have,  where  it  seems  that  the 
space  people  talk  to  the  space  people,  the  contractors  talk  to  each 
other. What they ought to do is take some of that money—and I— 
and in my time-frame, Chris Kraft, my boss, would say, ‘‘Look, you 
go  to  Detroit,  who  are  having  brownouts,  you  talk  to  them  about 
space solar power.’’ It is time for NASA to recognize there is no free 
ride. We’ve got a long-term space program that we must get public 
support for, and it has to come from grassroots. It is time for NASA 
to  direct  every  NASA  and  contractor  employee  to  get  out  in  the 
field,  earn  their  spurs,  and  talk  to  Rotaries  and  the  Kiwanis  and 
the  Chamber  of  Commerce  and  the  church  group,  time  for  NASA 
to get off its duff, get out of its comfort zone as engineers. And this 
is right down to the lowest guy in the organization; they can do it. 
So, I thank you for the opportunity to speak today, and really ap-

preciate the work that you’re trying to do. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Kranz follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EUGENE F. KRANZ, ADVISORY BOARD MEMBER, COALITION 
FOR SPACE EXPLORATION;  AND FORMER FLIGHT DIRECTOR AND DIRECTOR, MISSION 
OPERATIONS, NASA 
Chairman  Nelson,  Ranking  Member  Vitter,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee, 
thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today  to  present  my  views  on  the  future  of  our 
human spaceflight program as you consider legislation to reauthorize NASA. Before 
we  discuss  those  issues,  I  would  like  to  offer  some  thoughts  on  NASA’s  past  as  we 
celebrate its 50th anniversary this year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

In 1957, the Soviet Union launched Sputnik. As someone who was present at the 
time, that event had a tremendous impact of the psyche of our Nation in the midst 
of  the  Cold  War.  Our  country  responded,  first  with  the  creation  of  NASA  from  the 
old NACA, then with the launch of the first U.S. satellites and the initiation of the 
Mercury  program.  President  Kennedy’s  lunar  challenge  to  a  novice  space  industry 
was  issued  when  we  had  only  20  minutes  of  human  spaceflight  experience.  Achiev-
ing the lunar goal within the decade of the 1960s was possibly the greatest technical 
and scientific challenge of our age. 

Meanwhile,  the  Soviets  were  moving  aggressively  ahead  with  their  own  human 
spaceflight  program,  starting  with  the  orbital  flight  of  Yuri  Gagarin  when  we  had 
yet to launch our first astronaut. 

The Space Race was on! The U.S. was at least 21⁄2 years behind at the start; how-
ever,  America’s  capacity  as  a  free  nation  provided  the  inventions,  the  new  tech-
nology and the talented people to put us on the path to catch and then surpass the 
Russian  space  efforts.  With  the  Gemini  76  mission  rendezvous  in  1965,  we  had 
moved  into  the  leadership  position  in  space  and  the  lunar  target  was  firmly  in  our 
sights. 

By the end of the 1960s, we had moved ahead with successful moon landings. Our 
country was united in its goal, steadfast in its purpose, and unwavering in its com-
mitment  at  a  time  when  we  were  facing  division  and  turmoil  in  other  parts  of  our 
society.  That  united  effort  put  America  in  the  lead  position  as  the  dominant  space 
power. This leadership continued through the latter part of the 20th century as we 
moved  on  to  develop  the  Shuttle,  initiate  construction  of  the  International  Space 
Station, launch the Hubble Space Telescope, and send rovers to Mars, among many 
other  space  accomplishments.  However,  I  caution  those  on  this  Subcommittee,  oth-
ers on the Hill and space industry leaders . . . our leadership role cannot be taken 
for  granted.  We  face  a  new  challenge  that  is  even  greater  than  what  we  faced  dur-
ing the Cold War. 

Over  the  past  50  years  . . .  our  country  has  profoundly  benefited  from  the  space 
program in more ways than it is even aware. In a recent report, the Space Founda-
tion  estimated  that  the  value  of  the  world  space  economy  is  $250  billion.  So  many 
industries—telecommunications,  agriculture,  medicine,  Earth  observation,  public 
health and safety to name a few—have advanced and grown due to development of 
space  technologies.  Our  aerospace  industry  is  the  envy  of  the  world,  employing 
650,000 Americans in high-wage, high-skill jobs. It is one of our few industries that 
actually  enjoys  a  trade  surplus  with  our  foreign  competition.  Every  time  NASA  ac-
complishes  a  great  achievement,  the  interest  of  our  young  people  in  pursuing  a  ca-
reer in science and engineering spikes upward. When those kids graduate from col-
lege, they may not all end up working in the space program, but many of them end 
up  with  leading  commercial  technology  businesses  in  Silicon  Valley  and  elsewhere. 
Last, and perhaps most importantly, space plays an integral role in our national se-
curity, demonstrated most recently in our conflicts in Afghanistan and Iraq. 

So, that brings to me to where we are today and for the foreseeable future. Space 
is  no  longer  about  the  United  States  and  Russia.  The  Europeans,  Japan,  Canada, 
India, and China all have active space programs, some working in cooperation with 
ours;  others  pursuing  their  own  national  objectives  separately.  Iran,  Syria  and 
North Korea are among the other countries that are aggressively pursuing space ca-
pabilities. 

NASA  plans  to  shut  down  the  Space  Shuttle  in  just  over  2  years.  By  2010,  the 
Shuttle  will  have  served  our  Nation  with  distinction  for  thirty  years.  Its  final  mis-
sions  have  been  dedicated  to  finalizing  construction  of  our  National  Laboratory  in 
space,  the  International  Space  Station,  a  truly  global  collaboration.  Still,  it’s  an  ef-
fort largely led and financed by the U.S. 

NASA  is  now  in  the  process  of  developing  the  next-generation  human  spaceflight 
vehicle, called Project Orion, and its launch system, Ares I. These systems are based 
largely  on  proven  technologies  and  systems  derived  from  the  Space  Shuttle  and 
Apollo programs. In my view, this is a sensible approach from both a cost and sched-
ule  standpoint,  and  one  well  thought  through  by  Administrator  Griffin  and  his 
team.  The  ultimate  goal  is  to  return  to  the  moon  and  to  establish  a  lasting  human 
presence  on  its  surface.  The  moon  remains  relatively  unexplored  and  also  presents 
new  and  interesting  scientific  prospects,  whether  it’s  greater  research  into  its 
unique  geology  or  use  as  a  fixed  platform  without  atmospheric  interference  for  a 
new generation of space telescopes. It is an exciting and dynamic initiative. 

The funding stream that has supported the Shuttle will be redirected to the major 
development  phase  of  Projects  Orion  and  Ares.  However,  this  approach,  as  laid  out 
in  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration,  will  lead  to  the  creation  of  roughly  a  41⁄2 year 
gap—at  least!  This  decision  and  impractical,  shortsighted  approach  was  not  driven 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

by the current NASA leadership, but rather by the preceding regime in close coordi-
nation with ‘‘bean-counters’’ from the Office of Management and Budget. 

11 

These  decision-makers  believed  that  grounding  America’s  human  space  transpor-
tation  and  losing  tens  of  thousands  of  aerospace  jobs  across  the  U.S.  was  desirable 
in  the  interests  of  essentially  flat  annual  budgets.  That’s  irresponsible,  and  an  un-
reasonable  budget  level  for  an  agency  that  currently  represents  only  6/10ths  of  1 
percent  of  the  entire  Federal  budget.  The  decision  to  limit  NASA  to  this  very  mea-
ger  budget  has  been  well  characterized  by  Senator  Nelson  as  ‘‘spaceflight  on  the 
cheap.’’ You cannot safely, efficiently and successfully do ‘‘space flight on the cheap.’’ 
While  I  believe  the  goals  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  to  push  to  the  moon 
and beyond, and the subsequent endorsement of those goals in the NASA Authoriza-
tion Act of 2005, are the right approach, I find it disturbing that the Administration 
budget requests have been well below those called for in the 2005 Authorization Act. 
The  budget  resources  do  not  match  the  goals  and  requirements,  and  further  reduc-
tions, such as the FY07 budget shortfall of $577 million, set NASA and its programs 
up for failure. 

During  this  gap  period,  we  will  have  a  $100+  billion  orbiting  lab  that  will  be 
ready for all of the innovative microgravity research in human health effects, mate-
rials  science  and  other  areas  that  have  been  planned  for  a  long  time.  But  we  will 
have  no  way  to  get  our  crew  to  it  and  home  again,  except  on  a  Russian  Soyuz.  For 
that access now, while NASA still has the Shuttle available, we are paying the Rus-
sian  Space  Agency  $780  million  and  getting  a  waiver  from  the  prohibitions  in  the 
IranSyria-North  Korea  Nonproliferation  Act,  a  law  designed  to  discourage  nations 
from  cooperating  with  dangerous  programs  of  countries  that  are  state  sponsors  of 
terrorism.  Russia  has  been  a  reliable  ISS  partner,  but  the  Russian  Space  Agency 
is  under-funded  and  facing  aging  infrastructure  issues,  as  well.  Memories  of  acci-
dents  and  safety  issues  onboard  the  Mir  are  still  with  most  of  us,  as  well  as  the 
more  recent  troubles  experienced  by  the  Soyuz,  making  a  second  ballistic  re-entry 
just a few weeks ago. When this issue of U.S. reliance on Russia was raised in hear-
ings  earlier  this  year,  Administrator  Griffin  testified  that  it  was  ‘‘unseemly  in  the 
extreme.’’ I completely agree. 

But  there  is  an  even  bigger  challenge  in  the  future  of  our  space  program.  China 
is  the  new  competitor  in  this  second  Space  Race  and  the  country  that  poses  the 
greatest threat to our leadership. China has publicly declared a goal of establishing 
a  permanent  manned  base  on  the  moon.  When  it  is  not  putting  our  orbiting  assets 
and  those  of  other  countries  at  risk  by  testing  anti-satellite  weaponry  in  violation 
of  international  protocols,  China  is  successfully  completing  orbital  human  space 
flights.  In  2004,  more  than  600,000  students  graduated  with  engineering  degrees 
from  institutions  of  higher  learning  in  China,  compared  to  70,000  in  the  U.S.,  as 
reported  by  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences.  That’s  eye  opening,  but  even  more 
so  is  the  fact  that  China  also  actively  uses  covert  means  to  access  U.S.  technology 
and scientific information. An April 3, 2008 cover story in the Washington Post ref-
erences  ten  cases  in  the  past  year  alone  where  alleged  Chinese  agents  have  been 
arrested  or  sentenced  for  the  illegal  export  of  sensitive  U.S.  technologies.  Report-
edly,  Shuttle  technologies  were  a  target  of  this  espionage  activity.  As  reported  in 
The Wall Street Journal and Aviation Week, among other major publications, China 
is  importing  ‘‘ITAR-free’’  satellites  and  other  space  technologies  from  a  European 
company,  thereby  evading  U.S.  export  controls  that  are  intended  to  safeguard  our 
national security. China is also developing its Long March 5 rocket that will be ca-
pable  not  only  of  delivering  people  to  the  moon,  but  also  landing  nuclear  payloads 
anywhere in the United States. 

It  is  time  for  our  country  and  our  Nation’s  leaders  to  tune  in  to  these  facts  and 
back  off  of  their  naı¨ve  views  of  ‘‘space  on  the  cheap’’—other  countries  are  making 
the  necessary  resource  investments;  and  it’s  time  to  do  the  same  before  the  option 
to respond is no longer an option. 

It is important to look at the issues and challenges facing our space program with 
clear  eyes  if  we  are  going  to  be  successful  in  solving  them.  We  need  to  limit  the 
duration of the U.S. human spaceflight gap and prevent it from growing, to forestall 
the hemorrhaging of our talented and experienced aerospace workforce and supplier 
network. The only approach is to provide additional funding, as the Senate has tried 
to do in the last couple of years, to accelerate development of the new vehicle. I com-
mend  many  here  on  Capitol  Hill  and  thank  them  for  their  efforts  to  reimburse 
NASA  for  money  lost  due  to  Hurricane  Katrina  and  Return  to  Flight  costs.  Their 
efforts to request the additional funding are exactly the kind of support and leader-
ship  we  need  on  the  Hill,  particularly  when  there  are  competing  national  priorities 
and their colleagues, who oppose the support, would rather leave our Nation’s budg-
et  lingering  in  a  Continuing  Resolution.  Administrator  Griffin  has  testified  that  an 
additional  $2  billion  in  funds  spread  equally  over  this  year  and  next  would  enable 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

the  agency  to  cut  18  months  off  of  its  delivery  time.  That  would  narrow  the  gap 
to around 3 years. That is far from ideal, but it reduces our reliance on Russia sig-
nificantly and may be a short enough time-frame to prevent wholesale loss of critical 
aerospace skills. 

We  will  be  facing  a  change  in  the  Presidency  in  just  a  few  short  months.  I  know 
all three major candidates have taken varied and often vague positions on our space 
program,  as  tends  to  be  the  case  during  election  season,  but  it  is  important  that 
the  party  taking  office  recognize  the  need  for  continuity  in  NASA  leadership,  and 
make  a  firm  commitment  to  provide  the  necessary  funding  for  our  Nation’s  ‘‘inde-
pendent’’ human space exploration programs. The architecture and program plan for 
Projects  Orion  and  Ares  are  sound  and  any  further  redesign  and  debate  will  only 
result in incurring more costs and widening the gap. Program restructuring and de-
sign  changes  were  major  factors  in  delayed  development  of  the  ISS.  With  this  gap 
looming, we don’t have the liberty of unnecessary changes in program direction and 
mid-course correction. 

My  last  recommendation  is  aimed  more  at  NASA  than  the  Congress.  Our  space 
agency has a public support, or approval rating, of around 70 percent . . . a rating 
that would leave many politicians envious. Additionally, NASA has one of the high-
est  public  profiles  of  any  in  the  Federal  Government  and  its  website  is  one  of  the 
most  frequently  visited.  Within  its  means,  the  agency  has  been  reasonable  in  its 
public relations efforts and effective at leveraging ‘‘space’’ to build partnerships with 
Hollywood  to  get  its  message  out,  but  on  this  issue  of  Shuttle  retirement,  the  gap, 
and  development  of  the  new  vehicle,  the  public  is  blissfully  unaware.  Maybe  the 
media  with  its  short-term  focus  shares  some  blame,  but  I  believe  the  agency  can 
do  more  to  educate  the  public  about  what  looms  ahead.  Part  of  that  mission  also 
entails better outreach, particularly to young people who communicate in much dif-
ferent ways than just a few short years ago. I’ve never believed that nonsense about 
young  people  no  longer  being  excited  or  ‘‘inspired’’  about  space.  When  a  kid  learns 
about  some  of  the  exciting  missions  the  agency  is  working  on,  tours  the  space  cen-
ters,  meets  an  astronaut,  or  views  the  bold  and  beautiful  images  of  outer  galaxies 
captured by the Hubble, they light up in the same way that kids did in the heyday 
of  Apollo.  More  creative  and  less  traditional  communications  efforts  have  started, 
but NASA needs to move more quickly into all mediums of communication, fully em-
bracing  opportunities  offered  by  YouTube,  MySpace  and  Facebook,  as  well  as  con-
tinuing  to  leverage  the  traditional  outreach  of  speakers  bureaus,  career  fairs  and 
the co-op and internship staffing programs. 

Thank you again for inviting me to testify and I stand ready to answer any ques-

tions you might have. 

Senator  NELSON.  That’s  as  well  said  as  anybody  could  say  it. 
Thank you for that. I have a feeling that the way you encapsulated 
everything  there  is  going  to  be  a  message  that  we’re  going  to 
spread  around  so  that  people  will  have  the  understanding  of  what 
you’ve  just  said  in  order  for  America  to  return  to  the  glory  days. 

All right. Dr. Johnson-Freese? 
STATEMENT OF DR. JOAN JOHNSON-FREESE, CHAIRMAN, 
NATIONAL SECURITY DECISION MAKING DEPARTMENT, 

NAVAL WAR COLLEGE 

Dr. JOHNSON-FREESE. That’s a hard act to follow. 
Senator NELSON. Amen. 
[Laughter.] 
Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vitter,  good  morning, 
and  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  my  views  on  reau-
thorizing the Vision for Space Exploration. 

I must begin by noting that the views I offer are mine alone and 
do not represent the U.S. Navy, the Department of Defense, or the 
U.S. Government. 

This  is  a  topic  whose  importance  and  impact  extends  far  beyond 
the realm of space exploration. The path America follows in human 
space  exploration  will,  I  believe,  be  read  by  much  of  the  inter-
national  community  as  indicative  of  America’s  intentions  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

world, and therefore it will be a key part of how we define the stra-
tegic future of the United States. 

In my written testimony, I present what I consider the value and 
importance of the U.S. human spaceflight capabilities, the implica-
tions  and  consequences  of  a  gap  in  those  capabilities,  and  an  as-
sessment  of  needs  in  order  to  accomplish  the  missions,  the  mul-
titude  of  missions  that  NASA’s  been  given.  In  the  few  minutes  I 
have  here,  however,  I’d  like  to  focus  on  the  strategic  implications 
of  uninterrupted  human  spaceflight  program  for  our  relationship 
with the rest of the world. 

First,  however,  let  me  be  completely  candid  about  my  general 
view  of  the  vision.  As  I  wrote,  last  year  in  my  book  on  American 
space  policy,  I  believe  that  the  administration’s  2004  vision,  espe-
cially  the  timelines,  while  well  intentioned,  was  a  vision  bordering 
on fantasy, and thus, effectively doomed from the start. Nothing in 
the  interim  has  led  me  to  revise  that  conclusion,  as  the  vision  has 
never  met  even  the  most  basic  test  of  a  plausible  and  executable 
policy;  namely,  to  align  benchmarks,  strategy,  and  resources  with 
the stated goals. 

Still, some of what the vision wishes to achieve is laudable. It is 
a tragedy that the United States turned away from its great, even 
heroic, achievements in space in the 1960s and 1970s. We can, and 
should,  return  and  maintain  our  leadership  in  human  spaceflight 
exploration.  Indeed,  although  it  is  our  common  human  destiny  to 
explore  the  stars,  America,  more  than  any  other  nation  on  Earth, 
has the magnificent scientific prowess that will lead mankind back 
to  space,  to  Mars  and  beyond.  It’s  not  just  an  opportunity,  it’s  our 
duty. 

‘‘dominance’’  or 

But, there is more immediate and earthbound reason for America 
to assert its leadership in space, and I note that I say ‘‘leadership,’’ 
and  not 
‘‘control.’’  The  fact  is  that  human 
spaceflight  programs,  especially  those  that  stress  international  co-
operation,  have  consistently  been  an  effective  tool  for  the  United 
States  in  generating  goodwill  and  soft  power  with  other  nations. 
The  U.S.  space  program  is  perhaps  the  very  best  example  of  how 
America’s  great  power  is  often  tempered  to  serve  far  greater 
human goals. 

Sadly, that perception of America has been lost over the past few 
years.  When  NASA  was  created,  part  of  the  motivation  was  to 
present  a  peaceful  civilian  face  with  the  U.S.  space  program,  and 
rightly  so,  as  a  stark  contrast  to  the  blatantly  militaristic  face  of 
the Soviet space program. But, 50 years later, that tide has turned. 
Many  nations,  friendly  and  otherwise,  now  view  the  U.S.  space  ef-
forts  as  centered  heavily  on  what  they  see  as  potentially  threat-
ening  military  applications.  Our  friends  and  competitors  alike  too 
often see our space program as part of an American drive to domi-
nate  the  cosmos  as  completely  as  American  power  now  dominates 
the  planet.  Worse,  there  is  a  perception  abroad—a  false  one,  I 
might  add—that  the  American  human  space  effort  is  being  bested 
by China. 

And  so,  we  stand  at  a  critical  junction.  Will  the  United  States 
continue  to  be  considered  as  the  leader  in  human  spaceflight, 
aimed at the benevolent exploration and utilization of the heavens, 
or  will  we  deliberately  and  knowingly  abrogate  that  role  to  others 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

in  a  future  search  for  military  space  dominance—futile  search  for 
military space dominance? While some might think it’s time to pull 
the  plug  on  the  vision,  I  would  suggest  that  the  price  of  doing  so, 
in  terms  of  international  prestige  and  the  consequent  benefits  of 
leadership, is too high. America needs to be seen as the leader into 
the  future,  and  no  venture,  no  journey,  is  better  to  do  that  than 
human spaceflight. 

With that, I’ll end my remarks. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Johnson-Freese follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. JOAN JOHNSON-FREESE, CHAIR, NATIONAL SECURITY 

DECISION MAKING DEPARTMENT, NAVAL WAR COLLEGE 1 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  my  views  on  Reauthorizing  the  Vision 
for  Space  Exploration.  This  is  a  topic  which  I  consider  important  beyond  the  realm 
of exploration. The path America follows in human space exploration will, I believe, 
be read by much of the world as indicative of America’s strategic future. Therefore, 
I  would  like  to  address  what  I  consider  the  value  and  importance  of  U.S.  human 
spaceflight capabilities, the implications and consequences of any gaps in such a ca-
pability,  and  an  assessment  of  NASA’s  needs  in  order  to  accomplish  its  given  mis-
sion as outlined in the Vision for Space Exploration. 

As a matter of full disclosure, in my 2007 book Space as a Strategic Asset I wrote 

about the Vision in less than positive terms. 

Politically,  the  2004  Bush  space  vision  was  always  a  vision  bordering  on  fan-
tasy.  Though  perhaps  well  intended,  it  was  effectively  doomed  from  the  start. 
The  vision  as  announced  was  a  very  broad-brush  outline  of  intent,  describing 
a return manned mission to the moon, as well as manned missions to Mars and 
beyond.  But  the  devil  is  in  the  details,  and  those  details  must  be  in  some  way 
attached to reality. Three major circumstantial realities predetermined the out-
come of that new vision. First were the budget issues. The domestic budget has 
been,  and  will  likely  remain,  an  effective  hostage  to  the  war  in  Iraq,  homeland 
security  concerns,  and  clean-up  for  Hurricane  Katrina—and  like  events  in  the 
future  . . .  Second  and  equally  critical,  the  NASA  budget  was  already  con-
sumed  by  commitments  to  support  existing  programs  . . .  Third,  the  public 
view  of  the  NASA  program  has  consistently  been  that  it  is  desirable,  but  ex-
pendable.  The  public  supports  human  exploration,  and  even  recognizes  that 
benefits  accrue  on  Earth,  but  it  prioritizes  funding  for  roads,  schools,  health 
care,  and  near-term  benefits  over  space  programs,  particularly  space  explo-
ration.2 

Then, and now, I believe the vision did not consider even the basic tenants of suc-
cessful strategy execution; matching goals, strategy to achieve the goals, and the re-
sources required to carry out the strategy. 

Some individuals involved in the development of the Bush space vision have sug-
gested  to  me  the  intent  was  to  give  NASA  a  goal  and  allow  them,  the  experts,  to 
figure out how best to get there. That would be reasonable except that a multitude 
of dates were included in the speech unveiling the Vision which inherently negated 
certain  incremental,  paced,  and  subsequently  less  resource  intensive  strategies  and 
required  instead  accelerated  strategies  which  leave  little  room  for  error  and  are 
more resource intensive. 

• Our first goal is to complete the International Space Station by 2010. 
• In 2010, the Space Shuttle . . . will be retired from service. 
• Our  second  goal  is  to  develop  and  test  a  new  spacecraft,  the  Crew  Exploration 
Vehicle,  by  2008,  and  to  conduct  the  first  manned  mission  no  later  than  2014. 
• Our third goal is to return to the moon by 2020. 
The  shortsighted  and  unrealistic  timetables  included  in  the  Vision,  including  ac-
ceptance  of  a  gap  in  U.S.  spaceflight  capabilities  between  the  retirement  of  the 
Shuttle and the new vehicle becoming operational, created the Rubic’s Cube that we 
are dealing with today. 

1 The  views  expressed  are  the  author’s  alone  and  do  not  represent  the  official  position  of  the 

Department of the Navy, the Department of Defense, or the U.S. Government. 

2 Joan Johnson-Freese, Space as a Strategic Asset (New York, New York: Columbia University 

Press, 2007) 16–17. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

Announcement of those dates immediately and inherently created a number of di-
lemmas  for  NASA,  first  and  foremost,  how  to  keep  Shuttle  flying  to  complete  the 
ISS  while  simultaneously  investing  every  dollar  possible  in  the  development  of  the 
new  vehicle.  The  gap  between  Shuttle  retirement  and  the  new  vehicle  becoming 
operational also raised the question of how to send cargo and crews to the ISS after 
the Shuttle was retired. There are few options to answer that question. Clearly the 
U.S. (NASA) will have to pay others to transport goods and people, which then cre-
ates  a  follow-on  dilemma  of  having  to  pay  others  for  transportation  while  trying  to 
maximize funds that can be used to develop Ares and Orion as new means of trans-
portation, and as quickly as possible. 

Despite  the  significant  execution  issues  related  to  the  Vision  as  announced  in 

2004, in my 2007 book I also wrote: 

In the 1960s, leadership was the motivation that took the United States to the 
moon, as the country wanted to show itself as the winner in a technology-based 
competition against the Soviet Union. It was a techno-nationalist show of prow-
ess. Today, post-September 11 and, equally or more important, with the ongoing 
war in Iraq, the United States needs to again recognize and embrace the leader-
ship opportunity offered by manned space exploration.3 

The  advocacy  of  human  spaceflight  as  a  key  expression  of  U.S.  leadership  that  I 
expressed  in  2007  is  even  stronger  today.  Leadership  should  not  be  underrated;  it 
is a commodity as important to security as any tank or gun. It is generated as much 
through soft power as through military might, and human spaceflight, especially co-
operative ventures, is a potent soft power tool. In my new book, I cite a quote from 
Retired  Air  Force  General  Pete  Worden,  now  Director  of  NASA’s  Ames’  Spaceflight 
Center. Worden believes that ‘‘space cooperation is already serving as ‘glue’ to forge 
coalitions  and  keep  people  working  together.  As  one  of  the  few  truly  global  media, 
space  capabilities  should  realize  their  full  potential  as  the  basis  for  ‘soft  power’  in-
fluence. This does not exclude economic competition among cooperating players—in-
deed  shared  interests  in  allowing  commercial  developments  are  a  foundational  ele-
ment of space soft power.’’ 4 

The United States has, unfortunately, lost its edge on engaging the world. A 2007 
public  opinion  poll  conducted  as  part  of  the  Pew  Global  Attitudes  Project  indicated 
that: ‘‘Anti-Americanism is extensive, as it has been for the past 5 years.’’ 5 The tim-
ing of that tumble from grace could not be worse. As the lone remaining superpower 
it  is  critical  that  if  the  United  States  must  be  seen  as  a  hegemon,  it  be  seen  as  a 
benevolent hegemon rather than a rogue hegemon. Unfortunately, the latter image, 
particularly  as  evoked  by  the  war  in  Iraq,  has  proved  hard  to  shake.  Manned 
spaceflight, especially cooperative programs, has consistently been an effective area 
for  the  United  States  to  generate  feelings  of  optimism  for  the  future,  goodwill  and 
leadership. 

Additionally,  when  NASA  was  created  in  1958,  part  of  the  motivation  was  to 
present  a  peaceful,  civilian  face  for  the  U.S.  space  program,  juxtaposed  to  the  mili-
taristic  face  of  the  Soviet  space  program.  In  contrast,  in  2008  much  of  the  world 
considers  military  space  efforts  as  the  focus  on  U.S.  space  activities,  efforts  poten-
tially  threatening  to  them,  coupled  with  a  perception  that  the  American  manned 
space effort is being bested by the Chinese. Therefore, we are currently at a critical 
junction in deciding whether the United States will continue to be considered as the 
leader  in  human  spaceflight  or  whether  we  will  deliberately  and  knowing  abrogate 
that role to others. 

A  September  2004  report  of  a  task  force  of  the  Defense  Science  Board,  a  pres-
tigious  board  of  high-level  advisors  to  the  Pentagon,  focuses  on  Strategic  Commu-
nication.6 Strategic communication is a critical part of soft power as it conveys mes-
sages of U.S. intent to the world. Let’s be clear: if the United States chooses to abro-
gate  its  leadership  role  in  human  spaceflight,  a  message  will  be  sent  and  received 
that will have strategic consequences for the United States beyond the space realm. 
It will be viewed as an indicator of an overall U.S. decline in its ability to lead. 

NASA  has  been  caught  between  a  rock  and  a  hard  place  since  2004.  Required  to 
meet unrealistic deadlines with insufficient budgets, it reconceptualized the 2004 Vi-
sion  in  ways  unsatisfying  to  some,  but  still  stretching  the  bounds  of  technology  de-

3 Johnson-Freese, Space as a Strategic Asset, 248. 
4 Dr. S. Pete Worden, private interview, 30 March 2008. Cited in: Joan Johnson-Freese, Heav-
enly  Ambitions:  Will  America  Dominate  Space?  (Philadelphia,  PA:  University  of  Pennsylvania 
Press) forthcoming 2009. 

5 Global Unease with Major World Powers, 27 June 2007, www.pewglobal.org. 
6 Report  of  the  Defense  Science  Board  Task  Force  on  Strategic  Communications,  September 

2004, 56. www.acq.osd.mil/dsb/reports/2004-09-StrategiclCommunication.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

velopment  and  its  own  organizational  capabilities  to  the  limit.  The  Constellation 
Program,  using  the  Ares  rocket  and  carrying  the  manned  Orion  spacecraft,  still 
seeks  to  return  a  crew  to  the  moon  by  2020,  or  earlier,  though  even  2020  seems 
like  a  long-shot.  Orion  won’t  be  ready  until  2016  if  everything  goes  perfectly  in  de-
velopment,  which  rarely  happens.  That  leaves  a  minimum  5–6  year  gap  in  U.S. 
human spaceflight capabilities, during which time the United States will be reliant 
on  other  countries,  particularly  Russia,  to  reach  the  ISS.  Recent  problems  with  the 
Russian  Soyuz  capsule  used  to  transport  people  back-and-forth  to  ISS  raises  con-
cerns  about  that  option  as  well.  Alternatively,  there  has  been  discussion  about  de-
velopment  of  a  private  commercial  spacecraft  that  could  taxi  cargo  and  crew  to  the 
International  Space  Station,  with  the  NASA  Commercial  Orbital  Transportation 
Service  (COTS)  program  seeking  to  encourage  investment  in  that  alternative.  That 
program,  however,  has  not  been  without  difficulties  and  even  a  successful  venture 
would  likely  not  be  ready  to  carry  cargo  for  at  least  2  years  and  crew  for  at  least 
four. 

During  this  gap  period  other  space  faring  nations  will  not  sit  idly  by,  waiting  for 
the  United  States  to  get  its  human  spaceflight  program  back  on  track.  A  recent 
meeting of the Russian Security Council focused on the future of Russian space ex-
ploration, as part of efforts to reinvigorate the country’s technological programs, out-
lining  the  developmental  possibilities  of  the  national  space  program  until  2020.  Ac-
cording  to  Sergei  Ivanov,  First  Deputy  Prime  Minister  and  head  of  Russia’s  mili-
tary-industrial  development,  all  aspects  of  space  activities  were  considered  sepa-
rately,  including  ‘‘manned  space  flights,  defense  security,  socio-economic  aspects  of 
space activities, scientific and all ground-based related infrastructure, including the 
forthcoming Vostochny (Eastern) spaceport.’’ 7 

Chinese  human  spaceflight  activities  have  taken  a  slow,  incremental  approach 
and still managed to create the perception that China is ‘‘beating’’ the U.S. in a new 
space race. While far from true, what China has that the U.S. does not is top-down 
political will. It is likely that China will launch more taikonauts into orbit next Fall, 
toward  fulfillment  of  their  official  three-part  program:  launching  taikonauts  into 
space,  which  was  accomplished  with  Shenzhou  V  and  VI;  a  space  laboratory;  and 
eventually  a  space  station.  While  there  are  also  reports  of  Chinese  intentions  to 
land  a  man  on  the  moon,  there  have  been  no  official  announced  plans  in  that  re-
gard.  Essential  to  Beijing’s  more  ambitious  plans  is  the  development  of  a  new 
heavy-lift launch vehicle, the Launch March 5. 

As  recently  as  March  2007,  Huang  Chunping,  Chief  Vehicle  Designer  for  Project 
921,  predicted  that  China  would  be  able  to  send  taikonauts  to  the  moon  within  15 
years.  Key,  however,  was  that  he  said  success  would  depend  on  Beijing  providing 
adequate funding and successful key precursor missions.8 There have been other re-
ports  as  well,  including  one  that  garnered  considerable  publicity.  Shortly  after 
NASA  announced  in  2005  that  it  would  put  a  man  on  the  moon  by  2018,9 Chinese 
space  official  Ouyang  Ziyuan  was  quoted  as  saying  ‘‘China  will  make  a  manned 
moon  landing  at  the  proper  time,  around  2017.’’ 10 Ouyang  Ziyuan  is  a  key  figure 
in  the  Chinese  robotic  lunar  mission,  Chang’e  (which  has  no  connection  to  the 
manned  program).  He  was  either  misquoted—a  problem  prevalent  in  sorting 
through  Chinese  space  intentions—simply  speaking  in  terms  of  desire  rather  than 
official  intent,  or  perhaps  just  goading  the  United  States.  Nevertheless,  his  state-
ment was widely reported in the United States, bolstering the perception of a space 
race  between  the  United  States  and  China,  with  China  winning.  While  U.S.  tech-
nology  and  capabilities  are  significantly  ahead  of  China’s  in  all  areas,  lack  of  polit-
ical will in the United States to support human spaceflight efforts to the level they 
need  to  be  for  milestones  to  be  successfully  reached  allows  for  the  misperception  to 
be perpetuated. 

European space plans are always constrained by resources and ability to find con-
sensus  among  all  its  key  players.  New  and  worrisome  from  Europe,  however,  is 
their increasingly prevalent concerns, and often suspicions, about U.S. intentions in 
space. An editorial run in The Times (London) after the release of new U.S. National 
Space  Policy  (NSP)  is  illustrative.  Entitled  ‘‘America  Wants  it  All—Life,  the  Uni-
verse,  and  Everything,’’ 11 it  stated  that  apparently  space  was  no  longer  the  final 
frontier,  but  the  51st  state  of  the  United  States.  The  editorial  went  on  to  say  that, 

7 The ISCIP Analyst, Volume XIV, No. 12, 24 April 2008. 
8 Reuters, ‘‘Moonshot possible in 15 years,’’ 6 March 2007. 
9 Guy Gugliotta, ‘‘NASA Unveils $104 Billion Plan To Return to the Moon by 2018 Spacecraft 

Draws on Apollo, Avoids Shuttle Foam Problem,’’ Washington Post, 20 September 2005, A03. 

10 Reuters, ‘‘China Eyes 2017 Moon Landing,’’ 4 November 2005. 
11 Bronwen  Maddox,  ‘‘America  Wants  it  All—Life,  the  Universe,  and  Everything,’’  http:// 

www.timesonline.co.uk/article/0,,30809-2410592,00.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

‘‘The new National Space Policy that President Bush has signed is comically propri-
etary in tone about the U.S.’s right to control access to the rest of the solar system.’’ 
That same newspaper ran an article entitled ‘‘Son of Star Wars takes out toxic sat-
ellite  with  $30M  space  attack’’  after  the  destruction  of  US–193  in  February  2008. 
While  not  challenging  U.S.  motives  explicitly,  the  article  cynically  stated  the  sat-
ellite’s  destruction  had  been  ‘‘broadcast’’  by  President  Bush  ‘‘as  a  safety  measure’’ 
and  ‘‘the  Pentagon  celebrated  its  $30  million  Star  Wars-style  interception  in 
space.’’ 12 

The  situation  currently  being  faced  is  far  from  ideal.  Quite  the  contrary  it  is  a 
mess. The United States has spent billions on a space station only to find itself un-
able  to  get  there  after  2010  without  paying  someone  else  for  a  ride,  and  having  a 
questionable  future  altogether  after  2016.  Untenable  dates  have  been  set  for  some-
times  competing  achievements,  without  sufficient  budgets  to  accomplish  one  let 
alone  more.  While  some  might  think  it  is  time  to  pull  the  plug  on  the  Vision,  I 
would suggest the price of doing so in terms of international prestige, with prestige 
defined  as  including  leadership  implications,  is  too  high.  America  needs  to  be  seen 
as  a  leader  into  the  future,  and  no  venture,  no  journey,  no  undertaking  represents 
the future more than human spaceflight. 

I  believe  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  should  be  reauthorized,  to  assure  the 
continuation of the U.S. human spaceflight program. That said, budgets are clearly 
insufficient  to  allow  programs  be  completed  within  the  current  timelines.  However, 
it  is  not  as  clear  that  more  money  would  assure  that  those  timelines  could  be  met. 
People,  institutions  and  technology  are  already  being  pushed  to  levels  that  could 
soon  result  in  a  rush  to  failure.  Further,  setting  deadlines  and  then  missing  dead-
lines does not generate confidence—especially for the country that said it was going 
to  land  a  man  on  the  moon  and  then  return  him  safely  to  Earth  within  the  decade 
in  the  1960s,  and  did  it.  The  difference,  however,  was  that  until  1967  the  Apollo 
budget was sufficient to achieve the goals that had been set. With Constellation that 
is  not  and  never  has  been  the  case.  Therefore,  consideration  should  be  given  to  re-
structuring  the  entire  program,  with  realistic  timelines  developed  toward  achieving 
multiple,  prioritized  goals  within  anticipated  budgets.  NASA  is  in  the  best  position 
to determine that prioritization, but it seems that narrowing the gap between Shut-
tle decommissioning and a follow-on system becoming operational ought to be a key 
consideration. 

As  part  of  a  restructuring,  I  encourage  the  consideration  of  opening  the  program 
to more international cooperation. The more countries that are involved, the less the 
perception  of  a  space  race  can  be  propagated.  While  there  are  significant  political 
and  technical  issues  potentially  involved  with  international  cooperation,  there  are 
several models of cooperation that could be employed, and the lessons learned from 
ISS can be invaluable. 

Finally,  I  return  to  the  importance  of  soft  power  and  having  countries  desire  to 
work  with  the  United  States  by  choice,  rather  than  because  of  its  military  might 
or coercion, and the proven ability of human spaceflight to both generate soft power 
and  bolster  its  image  as  a  global  leader.  In  May  1961,  after  the  Soviet  Union  had 
beat  the  United  States  into  space  and  established  leadership  in  space  exploration, 
President John F. Kennedy put together a message to Congress on ‘‘Urgent National 
Needs.’’ While the speech covered many issues, its major focus was on the space pro-
gram.  In  it  Kennedy  expressed  his  belief  that  a  manned  lunar  landing  before  the 
end  of  the  decade  should  be  the  principal  goal  of  the  American  space  effort.  He 
stressed  this  meant  a  long  and  costly  development  program  to  reestablish  the  Na-
tion’s  world  leadership  in  technology,  and  cautioned  that  ‘‘if  we  are  to  go  only  half-
way,  or  reduce  our  sights  in  the  face  of  difficulty  . . .  it  would  be  better  not  to  go 
at  all.’’ 13 It  was  a  call  for  the  United  States  to  wholeheartedly  commit  itself  to  a 
long-term objective requiring sustained effort, substantial cost, and determination to 
see  it  through  to  a  successful  conclusion.14 That,  in  my  opinion,  is  where  we  are 
again,  and  again  we  must  wholeheartedly  but  realistically  commit  to  achieving  our 
goals. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Dr. Johnson-Freese. 

12 Michael Evans and Jane McCartney, ‘‘Son of Star Wars takes out toxic satellite with $30m 

space attack,’’ The Times (London) 22 February 2008, 39. 

13 John  M.  Logsdon,  The  Decision  to  Go  to  the  Moon:  Project  Apollo  and  the  National  Interest 

(Cambridge Mass.: MIT Press, 1970), 127–128. 

14 history.nasa.gov/SP-4214/ch1-3.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Because  of  a  time  commitment  for  Senator  Vitter,  I’m  going  to 
interrupt  the  panel  here  so  that  Senator  Vitter  can  go  ahead  and 
ask a few questions. 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I—I  have  to  go 
to  a  swearing-in  of  a  new  Louisiana  colleague  on  the  House  side 
in  a  few  minutes,  but  I’ll  certainly  try  to  come  back.  But,  before 
I leave, I did want to get a couple of questions in. 

Mr.  Kranz,  first  of  all,  you  praised  the  plan,  which  I  assume  in-
cludes the architecture of Constellation. In our reauthorization bill, 
would  you  suggest  we  spend  any  time,  any  ink,  any  paper  looking 
back  and  re-examining  that,  even  briefly?  There  has  been  some 
suggestion  from  some  folks  that  we  should  consider  alternatives— 
again,  Jupiter  120  architecture.  Would  you  suggest  we  turn  back, 
however briefly, before we set forth on a new course? 

Mr. KRANZ. No, I’ve—I believe it’s important that we don’t waste 
too  much  time  looking  back.  You  know,  in  Mission  Control—go 
back to the Apollo 13. The basic objective of 13 was to get the crew 
on  the  track  back  home  with  what  we  thought  was  enough  re-
sources  to  get  the  job  done.  We  then  tuned  that  plan  as  we  went 
along. 

I have been personally a victim, and I think NASA has been vic-
tim, of so many studies that seem to be never-ending, that burn up 
the  resources,  delay  the  schedule,  disenchant  the  people  who  are 
executing  them.  I  believe  they’ve  had  very  good  visibility  on  the 
study,  and  basically  on  the  architecture.  These  graybeard  sessions 
we  had  weren’t  just  NASA  folks.  We  had—our  contractor  team 
comes  in,  we  had  leaders  from  Mercury,  Gemini,  and  Apollo.  This 
is, I think, a very well-seasoned plan. 

So,  I  would  suggest  that  the—again,  the  words  I  used,  ‘‘stay  the 
course,’’  and  prove  that  as  you  will  go  along,  because  you’re  going 
to have opportunities for improvement. But, I think, the basic plan 
is very sound, very well-founded. 

Senator VITTER. Great. Thank you. 
Second question, also for you, Mr. Kranz. Schedule pressure was 
cited as some contributing factor in both Challenger and Columbia, 
in terms of the accidents. Do you think there’s a danger of creating 
significant schedule pressure like that by having a hard Shuttle re-
tirement  date  of  September  30,  2010,  versus  a  policy  that  says 
these are the fights and the missions we’re going to do, we’re going 
to try to do them by 2010, but not as hard and firm a date? 

Mr. KRANZ. No, I went through the shutdown between the Gem-
ini  program,  where  we  had  to  move  into  Apollo.  I  never  felt,  and 
I  don’t  think  the  operators,  the  people  down  in  the  launch  pads, 
really  feel  any  pressure.  They  are—the  only  pressure  they  have  is 
that  which  they  put  on  themselves  to  do  the  job  as  safely  and  as 
professionally  as  human—possible.  I  don’t  think  any  operator—I 
mean, you can move this aside, you can talk about media, you can 
talk about, ‘‘Whatever you get, follow the budget right on the line,’’ 
but basically these people know their jobs. They’re professionals at 
getting the job done. And I was very proud of the way that we con-
cluded  the  Gemini  program,  right—moved  almost  directly  into  the 
Apollo  program—excuse  me—Apollo  program,  and  I’m  sure  that 
the teams in place right now at the Cape and at Houston will han-
dle this job very professionally. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

Senator VITTER. So, the hard date basically doesn’t bother you in 

that—— 

Mr. KRANZ. No. 
Senator VITTER.—sense. 
Mr. KRANZ. No. 
Senator VITTER. OK. 
And,  Ms.  Johnson-Freese,  do  you  think  our  dependence  on  the 
Russians  in  the  foreseeable  future  will  actually  lead  to  their 
leveraging that and affecting completely unrelated issues, in terms 
of our relationship? Or trying to affect those issues? 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Very  probably.  The  Russians  became  cap-
italists  very  quickly.  They  learned  how  to  negotiate  a  tough  deal 
very  quickly,  and  I  have  no  doubt  that  they  have  also  learned  the 
term  ‘‘spillover,’’  that  they  will  be  able  to  leverage  this  wherever 
they can. I see dependence on anybody as an undesirable situation. 
Senator VITTER. Right. Well, their being capitalists, I mean, goes 
to  the  cost,  and  that’s  a  big  problem,  in  my  mind,  that  we  don’t 
have  other  options,  and  so,  they,  to  some  extent,  can  name  the 
price. But, my question is specifically, would you expect them to le-
verage  it  beyond  dollars  into  policy  in  completely  unrelated  areas? 
Dr. JOHNSON-FREESE. I think they will try, Senator. I think they 

will certainly try. 

Senator VITTER. OK. 
Dr. JOHNSON-FREESE. Again, again, I’m not very confident about 
relations with the Russians in the near term, that we can count on 
them being friendly, as we’d like them to be. 

Senator VITTER. Right. 
Thank you very much, and I’ll certainly try to return, Mr. Chair-

man. Thanks for your leadership. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Senator Vitter. 
Indeed, if anybody questioned what might be the future difficulty 
of  the  United  States  in  dealing  with  the  Russians,  that  question 
ought  to  have  been  dispelled  when  we  saw  that  Vladimir  Putin 
made  a  decision  that  he  was  not  going  to  release  power.  In  fact, 
he’s  using  the  fig  leaf  of  the  Constitution  to  have  him  perpetuate 
his power. Some people call him the next tsar of Russia. From that 
position we know what happens to the accumulation of power. That 
power  is  not  only  focused  on  areas  of  taking  financial  advantage, 
but policy advantage, as well. 
Thanks for your questions. 
Dr. Tarantino? 

STATEMENT OF DR. FREDERICK A. TARANTINO, CEO AND 

PRESIDENT, UNIVERSITIES SPACE RESEARCH ASSOCIATION 
Dr.  TARANTINO.  Chairman  Nelson,  thank  you  for  the  invitation 

to this hearing. 

On  behalf  of  Universities  Space  Research  Association  and  our 

102 member universities—— 

I’m sorry? The light’s on, yes. Is this better? OK, thank you. 
Chairman  Nelson,  thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  this  hearing. 
On  behalf  of  Universities  Space  Research  Association  and  our  102 
member  universities,  we  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  here 
today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

USRA  was  formed  by  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  in  1969 
and  has  the  mission  of  advancing  space  related  science  and  tech-
nology. 

A  strong  space  program  is  essential  for  our  country,  and  univer-
sity  research  is  an  indispensable  part  of  that  success.  Universities 
develop  new  knowledge  crucial  for  our  understanding  of  space, 
they’re  a  source  of  innovation  needed  to  address  both  the  cost  of 
space  activities  and  approaches  for  new  challenges,  they  also  pre-
pare the people who are our future. 

I’ll focus on five items for the Committee to consider. 
First,  NASA  and  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  should  be  re-
authorized in a balanced manner that ensures a strong and healthy 
space science program. The renewed U.S. focus on both human and 
robotic exploration beyond low-Earth orbit frees NASA to carry out 
great  new  achievements,  to  explore  and  eventually  settle  the  solar 
system. It’s important that this program be authorized, recognizing 
that  science  and  exploration  are  linked.  Science  is  essential,  and 
recent  scaling  back  of  scientific  plans  should  be  reversed  so  the 
complete vision for our progress in space can be achieved. 

Second,  the  importance  of  universities  to  our  space  program 
should be made a stronger part of all NASA programs. The position 
America  has  in  science  and  technology  today  could  not  have  been 
achieved  without  robust  university  research.  The  environment  of 
academic  freedom  in  universities  generates  knowledge  unlike  any 
other. This is especially important in space, where we need to find 
new  innovation  to  address  high  costs  and  to  find  solutions  to  new 
problems.  Universities  are  also  the  only  source  of  the  new  highly 
trained  space  workforce  we  require.  University  research  should  be 
embedded  throughout  NASA’s  activities  in  science,  technology  for 
exploration, aeronautics, and operations. 

Third,  make  workforce  development  of  tomorrow’s  scientific  and 
engineering  leaders  a  part  of  NASA’s  mission.  The  America  COM-
PETES  Act  addresses  an  impending  crisis;  namely,  that  America 
can lose its technological advantage in the world, and, if that hap-
pens,  may  never  get  it  back.  This  will  have  a  profound  impact  in 
every aspect of our future. Responsibility for the preparation of the 
aerospace  workforce  should  be  a  part  of  NASA’s  reauthorization. 
This is a crisis in our country, and space must be a part of the so-
lution. 

Fourth,  assure  adequate  emphasis  is  placed  on  university-led 
missions  to  provide  hands-on  training  for  students.  Opportunities 
for  students  to  be  involved  in  hands-on  space  training  have  de-
clined  precipitously,  and  it’s  extremely  important  to  reverse  this. 
To  be  leaders  in  space,  we  must  have  the  best-trained  people.  In 
particular,  the  ability  of  a  Ph.D.  student  to  conceptualize  and  ex-
periment, design and build the hardware, launch it into space, col-
lect  data,  and  analyze  it  is  essential.  Without  these  experiences, 
our universities cannot produce the best scientists and engineers in 
the  world.  For  every  experimental  opportunity  that  results  in  a 
well-trained  Ph.D.,  there  are  several  master’s  research  opportuni-
ties  and  dozens  of  opportunities  for  undergraduates  to  be  involved 
in space experiments. 

A  recent  National  Academies  study  showed  that  our  current 
aerospace  workforce,  the  best  aerospace  workforce  in  the  world 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

that’s  now  facing  retirement,  benefited  from  seven  times  the  num-
ber  of  these  research  opportunities  when  they  were  on  campus,  30 
and 40 years ago, than are available today. USRA member institu-
tions passed a resolution at our annual meeting last month urging 
that  these  opportunities  be  increased  and  recommending  that 
NASA be required to spend at least 1 percent of its overall budget 
on  university-led  hands-on  programs.  From  our  estimates,  we  be-
lieve  this  is  a  doubling  of  present  activity,  and  it’s  desperately 
needed. 

We  also  want  to  express  support  for  the  potential  of  emerging 
commercial suborbital vehicles being developed to contribute in this 
area.  NASA  has  expressed  an  intent  to  establish  a  suborbital  sci-
entist  participant  pilot  program,  and  we  encourage  NASA  to  pur-
sue this. 

And, fifth, reimburse NASA for the cost of returning to flight. As 
you’ve  noted,  NASA  spent  more  than  $2  billion  implementing 
Space Shuttle safety improvements to help restore flight operations 
after  the  Columbia  accident.  The  funding  for  these  improvements 
came  at  the  expense  of  aeronautics,  science,  and  exploration  pro-
grams, and its restoration is urgently needed. 

So, in conclusion, NASA must be reauthorized with stronger uni-
versity  involvement  in  science  than  it  has  had  in  recent  years;  by 
including  universities  in  all  aspects  of  the  space  program,  will  de-
velop  properly  trained  people  for  the  future  and  produce  innova-
tions required for success. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  speak,  and  I  look  forward  to 

answering any questions you have. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Tarantino follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. FREDERICK A. TARANTINO, CEO AND PRESIDENT, 

UNIVERSITIES SPACE RESEARCH ASSOCIATION 

Chairman Nelson, Ranking Member Vitter, and Members of the Subcommittee, 
Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  before  you  on  the  reauthorization  of  NASA 
and  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  the 
Subcommittee with this university perspective. 

I  serve  as  CEO  and  President  of  the  Universities  Space  Research  Association 
(USRA), a consortium of universities deeply involved in our Nation’s space program. 
USRA  was  formed  by  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  in  1969,  at  the  height  of 
the Apollo program. We were given the mission of advancing space-related sciences 
and  technology  for  the  benefit  of  humankind.  We  are  now  entering  our  40th  anni-
versary year, as NASA completes its 50th. 

A strong space agency is critically important for our Nation. At their annual meet-
ing  on  March  20,  USRA  member  university  representatives  called  for  NASA  to  be 
reauthorized as the leader of the civil space program for the United States and pro-
vided  with  significantly  increased  funding  adequate  to  meet  its  responsibility  to 
carry out a balanced space program, including advancing knowledge in the scientific 
and technology disciplines related to space and aeronautics, as well as carrying out 
the enterprise of space exploration itself. They added that the NASA reauthorization 
should specifically acknowledge NASA’s support of universities as partners who gen-
erate new knowledge, make new discoveries in disciplines related to space and aero-
nautics, and train the specialized workforce needed to accomplish NASA’s missions. 
Citing  a  decades  long  decline  of  small  space  missions  that  allow  hands-on  train-
ing,  our  member  universities  unanimously  adopted  a  resolution  at  their  annual 
meeting urging that at least 1 percent of NASA’s total budget be devoted to funding 
competitive  opportunities  for  university-led  hands-on  training  provided  by  univer-
sity  missions  on  sounding  rockets,  high  altitude  balloons,  remotely  piloted  vehicles, 
emerging  commercial  suborbital  flights,  and  university  class  space  flight  missions. 
The  2007  and  2008  resolutions  of  USRA  member  university  representatives  are 

attached as Exhibit A. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

I  will  focus  my  testimony  on  five  key  recommendations  for  the  subcommittee  to 

consider in its reauthorization of NASA: 

sured balanced science program; 

and university research be made a part of all NASA programs; 

• First, that the Vision for Space Exploration be continued, in concert with an as-
• Second, that the importance of universities to our space program be recognized 
• Third, that workforce development providing tomorrow’s scientific and engineer-
• Fourth,  that  adequate  funding  be  devoted  to  suborbital  missions  that  provide 
• Fifth,  that  NASA  be  reimbursed,  through  supplemental  funding,  the  cost  of  re-

ing leaders be made a part of NASA’s mission; 

hands-on training; and 

turning the Space Shuttle to flight. 

Reauthorize  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration,  in  Concert  with  a  Balanced 

Space Science Program 

U.S. space exploration is awe inspiring to Americans and to people of other coun-
tries.  A  renewed  focus  by  the  U.S.  on  exploration  beyond  low-Earth  orbit,  both 
human and robotic, unfastens our space agency to carry out new great achievements 
for  our  Nation,  bring  new  scientific  investigation  of  our  solar  system,  and  draw 
young people into science and engineering studies. 

Space  is  strategic  for  many  nations,  and  we  are  in  the  midst  of  a  massive  inter-
nationalization  of  it.  In  2005,  China  became  the  third  nation  to  fly  a  human  in 
space.  European  Space  Agency  nations,  Japan,  China,  Russia,  and  India  are  all 
resourcing  and  planning  major  long-range  space  science  programs,  including  lunar 
and  planetary  missions.  China  is  developing  a  robotic  nuclear-powered  lunar  rover 
as  the  second  phase  of  their  lunar  program.  Japan  and  China  sent  probes  (Kaguya 
and Chang’e–1) to the moon in 2007, and India’s launch of Chadrayaan–1 is sched-
uled for 2008. While the U.S. scientific community is restricted in its foreign collabo-
rations  under  International  Traffic  in  Arms  Regulations  (ITAR),  ESA  is  collabo-
rating extensively with China, India, and Japan in their lunar explorations. A hesi-
tant approach to exploration will cede U.S. supremacy in space to other nations. 

Scientific  investigation  is  central  to  space  exploration,  and  technological  innova-
tion is key. The Vision for Space Exploration calls for sustained human and robotic 
exploration. Beginning this year, the U.S. is undertaking a series of robotic missions 
to the Moon that are designed to answer important scientific questions and prepare 
for and support future human exploration activities. The Vision calls for the conduct 
of  robotic  exploration  of  Mars  to  search  for  evidence  of  life,  to  understand  the  his-
tory  of  the  solar  system,  and  to  prepare  for  future  human  exploration  of  that  body. 
The  Vision  also  calls  for  the  conduct  of  robotic  exploration  across  the  solar  system, 
such as, exploration of Jupiter’s moons, asteroids and other bodies, and includes ad-
vanced telescope searches for planets around other stars. 

The  Roman  poet  Ennius  wrote,  ‘‘No  one  regards  what  is  before  his  feet;  we  all 
gaze at the stars.’’ Exploration of wondrous worlds beyond our planet fascinate and 
challenge  young  people  in  a  unique  way.  Apollo  drew  a  generation  into  careers  in 
science,  technology,  and  engineering.  Today,  middle  schools  all  over  the  country 
have  programs  building  robots  modeled  after  the  MER  rovers,  and  Hubble  images 
adorn  classrooms  and  bedroom  walls.  Exploration  of  the  Moon,  Mars,  and  other 
planets  is  a  magnet  that  attracts  young  people.  A  sustained  exploration  program 
can  and  will  help  our  country  reverse  the  decline  of  students  pursuing  science  and 
engineering careers. 

USRA asks the Subcommittee to reauthorize the Vision for Space Exploration, in 
all  of  its  aspects,  human  and  robotic,  guided  by  compelling  questions  of  scientific 
importance,  and  in  concert  with  a  balanced  science  program  across  all  the  dis-
ciplines encompassed by our space program. 
Include Universities in All Facets of Our Space Program 

Universities  have  benefited  greatly  from  our  Nation’s  space  program.  Research 
funding to universities by NASA over the past five decades spurred development of 
entire  academic  departments  and  brought  about  the  creation  of  new  institutes  and 
laboratories  at  universities  in  every  region  of  the  country.  This  is  made  apparent 
by the growth in USRA membership. USRA expanded from its original 47 members 
at  its  founding;  to  the  102  universities  today  that  have  qualified  for  membership. 
But  our  universities  are  more  than  beneficiaries.  They  are  enablers.  Without  our 
universities, we would not have the engineering and scientific workforce that powers 
every aspect of our space program. Without our universities, we would not have the 
innovation that brings about the technological breakthroughs that enabled our space 
agency  to  land  an  American  on  the  Moon  and  drive  robots  across  the  Martian  sur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

face. And without our universities, we would not have the scientific leaders and vi-
sionaries that put us at the front of the space race and kept America as the leader 
in space, through to this day. 

Without  our  research  universities,  we  would  not  be  here  today.  There  would  be 
no  NASA  to  reauthorize.  Universities  are  a  central  pillar  standing  up  our  space 
agency,  and  this  needs  to  be  recognized.  USRA  requests  the  Subcommittee  include 
in  its  reauthorization  of  NASA  direction  that  our  Nation’s  research  universities  be 
included  as  essential  partners  in  every  NASA  program  and  undertaking.  This  has 
been  the  history  of  the  agency,  it  is  its  only  future,  and  it  must  be  affirmed  and 
preserved. 

Universities  need  to  be  embedded,  not  only  in  every  NASA  science  program,  but 
also  throughout  NASA’s  technology  development  programs  and  operations.  Innova-
tion  born  from  our  universities  can  contribute  to  efficiencies  and  breakthroughs 
across  the  agency;  and  NASA  engagement  can  strengthen  our  universities,  prepare 
our  students  for  the  future,  and  foster  American  innovation.  The  mission  of  our 
space agency and the mission of our research universities form more than an inter-
section, they form a shared dependency. 

Given  the  importance  of  university  research  to  the  space  agency,  both  in  terms 
of  basic  scientific  research,  and  breakthrough  technology  innovations,  USRA  also 
asks the Subcommittee to consider in the reauthorization of NASA, inclusion of the 
agency  in  the  America  COMPETES  Act.  As  a  comprehensive  strategy  to  foster 
American  innovation,  NASA  must  be  included.  The  goals  of  the  Act,  strengthening 
scientific  research,  improving  technological  enterprise,  attracting  the  world’s  best 
and  brightest  workers,  and  providing  21st  century  job  training,  are  consistent  with 
work  of  NASA  and  the  university  community  that  is  a  part  of  our  space  program. 
Make  Workforce  Development  of  Tomorrow’s  Space  Leaders  a  NASA  Duty 
Should  education  and  workforce  development  be  part  of  NASA’s  mission?  These 
numbers answer the question for us: The U.S. aerospace and defense industry is los-
ing  an  estimated  27,000  employees  per  year,  and  the  average  age  of  NASA’s  work-
force of engineers and scientists is now 46. Twelve percent of NASA’s engineers and 
21  percent  of  its  scientists  are  now  eligible  to  retire.  Estimates  show  there  will  be 
a need for more than 1,000 new doctoral and masters graduates each year to replace 
key positions in the retiring NASA aerospace workforce. Without a supply of young-
er workers to assume future leadership roles as older workers retire, NASA is facing 
a looming workforce crisis. 

The Commission on the Future of the U.S. Aerospace Industry found in 2002 that, 
‘‘The  nation’s  apathy  toward  developing  a  scientifically  and  technologically  trained 
workforce  is  the  equivalent  of  intellectual  and  industrial  disarmament  and  is  a  di-
rect threat to our Nation’s capability to continue as a world leader.’’ 

In the international commercial sector, new European and Asian hybrid spectrum 
geostationary  communication  satellites  are  emerging.  These  feature  new  L-  and  S- 
band broadcasting with increased terrestrial bandwidth and allow mobile service ev-
erywhere—including  indoors—thus  avoiding  a  flaw  that  helped  drive  the  first  gen-
eration of commercial satellite services into bankruptcy. A half-dozen European na-
tions have sophisticated space workforces that compete with American firms for sat-
ellite  contracts  like  the  one  recently  let  by  S2M,  a  Dubai-based  startup  that  will 
provide mobile television/audio service across the Mideast and Africa. Japan, China, 
and  India  are  also  cultivating  large,  highly  capable  space  workforces.  Three  indige-
nous South Korean satellites are now in polar orbit and relaying images. Even Iran 
plans  to  put  its  own  satellites  in  orbit,  using  indigenous  launch  capability  now 
under development that unfortunately also serves as technology for long-range mis-
siles. 

The National Research Council’s Committee on Prospering in the Global Economy 
of the 21st Century: An Agenda for American Science and Technology wrote in their 
report,  Rising  Above  the  Gathering  Storm:  Energizing  and  Employing  America  for 
a  Brighter  Economic  Future,  ‘‘We  fear  the  abruptness  with  which  a  lead  in  science 
and  technology  can  be  lost—and  the  difficulty  of  recovering  a  lead  once  lost,  if  in-
deed it can be regained at all.’’ 

As  President  Dan  Mote  of  the  University  of  Maryland,  a  member  of  the  NRC 
Gathering Storm Committee, said at USRA’s annual meeting in March of this year, 
‘‘The  USRA  can  speak  to  what  is  needed  to  attract  the  best  and  brightest  young 
space scientists and engineers, such as the hands-on training provided by sounding 
rockets,  balloons,  and  other  small  missions.  These  space  professionals  are  going  to 
be  an  ever  more  crucial  component  of  the  U.S.  workforce,  security  and  prosperity 
going forward.’’ 

The environment is changing before us, and there is urgency to act now. A failure 
to  invest  in  today’s  students  and  young  professionals  will  seal  a  crisis  when  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

generation is expected to assume the mantle of leadership within the U.S. aerospace 
community.  USRA  asks  the  Subcommittee  to  make  clear  in  its  reauthorization  of 
NASA  that  education,  and,  in  particular,  preparing  tomorrow’s  leaders  in  science 
and technology, is a crucial duty of the agency. 
Assure Adequate Funding for Hands-On Training Opportunities 

The space workforce in the United States is the best in the world, largely because 
it  is  led  by  individuals  who  benefited  from  hands-on  training  with  actual  space 
projects during their university years. These were exciting years for a young person 
to  enter  space  research,  and  space  attracted  many  of  the  best  young  scientists  and 
engineers. These years were marked by frequent launches of smaller missions many 
of which were led by university-based teams that included graduate students. These 
students  got  plenty  of  hands-on  experience,  and  learned  first  hand  the  difficulties 
of designing and constructing an experiment or engineering system that would oper-
ate  reliably  in  space.  Many  students  also  learned  from  designing  and  building  ex-
periments for smaller, suborbital flights on rockets or balloons, or by observing with 
an airborne telescope. 

Today,  there  are  fewer  opportunities  at  our  Nation’s  research  universities  for  the 
next  generation  of  scientists  and  engineers  to  gain  the  hands-on  training  they  will 
need  to  succeed  in  aerospace  fields.  In  fact,  the  number  of  flight  opportunities 
through  which  university  students  can  build  hardware  and  analyze  related  space 
data  has  declined  steadily  over  the  last  two  decades.  Since  1970,  suborbital  experi-
mental launches have decreased eighty percent—from 270 launches per year to just 
50 planned launches this year. 

The  Commission  on  Implementation  of  United  States  Space  Exploration  Policy 
(Moon,  Mars  and  Beyond  Commission)  found  in  2004  that,  ‘‘At  present,  there  are 
insufficient  methods  for  students  to  acquire  hands-on  experience  in  the  scientific 
and technical disciplines necessary for space commerce and exploration.’’ 

This is a problem that impacts all space enterprise, large or small, civilian or mili-
tary,  government  or  commercial.  It  affects  our  ability  to  design  and  deploy  systems 
for space science missions, human space exploration, global climate prediction, com-
mercial ventures in space, and national security uses of space. All these enterprises 
require  space  engineers  able  to  design  and  construct  reliable  space  hardware,  and 
space scientists who understand the space environment and the rigors of conducting 
any activity, robotic or human, in space. 

The  decline  in  hands-on  training  opportunities  for  undergraduate,  masters  and 
doctoral  students  at  universities  must  be  reversed,  if  the  United  States  is  to  retain 
its  leadership  position  in  space.  NASA  must  address  this  problem  by  increasing  its 
investment in proven programs such as sounding rocket launches, aircraft-based re-
search, and high-altitude balloon campaigns, which provide opportunities for hands- 
on  flight  experience  at  a  relatively  low  cost  of  failure.  While  U.S.  investments  in 
suborbital  experimental  launches  are  declining,  China  and  other  countries  are  in-
creasing  their  investments  in  research  and  development  of  similar  projects  to  pro-
vide  future  generations  of  scientists  the  critical  training  skills  that  will  serve  as  a 
foundation for future research. 

Opportunities  for  tomorrow’s  scientists  and  engineers  can  be  provided  at  a  rel-
atively  low  cost.  The  average  research  payload  for  sounding  rocket  projects  range 
from  $200,000  to  $2.5  million.  The  average  cost  of  recent  sounding  rocket  payloads 
was  just  over  $1  million,  while  balloon  launch  payloads  range  in  cost  from  just 
$50,000  to  $1  million.  Launch,  labor  and  infrastructure  costs  involved  with  each 
payload launch adds additional costs that average $2 million. 

Airborne  research  programs,  such  as  the  Stratospheric  Observatory  for  Infrared 
Astronomy  (SOFIA),  also  provide  a  platform  on  which  instruments  can  be  carried 
that  enable  hands-on  training.  As  the  Nobel  Laureate  Professor  Charles  Townes 
wrote  in  2006,  ‘‘The  [SOFIA]  project  is  particularly  good  for  hands-on  training  of 
students  and  young  scientists.  They  can  fly,  operate  the  system,  go  to  the  ground 
to modify and improve the instrumentation, and then fly with it again.’’ 

USRA  asks  the  subcommittee  to  include  in  the  NASA  reauthorization  a  require-
ment  that  NASA  spend  at  least  1  percent  of  its  overall  budget  on  university-led 
hands-on  programs  such  as  sounding  rockets,  high-altitude  balloon  campaigns,  and 
airborne research. From our estimates, we believe this represents a doubling of cur-
rent funding levels for programs that provide hands-on research and training oppor-
tunities for our Nation’s undergraduate and graduate students in space-related dis-
ciplines.  By  increasing  NASA’s  investment  in  flight  opportunities  for  university  ex-
periments, we will double the number of students engaged in this research and en-
tering the space and engineering disciplines. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

A  white  paper  on  Educating  the  Next  Generation  of  Space  Scientists  and  Engi-
neers,  drafted  by  the  Issues  and  Program  Committee  of  USRA’s  member  univer-
sities, is attached as Exhibit B. 

The  National  Research  Council  Committee  on  Meeting  the  Workforce  Needs  for 
the National Vision for Space Exploration found in 2006 that, ‘‘NASA should expand 
and  enhance  agency-wide  training  and  mentorship  programs,  including  opportuni-
ties  for  developing  hands-on  experience,  for  its  most  vital  required  skill  sets,  such 
as  systems  engineering.’’  And  on  October  16  of  2007,  Senator  Ben  Cardin  of  Mary-
land,  in  a  colloquy  with  Senator  Barbara  Mikulski  of  Maryland,  cited  the  NRC  re-
port, and stated, ‘‘We know that some of NASA’s programs involving sounding rock-
ets, weather balloons, and small satellite launches are outstanding examples of wor-
thy  Federal  investment  that  not  only  produces  usable  scientific  data  but  provides 
outstanding  hands-on  learning  opportunities  for  the  next  generations  of  scientists 
and  engineers.  Our  investment  in  these  programs  has  not  kept  pace  with  demand, 
and  that  is  a  problem  we  may  want  to  address  in  future  years  as  we  consider  the 
NASA budget.’’ 

I also want to bring to the Subcommittee’s attention an exciting new way in which 
university-led  experiments  with  hands-on  training  could  be  boosted  by  NASA  in-
volvement.  Within  the  next  few  years,  suborbital  commercial  vehicles  being  devel-
oped by such companies as Virgin Galactic, XCOR Aerospace, Armadillo Aerospace, 
and  Blue  Origin,  will  provide  a  unique  way  to  engage  scientists  and  researchers. 
NASA has already taken the first step by issuing a Request for Information to help 
in the formulation of a Suborbital Scientist Participant Pilot Program. 

By providing the opportunity for researchers and even undergraduate students to 
fly  into  space  along  with  their  experiments,  not  only  can  new  experiments  be  con-
ducted, but the opportunity can inspire students to engage in the math, science, and 
engineering.  The  participatory  approach  of  the  personal  spaceflight  industry  means 
each  suborbital  launch  can  be  experienced  by  thousands  of  people,  with  young  peo-
ple  able  to  tune  in  and  watch  live  video  from  space  as  their  professors  and  fellow 
students  conduct  experiments  in  real-time  and  experience  weightlessness  and  the 
life-changing  view  of  the  Earth  from  space.  The  hands-on  experience  will  create  a 
new  generation  of  Principal  Investigators  who  will  be  prepared  to  lead  the  flagship 
science and human exploration missions, later in their careers. 

These  new  vehicles  will  provide  low-cost  access  to  the  space  environment  for  sci-
entific  experiments  and  research.  The  market  rate  for  these  services  has  already 
been  set  by  the  space  tourist  market  at  $100,000–$200,000  per  seat,  a  much  lower 
cost than existing sounding rockets. 

We  believe  the  commercial  potential  here  could  be  energized  by  the  participation 
of  our  space  agency.  USRA  requests  the  Subcommittee  authorize  NASA  to  follow 
through on the Request for Information by establishing the Suborbital Scientist Par-
ticipant  Pilot  Program  and  issuing  a  NASA  Research  Announcement  soliciting  in-
vestigations. This will create a university research payloads market for these emerg-
ing commercial operations, provide a new way for university researchers to conduct 
experiments  with  student  involvement  and  hands-on-training,  and  bring  the  in-
volvement of NASA, and its imprimatur, to an exciting new U.S. industry. 
Reimburse NASA for the Cost of Returning to Flight 

NASA  has  spent  more  than  $2  billion  in  the  past  few  years  implementing  space 
shuttle safety improvements to help restore flight operations after the Columbia ac-
cident.  The  funding  for  those  safety  improvements  came  at  the  expense  of  sus-
taining and expanding other programs for NASA in aeronautics, science, and explo-
ration. Last year, Congress almost provided $1 billion in supplemental NASA appro-
priations  to  help  the  agency  recoup  those  expenses  and  improve  funding  for  other 
agency  priorities.  We  hope  that  Congress  will  provide  this  supplemental  funding 
and such other money in FY09, as needed, to help NASA replenish funding stripped 
from a number of critical programs, including the Vision for Space Exploration. 
Conclusion 

The  first  Space  Act  was  passed  in  1958  and  signed  into  law  by  President  Eisen-
hower, a major legislative act of the 20th century. Today, space touches every aspect 
of  American  lives  and  is  growing.  Over  the  last  40  years  activities  in  space  have 
become integral parts of national defense, providing intelligence, early warning, me-
teorology,  communications,  protection  from  missile  attack,  positioning,  navigation 
and  timing  services.  Business  and  financial  transactions  use  both  space  voice  and 
data  communications.  Space-based  commercial  sensing  is  used  for  land-use  plan-
ning, emergency response, weather and environmental monitoring. The replacement 
for  our  outdated  air  traffic  control  system  will  be  space  based,  and  GPS  will  soon 
be  a  part  of  every  modern  transportation  system.  Scientific  discoveries  in  our  gal-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

axy,  of  our  solar  system  and  of  our  own  planet’s  changing  climate  are  exploding. 
Space  also  plays  a  huge  part  in  educating  future  generations—motivating  youth  to 
pursue science and technology careers. 

NASA must be reauthorized to make people and innovation one of its highest pri-
orities. American universities are the greatest leverage we have for affecting Amer-
ica’s future in space. They are the source of new knowledge and the training ground 
for the rock-star scientists and engineers that are our future. They are the fuel that 
powers better achievements in space, done faster and more cost effectively. 

I  ask  the  Subcommittee  to  consider  these  five  recommendations,  as  it  deliberates 
the  authorization  of  NASA’s  future  programs:  First,  that  NASA’s  new  Vision  for 
Space  Exploration  be  authorized  to  move  forward,  in  concert  with  an  assured  and 
balanced science program across the agency; second, that the importance of univer-
sities  be  recognized  and  university  research  be  made  a  part  of  all  NASA  programs; 
third,  that  workforce  development  focusing  on  tomorrow’s  leaders  be  made  a  part 
of NASA’s mission; fourth, that 1 percent of the NASA budget be devoted to univer-
sity-led missions to provide hands-on training; and fifth, that NASA be reimbursed, 
through supplemental funding, the cost of returning the Space Shuttle to flight. 

Thank you for this opportunity to appear before you today. I look forward to work-

ing with you and would be happy to answer any questions. 

EXHIBIT A 

Resolution of the Council of Institutions of the Universities Space Research 

Association 

We  being  the  members  of  the  Council  of  Institutions  (‘‘Council’’)  of  the  Univer-
sities Space Research Association (‘‘USRA’’), a nonprofit corporation organized under 
the laws of the District of Columbia, hereby adopt the following resolution: 

WHEREAS,  USRA  is  a  one  hundred  member  university  association  chartered, 
‘‘To  constitute  an  entity  in  and  by  means  of  which  universities  and  other  re-
search  organizations  may  cooperate  with  one  another,  with  the  Government  of 
the  United  States,  and  with  other  organizations  toward  the  development  of 
knowledge associated with space science and technology;’’ and 
WHEREAS,  the  research  and  teaching  faculty  of  the  member  universities  of 
USRA see firsthand the decline in workforce development for space science and 
engineering brought on by the diminishment of hands-on, low-cost flight oppor-
tunities involving students; and 
WHEREAS,  the  Commission  on  the  Future  of  the  U.S.  Aerospace  Industry 
found in 2002 that, ‘‘The nation’s apathy toward developing a scientifically and 
technologically trained workforce is the equivalent of intellectual and industrial 
disarmament  and  is  a  direct  threat  to  our  Nation’s  capability  to  continue  as  a 
world leader;’’ and 
WHEREAS,  the  Commission  on  Implementation  of  United  States  Space  Explo-
ration Policy found in 2004 that, ‘‘At present, there are insufficient methods for 
students  to  acquire  hands-on  experience  in  the  scientific  and  technical  dis-
ciplines necessary for space commerce and exploration;’’ and 
WHEREAS,  the  National  Academies  Committee  on  Meeting  the  Workforce 
Needs for the National Vision for Space Exploration found in 2006 that, ‘‘NASA 
should expand and enhance agency-wide training and mentorship programs, in-
cluding  opportunities  for  developing  hands-on  experience,  for  its  most  vital  re-
quired skill sets, such as systems engineering;’’ 
NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that the council supports the plan out-
lined  by  the  USRA  Issues  and  Program  Committee  to  provide  multiple  flight 
opportunities involving graduate and undergraduate students; and 
RESOLVED  FURTHER,  that  we  urge  the  U.S.  Government  and  others  to  im-
plement  and  facilitate  a  plan  to  provide  space  flight  opportunities  that  enable 
the hands on training for graduate and undergraduate students. 
IN  WITNESS  WHEREOF,  the  members  of  the  Council  have  adopted  this  reso-
lution at their meeting of March 30, 2007. 

UNIVERSITIES SPACE RESEARCH ASSOCIATION, 
W. JEFFREY HUGHES, 

Chair, Council of Institutions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Resolution of the Council of Institutions of the Universities Space Research 

Association 

We  being  the  members  of  the  Council  of  Institutions  (‘‘Council’’)  of  the  Univer-
sities Space Research Association (‘‘USRA’’), a nonprofit corporation organized under 
the laws of the District of Columbia, hereby adopt the following resolution: 

WHEREAS,  USRA  is  an  association  of  102  universities,  including  8  inter-
national  universities,  chartered,  ‘‘To  constitute  an  entity  in  and  by  means  of 
which universities and other research organizations may cooperate with one an-
other, with the Government of the United States, and with other organizations 
toward  the  development  of  knowledge  associated  with  space  science  and  tech-
nology;’’ and 
WHEREAS  a  strong  and  inspiring  NASA  is  critically  important  for  our  nation; 
and 
WHEREAS  research  universities  are  extremely  important  engines  of  techno-
logical  innovation  in  the  United  States  and  play  vital  roles  in  preparing  the 
next generation of space researchers and professionals, as well as in developing 
and executing the space missions that help shape a positive, peaceful vision for 
all  nations  and  give  our  country  a  competitive  edge  in  a  world  that  is  increas-
ingly dependent on space technology; and 
WHEREAS  the  space  workforce  in  the  United  States  has  been  led  by  individ-
uals  who  have  had  the  benefit  of  hands-on  training  with  actual  space  projects 
during  their  university  years,  and  whereas  the  number  of  these  crucial  hands- 
on  training  opportunities  at  universities  has  been  declining  for  decades,  and 
that trend must be reversed if the United States is to retain its leadership posi-
tion in space; and 
WHEREAS future space research and exploration will be enhanced by the sub-
stantial and growing technological capabilities of nations other than the United 
States,  and  whereas  for  economic,  scientific,  and  foreign  policy  reasons,  it  is 
vital  that  barriers  to  international  collaborations  by  U.S.  as  well  as  other  uni-
versities be reduced; 
NOW  THEREFORE  BE  IT  RESOLVED,  that  NASA  should  be  reauthorized  as 
the  leader  of  the  civil  space  program  for  the  United  States  and  provided  with 
significantly  increased  funding  adequate  to  meet  its  responsibility  to  carry  out 
a  balanced  space  program,  including  advancing  knowledge  in  the  scientific  and 
technology  disciplines  related  to  space  and  aeronautics,  as  well  as  carrying  out 
the enterprise of space exploration itself; and 
RESOLVED  FURTHER,  that  the  NASA  reauthorization  should  specifically  ac-
knowledge NASA’s support of universities as partners who generate new knowl-
edge, make new discoveries in disciplines related to space and aeronautics, and 
train the specialized workforce needed to accomplish NASA’s missions; and 
RESOLVED FURTHER, that NASA budgets should reflect the historical prece-
dent that at least 1 percent of NASA’s total budget be devoted to funding com-
petitive  opportunities  for  hands-on  training  provided  by  university  missions  on 
sounding  rockets,  high  altitude  balloons,  remotely  piloted  vehicles,  emerging 
commercial suborbital flights, and university class space flight missions; and 
RESOLVED  FURTHER,  that  the  fundamental  research  exclusion  in  the  Inter-
national  Traffic  in  Arms  Regulations  should  be  extended  to  U.S.  aerospace 
firms,  Federal  laboratories,  and  non-profit  organizations  when  they  are  inter-
acting  with  universities  in  pursuit  of  fundamental  space  research  and  on  uni-
versity space experiment hardware. 

IN  WITNESS  WHEREOF,  the  members  of  the  Council  have  adopted  this  resolu-

tion at their meeting of March 28, 2008. 

UNIVERSITIES SPACE RESEARCH ASSOCIATION, 
EDWARD J. GROTH, 

Chair, Council of Institutions. 

EXHIBIT B 

Educating the Next Generation of Space Scientists and Engineers 

‘‘Our  policymakers  need  to  acknowledge  that  the  Nation’s  apathy  toward  devel-
oping a scientifically and technologically trained workforce is the equivalent of intel-
lectual and industrial disarmament and is a direct threat to our Nation’s capability 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

to continue as a world leader.’’ (The Report of the Commission on the Future of the 
U.S. Aerospace Industry, November 2002) 

‘‘At present, there are insufficient methods for students to acquire hands-on experi-
ence  in  the  scientific  and  technical  disciplines  necessary  for  space  commerce  and  ex-
ploration.’’ (Commission on Implementation of United States Space Exploration Pol-
icy (the Aldridge Report), June 2004) 

There is a significant deficit of scientists and engineers in the United States with 
meaningful  hands-on  experience  with  space  instrumentation  and  space  systems, 
which  is  jeopardizing  the  ability  of  the  Nation  to  maintain  a  vigorous  presence  in 
space  into  the  future,  regardless  of  whether  we  are  in  space  for  reasons  of  com-
merce,  exploration,  national  defense,  or  scientific  research.  This  deficit  leads  not 
only to a loss of capability, but also to escalating costs of many of the space systems 
vital to the Nation’s security and industrial competitiveness. 

Space  scientists  and  engineers  are  trained  at  universities,  particularly  in  the 
science  and  engineering  graduate  programs  of  those  research  universities  active  in 
space research. To attract good students into these fields requires sufficient funding 
for  graduate  stipends  from  either  research  projects  or  graduate  fellowships,  and 
projects or research opportunities that excite students so that they choose space re-
search over other possible areas. These projects or research opportunities must also 
provide the students with the range of experiences they need to become fully trained 
scientists and engineers. 

The  scientists  and  engineers  who  learned  their  trades  during  the  first  decades  of 
the  space  age  have  reached  or  are  nearing  retirement.  These  were  exciting  years 
for  a  young  person  to  enter  space  research,  and  space  attracted  many  of  the  best 
young  scientists  and  engineers.  These  years  were  marked  by  frequent  launches  of 
smaller  missions  many  of  which  were  led  by  university-based  teams  that  included 
graduate  students.  These  students  got  plenty  of  hands-on  experience,  and  learned 
first  hand  the  difficulties  of  designing  and  constructing  an  experiment  or  engineer-
ing  system  that  would  operate  reliably  in  space.  Many  students  also  learned  from 
designing and building experiments for smaller, suborbital flights on rockets or bal-
loons, or by observing with an airborne telescope. 

The  chart  shows  that  the  number  of  these  opportunities  peaked  in  1968,  at  the 
height  of  the  Apollo  program.  Since  then  the  number  of  student  opportunities  pro-
vided by spacecraft missions, rocket and balloon fights and airborne observatory sor-
ties  has  diminished  from  over  250  per  year  to  consistently  less  than  50  per  year. 
Most  graduate  students  now  never  have  an  opportunity  to  do  hands-on  science.  In-
stead the vast majority of science PhD students analyze data obtained from instru-
ments  they  have  never  seen  and  thus  have  only  a  vague  idea  of  how  they  work  or 
how they might malfunction. They certainly don’t learn the important skills needed 
to conceive of, and to help design and construct a space experiment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
N
A
R
A
T
7
0
5

29 

The  chart  hides  another  phenomenon.  As  space  missions  have,  necessarily,  be-
come  more  complex,  they  also  take  longer  to  design  and  construct.  The  increasing 
complexity  means  that  fewer  universities  have  the  resources  and  capabilities  of 
managing  the  complexity,  so  increasingly  missions  are  being  run  by  non-academic 
laboratories and research centers. The mission time scale is now significantly longer 
than a typical graduate student remains in school. Both of these effects significantly 
decrease  the  likelihood  of  graduate  student  involvement,  exacerbating  the  problem. 
This is a national problem. It affects not only space science, but also human space 
exploration,  global  climate  prediction,  commercial  ventures  in  space,  and  national 
security  uses  of  space.  All  these  enterprises  require  space  engineers  able  to  design 
and  construct  reliable  space  hardware,  and  space  scientists  who  understand  the 
space  environment  and  the  rigors  of  conducting  any  activity,  robotic  or  human,  in 
space. 
What Needs to Be Done? 

These critical needs are addressed by a proposed hands-on, rapid cycle flight pro-
gram  of  moderate  risk  that  focuses  on  inexpensive  system  development  for  sub-
orbital  and  orbital  applications.  This  program  should  provide  multiple  flight  oppor-
tunities involving graduate and undergraduate students from science and engineer-
ing disciplines, and should provide the excitement of discovery to attract those who 
will become leaders of the future U.S. space enterprise. The program should permit 
a four-fold increase of hands-on experiences over present levels to return to the peak 
levels  of  the  60s  and  70s.  The  proposed  level  of  activity  should  allow  an  average 
of two launches per month or more. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
And all of your written statements will be printed as part of the 

record, as well. 

General Dickman? 

STATEMENT OF MAJOR GENERAL ROBERT S. DICKMAN (RET.), 

U.S. AIR FORCE, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, AMERICAN 

INSTITUTE OF AERONAUTICS AND ASTRONAUTICS (AIAA) 
General DICKMAN. Good morning, Mr. Chairman, and thank you 

for inviting me to testify in this important reauthorization. 

I’d  like  to  thank  all  the  Members  of  Congress,  in  fact,  and  their 
staffs,  for  taking  the  time  to  meet  with  AIAA  members  during  our 
Annual  Congressional  Visits  Day.  We  come  to  Congress  every 
April,  and,  as  was  the  case  with  you  just  a  few  weeks  ago,  we’ve 
been  welcomed  with  hospitality  and  a  willingness  to  engage  our 
members in open and honest dialogue. 

Thank you for including my written statement. I will try to keep 

my remarks very brief. 

As  the  Executive  Director  of  the  American  Institute  of  Aero-
nautics and Astronautics, I represent a constituency of over 35,000 
aerospace professionals and students. We’re located in all 50 states 
and 89 countries internationally. 

During  my  tenure  as  Executive  Director,  I’ve  heard  countless 
members at our technical conferences and other venues voice their 
concerns  about  the  fiscal  health  and  the  future  of  NASA  and  the 
impact  on  our  Nation.  As  you’ve  noted,  if  NASA  were  funded  at  1 
percent  of  our  budget,  rather  than  the  fraction  of  1  percent  that 
has been requested, they’d still be terribly stretched. 

We,  as  a  Nation,  are  not  doing  the  work  we  should  be  doing  in 
basic  aeronautical  research  and  development,  we’re  not  doing  the 
right  things  for  life  sciences  and  physical  sciences,  we’re  not  doing 
the  right  things  for  education,  as  you  heard  from  Dr.  Tarantino, 
we’re not doing the right things for space sciences, we’re not doing 
the  right  things  for  solar  science;  and,  and  perhaps  more  impor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

tant,  because  93  percent  of  NASA’s  budget  goes  to  human 
spaceflight and exploration, we will not execute the program that’s 
included in that vision with the budgets that have been requested. 
NASA  is  too  important  to  this  country  to  be  allowed  to  continue 
to atrophy. It’s too important to our youth, it’s too important to our 
education,  to  our  overall  technical  strength,  to  our  long-term  eco-
nomic  growth,  and,  as  you  well  know,  Mr.  Chairman,  from  your 
service on the Armed Services Committee, to our national security, 
as  well,  and  to  the  many  things  that  are  more  directly  related  to 
the mission of that agency. 

I’ve identified, in a short list, the areas that I believe are at risk. 
I am not suggesting that NASA funds be reallocated to these areas 
at the expense of something within their budget. I’m a strong sup-
porter  of  human  exploration.  It  is  among  the  most  important  en-
deavors  that  humankind  has  ever  undertaken.  Instead,  I  believe 
that  the  NASA  top  line  must  go  up  to  be  a  level  consistent  with 
NASA’s  importance  to  this  Nation,  to  our  economic  strength,  our 
national  security,  and  the  future  of  mankind.  The  question  is  not 
whether  we,  as  a  Nation,  can  afford  more  funding  for  NASA,  it’s 
whether we’re willing to invest in our own future. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  share  my  views 
and  those  of  the  American  Institute  of  Aeronautics  and  Astronau-
tics on this enormously important legislation, and we thank you for 
all  that  you  do  for  this  Nation.  I  welcome  the  opportunity  to  an-
swer any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Major General Dickman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MAJOR GENERAL ROBERT S.  DICKMAN (RET.), 
U.S. AIR FORCE, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, AMERICAN INSTITUTE OF AERONAUTICS AND 
ASTRONAUTICS (AIAA) 
Good  Morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee.  I  am  Major  Gen-
eral  (USAF-Ret.)  Robert  Dickman,  Executive  Director  of  the  American  Institute  of 
Aeronautics  and  Astronautics  (AIAA).  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  on  this 
important  issue.  I  would  also  like  to  thank  all  the  Members  of  Congress  and  their 
staff  for  taking  the  time  to  meet  with  AIAA  members  during  our  annual  Congres-
sional  Visits  Day.  We  come  to  Congress  every  year  in  April  and  consistently  have 
been  welcomed  with  hospitality  and  a  willingness  to  engage  our  members  in  open 
and thoughtful dialogue about important issues. 

As  Executive  Director  of  the  American  Institute  of  Aeronautics  and  Astronautics, 
I  represent  a  constituency  of  over  35,000  aerospace  professionals  and  students,  lo-
cated in all fifty states and 89 countries internationally. During my tenure as Exec-
utive  Director,  I  have  heard  many  members  at  our  technical  conferences  and  other 
venues voice their concerns about the fiscal health and future viability of NASA. 

At  a  funding  level  of  only  a  fraction  of  a  percent  of  the  annual  Federal  budget, 
NASA is being systematically starved. NASA is being forced to eliminate or severely 
reduce  some  very  important  work,  to  the  detriment  of  critical  aerospace  research 
and development, and more broadly to the detriment of our aerospace strength and 
our  industrial  base.  The  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  was  an  aggressive,  forward- 
looking proposal when offered by the President and endorsed by the Congress. How-
ever, while NASA has undertaken a positive exploration agenda, funding levels have 
not  been  at  all  sufficient  to  meet  those  goals.  Thus,  in  order  to  come  even  close  to 
meeting  the  requirements  for  the  Constellation  program,  NASA  has  been  forced  to 
cut  funds  from  other  programs,  programs  that  have  been  at  the  core  of  American 
excellence in aerospace for half a century. 

For  example,  research  cuts  since  2003  have  reduced  fundamental  space-related 
life  science  and  physical  science  research  programs  by  85  percent,  affecting  over 
1,700  scientists  and  nearly  3,000  students.  NASA  is  the  sole  steward  of  this  re-
search. If NASA doesn’t do it, it won’t get done—at least not in this country. At the 
same time, China, Japan and other nations are continuing robust research in these 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

areas, and those countries are poised to assume the scientific and technological lead-
ership that we are letting slip away. 

31 

Furthermore, the Federal aeronautics budget reflects NASA’s need to focus its re-
sources  on  other  priorities.  In  1994  NASA’s  aeronautics  budget  was  $1.54  billion. 
By  FY07  the  aeronautics  budget  was  cut  to  $594  million.  The  FY09  budget  reflects 
further cuts at $447 million. With less than a third of its prior budget in this area, 
critical needs are going unmet. 

It  is  AIAA’s  position  that  stable,  robust,  long-term  Federal  civil  aeronautics  re-
search and technology initiatives funded at the level that will assure U.S. leadership 
are critical to sustaining a strong national economy, maintaining a skilled workforce 
and  ensuring  our  national  security.  NASA  must  continue  to  have  a  leadership  role 
in this effort. The Administration has approved a policy on aeronautics research and 
an  implementation  plan  to  achieve  the  stated  goals.  These  were  drafted  with  the 
collaboration  of  the  best  talent  from  academia,  industry  and  government.  However, 
if  we  cannot  execute  these  programs,  and  continue  to  lose  our  advantage  in  the 
basic understanding of aeronautics that has allowed us to develop the world’s finest 
commercial and military aircraft for the past 60 years, it will be the result of inad-
equate funding, not the absence of a well thought out plan. 

Turning  from  aeronautics  to  space,  our  domestic  space  transportation  capability 
is  achieved  using  a  very  limited  number  of  vehicle  types.  Launch  vehicle  reliability 
has improved in recent decades, but the cost of space access remains very high, even 
with  the  Evolved  Expendable  Launch  Vehicles.  Operational  constraints  and  the 
price of these vehicles limit incentives and opportunities for expansion of space oper-
ations,  in-orbit  capabilities,  and  space  commercialization.  Meanwhile,  government 
investment in advanced launch concepts and associated technology that could make 
space  access  significantly  more  robust  has  dropped  to  nearly  zero,  as  we  focus  our 
attention on the near-term needs of exploration and assured access to space. Absent 
investment in the truly breakthrough science and technology that would lead to rev-
olutionary  changes  in  space  transportation,  U.S.  access  to  space  in  2040  will  not 
look significantly different from 2020, or 2000, or 1980. 

This  is  not  a  new  problem.  Our  government-funded  launch  systems  are  based  on 
most  of  the  same  principles  and  technologies  as  the  rockets  that  launched  Sputnik 
or  Apollo  or  the  Shuttle  in  1981.  A  little  over  50  years  after  the  Wright  Brothers’ 
first flight, the jet-powered passenger aircraft that became the 707 was being tested. 
By  way  of  comparison,  fifty  years  after  the  first  Delta  rocket  put  the  Echo  satellite 
into orbit, the Delta II is still the most used American launch vehicle. We have been 
evolving  the  technology  of  the  1950s  ballistic  missile  programs  for  half  a  century. 
Without  investment  in  basic  science  and  technology,  that’s  what  we  will  be  doing 
for  the  next  half  century.  We’ve  already  lost  almost  the  entire  commercial  space 
launch  market—a  market  that  was  once  100  percent  based  in  the  United  States. 
If  we  are  still  flying  legacy-based  rockets  thirty  years  from  now,  our  only  payloads 
will be from the government. Anyone with a choice will have gone overseas. 

Space  transportation  is  the  key  to  our  future  role  as  a  space-faring  nation.  We 
can  regain  our  leadership  role  if  we  apply  our  technical  strength  to  the  problem, 
but it will not happen without significantly increased NASA investment. 

Human spaceflight is an inspiring manifestation of our species’ urge to reach and 
explore  new  destinations,  which  also  enables  discovering  much  about  how  we  came 
to  be  and  what  might  be  our  future.  The  U.S.  has  been  a  leader  in  this  endeavor 
from  the  beginning.  This  has  led  to  advances  in  our  educational  system,  it  has  in-
spired  some  of  our  youth  into  advanced  technology  careers,  and  it  has  showed  the 
world how U.S. aerospace prowess can benefit all of humanity. 

There  are  some  who  would  draw  a  distinction  between  education,  the  quality  of 
our  technical  workforce,  and  programs  such  as  NASA’s.  However,  the  economic 
growth of this country in the latter half of the last century demonstrates the fallacy 
in  that  thinking.  It  would  be  difficult  to  find  any  significant  growth  sector  that 
didn’t  benefit,  directly  or  indirectly,  from  the  emphasis  this  country  placed  on  sci-
entific and technical skills in the early days of the space age. NASA’s programs in-
spired  generations  of  young  people  to  study  what  today  we  call  STEM—science, 
technology,  engineering  and  mathematics.  Government  programs  provided  scholar-
ships,  loans  and  funding  for  university  and  industrial  research  programs  that  were 
the  incubators  not  only  for  technology,  but  also  for  technologists,  the  scientists  and 
engineers  that  make  it  all  happen.  Without  NASA,  this  country  would  be  a  very, 
very  different  place  now.  Looking  ahead,  though,  continued  U.S.  leadership  in 
human  spaceflight  is  clearly  threatened.  I  am  not  concerned  that  other  nations  are 
launching  humans  to  space,  anymore  than  I  am  concerned  that  other  nations  can 
launch  satellites  to  space.  It  is  a  natural  evolution  of  an  exciting  endeavor.  What 
I am concerned about is that NASA is so under-funded that virtually every area in 
aeronautics and astronautics is at serious risk. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

In  human  spaceflight  we  expect  at  least  a  four-year  gap  between  retirement  of 
the Space Shuttle and the first piloted flight of the Crew Exploration Vehicle (CEV). 
Current  plans  are  to  rely  on  Russian  systems  for  crew  rotation  in  the  interim.  Use 
of the CEV to provide crew rotation for the International Space Station (ISS) is not 
projected  after  2017,  jeopardizing  the  opportunity  to  reach  the  full  benefit  of  this 
unique  research  facility.  There  are  alternatives  to  the  Ares-Orion  for  access  to  the 
ISS, including commercial and government approaches. However, none will be avail-
able  without  additional  funding.  Meanwhile,  other  nations  are  not  standing  still. 
Other countries are working vigorously to develop and/or expand a human presence 
in Earth orbit, on the moon, and beyond, with the clear potential to eclipse the U.S. 
leadership  status  in  this  area  of  human  achievement  and  economic  opportunity.  In 
this  case,  the  issue  isn’t  whether  we  have  the  systems  to  sustain  U.S.  access  to 
space and continue use of ISS once the Shuttle is retired; it is a matter of funding. 
In 2003, there were over 1,000 research projects focusing on basic non-exploration 
space  physical  and  life  sciences  across  the  United  States,  which  supported  over 
1,500  scientists,  and  over  3,000  students.  Today,  only  5  years  later,  there  are  85 
such  research  projects,  supporting  approximately  300  students.  This  is  a  decrease 
of 90 percent. NASA is justifiably fond of speaking of the current crop of researchers 
who were motivated to pursue careers in space-related research by their fascination 
with  the  Mercury,  Gemini  and  Apollo  programs  that  culminated  in  landing  astro-
nauts  on  the  moon.  But  with  the  absence  of  NASA-oriented  research  programs  in 
our universities, where will the next generation of these researchers come from? 

Before leaving the area of the science programs, I want to applaud Administrator 
Griffin for several decisions he’s made to keep very capable scientific satellites func-
tioning.  Obviously,  the  decision  to  do  the  Hubble  repair  mission  was  the  most  ex-
pensive  and  probably  most  difficult  choice.  However,  Dr.  Griffin  has  also  sustained 
operating funds for the Mars Rovers and other satellites. I spent most of my profes-
sional life engaged in activities related to the development, launch and operation of 
satellites.  The  idea  of  turning  off  a  perfectly  good  spacecraft  that  may  have  cost 
hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  to  build  and  launch,  has  gotten  past  the  incredibly 
dangerous  trip  to  space  and  initial  deployment  and  can  still  perform  a  useful  mis-
sion even when past its intended life in order to save a comparatively small annual 
operational  cost  simply  makes  no  sense.  The  fleet  of  spacecraft  NASA  is  operating 
to  look  at  our  planet,  our  solar  system  and  the  universe  beyond  is  unprecedented 
and  truly  remarkable.  NASA  deserves  nothing  but  compliments  for  fielding  them— 
and for continuing to operate them. 

I’d like to say a bit more about education. AIAA has worked to advance the state 
of  aerospace  science,  engineering,  and  technical  leadership  for  over  75  years.  As 
such,  we  are  keenly  aware  of  the  difficulty  facing  our  industry  with  respect  to  at-
tracting  and  maintaining  a  competitive  workforce.  Addressing  this  looming  crisis  is 
a major priority for our Institute. 

The Report of the National Academies, ‘‘Rising Above the Gathering Storm’’ done 
at the request of the Congress, documented the problem of the weakness of Science, 
Technology,  Engineering  and  Mathematics  in  our  educational  system  and  in  the 
areas  of  interest  in  our  young  people  far  better  than  anything  I  could  say.  The 
America COMPETES Act is an excellent step—but it is just a step. The more recent 
‘‘Is  America  Falling  Off  the  Flat  Earth?’’  by  Norm  Augustine  reminds  us  that  no 
nation  has  an  inherent  right  to  greatness.  Generations  of  Americans  worked  to 
achieve our greatness, and generations must work equally hard to sustain it. What 
has this got to do with NASA? Everything! 

The  technical  cohort  that  came  into  the  American  workforce  during  the  Apollo 
era,  not  the  people  that  built  Apollo,  but  the  scientists  and  engineers  who  were  in-
spired  during  that  era,  are  leaving  the  workforce,  without  sufficient  replacements 
in  the  pipeline.  While  NASA  is  certainly  not  the  sole  source  of  funding  for  tech-
nology, it provides without doubt the most visible motivation for young people to de-
cide to study STEM-related subjects. 

Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and  Math  education  in  our  Nation’s  classrooms 
provides the critical foundation needed for our future national security and economic 
competitiveness. However, we are too quick to consider these as interchangeable dis-
ciplines,  and  assume  the  traditional  curricula  in  mathematics  and  science  will  pro-
vide understanding about technology and engineering. 

To oversimplify, a scientist wants to know something that hasn’t been known; an 
engineer want to build something that hasn’t been built, wants to satisfy a societal 
need.  The  scientific  mind  will  tell  you  that  in  your  kitchen  there  is  sodium  chlo-
ride—salt—and  lots  of  other  compounds.  It  will  tell  you  that  things  melt  or  boil 
when heated, that eggs come from chickens, and so forth. But it takes an engineer-
ing  mind  to  address  the  societal  need  of  producing  a  meal—of  translating  scientific 
knowledge into a useful product. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

It  is  important  that  NASA  funds  research.  So  does  the  National  Science  Founda-
tion.  It  is  enormously  important  that  NASA  be  able  to  take  that  research  and  de-
velop  useful  things  from  it  and  provide  the  information  for  others  to  do  the  same. 
The list of useful things that have been derived from the space program is too long 
to  be  repeated  here,  since  NASA  research  has  led  to  more  than  6,000  patents.  My 
point  is  simply  that  increased  emphasis  and  funding  must  be  directed  to  the  Tech-
nology and Engineering components of STEM if the Nation is to reap the full bene-
fits  of  STEM  spending.  In  particular,  STEM  legislation  should  provide  strong  sup-
port  for  Technology  and  Engineering  education  at  all  levels  from  kindergarten 
through  university.  NASA  can  and  must  play  a  central  role  in  this  effort,  just  as 
it is important that the America COMPETES Act of 2007 be fully funded. 

To  summarize,  I  will  repeat  my  comments  reported  in  the  April  28  edition  of 

Space News: 

‘‘NASA is more than stretched, they are just terribly under-funded. Rather than 
being  funded  at  a  fraction  of  a  percent  (of  the  Federal  Budget),  if  they  were 
funded at 1 percent of the budget, they’d still be stretched. 
• We are not doing the work we should be doing in basic aeronautical research 

and development. 

• We are not doing the right kinds of things for education. 
• We are not doing the right kinds of things for life sciences. 
• We are not doing the right kinds of things for space sciences. 
• We are not doing the right kinds of things for solar science. 
• And  we  are  not  going  to  be  able  to  succeed  at  the  exploration  program  with 

the budget we’ve got.’’ 

NASA  is  too  important  to  this  nation—to  our  education,  to  our  overall  technical 
strength,  to  our  long-term  economic  growth  and  to  the  many  things  that  are  more 
directly in its mission to continue to be so under-funded. I have identified areas that 
I  believe  to  be  most  at  risk.  I  am  not  at  all  suggesting  that  NASA  funds  be  reallo-
cated  to  these  areas,  because  the  money  is  simply  not  there.  Instead,  I  believe  the 
so-called  NASA  top  line—the  total  budget  of  NASA—needs  to  go  up  to  a  level  con-
sistent with NASA’s importance to the nation, and to America’s future. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  share  my  views  and  those  of  the 
American  Institute  of  Aeronautics  and  Astronautics  on  this  enormously  important 
legislation. I welcome the opportunity to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, General. 
Mr. Whitesides? 

STATEMENT OF GEORGE T. WHITESIDES, EXECUTIVE 

DIRECTOR, NATIONAL SPACE SOCIETY 

Mr. WHITESIDES. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
My name is George Whitesides, and I serve as the Executive Di-
rector of the National Space Society, NSS. Thank you for the oppor-
tunity to share with you the views of NSS and our members. 

We’re an independent grassroots organization composed of 20,000 
members, founded in 1974, as you know, with the goal of promoting 
space exploration and development. The ultimate vision of the soci-
ety  is  people  living  and  working  in  thriving  communities  beyond 
the  Earth  and  the  use  of  vast  resources  of  space  for  the  dramatic 
betterment  of  humanity.  Our  members  are  citizens  from  every 
state  in  our  great  country,  but,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  note  that 
we, of course, have our strongest chapters in Florida. 

On behalf of the NSS membership, I would like to share the fol-

lowing five major recommendations for the reauthorization: 

First, the Vision for Space Exploration should be reauthorized by 
the Congress. Endorsed with bipartisan support in 2005, the vision 
sets  out  an  inspiring  path  for  its  human  habitation  and  use  of  the 
resources of the solar system. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Second,  we  recommend  space  exploration  be  conceptually  and 
programmatically  linked  with  the  solutions  to  the  pressing  chal-
lenges of Earth, particularly those issues related to climate, energy, 
and the environment. NASA may be the most well-equipped agency 
in  the  world  to  help  solve  the  monumental  challenge  of  climate 
change.  NASA  was  instrumental  in  diagnosing  the  problem,  and 
now is well equipped to craft solutions. What America must under-
stand  is  that  the  full  breadth  of  NASA’s  skills,  people,  and  tech-
nologies  will  be  required  to  meaningfully  respond  to  and  solve  the 
biggest challenges of our time. 

Third,  the  most  urgent  space  issue  our  Nation  faces  in  the  com-
ing years is the human spaceflight gap. Gerry Carr, Commander of 
the final Spacelab—Skylab mission, excuse me—a man who knows 
firsthand  about  these  issues,  wrote  to  me  the  following  comments 
a few days ago. He said, ‘‘I thought we had learned the lesson dur-
ing  the  7-year  hiatus  between  the  Apollo  and  Shuttle  programs.  A 
huge body of NASA and contractor skill and experience just left to 
do  something  else,  then  the  workforce  had  to  be  built  up  all  over 
again,  at  no  mean  cost,  in  order  to  proceed  with  the  Shuttle  and 
Space Station programs.’’ 

Curtis  Schroeder,  an  NSS  member  from  Atlanta,  Georgia,  put  it 
this  way.  He  said,  ‘‘We  cannot  outsource  our  manned  spaceflight 
needs to other countries if we are to be a world leader.’’ 

We  are,  indeed,  confronted  by  another  gap,  and  NSS  believes 
that  Congress  should  direct  NASA  to  make  that  gap  as  short  as 
possible, and should use multiple means of doing so. 

We recommend that NASA receive an authorized budget addition 
of $2 billion this coming fiscal year. With these funds, NASA could 
implement  an  acceleration  of  the  Constellation  program,  fund 
COTS  option  D,  and  get  reimbursed  for  the  expenses  it  sustained 
following the Columbia accident. 

Fourth,  we  recommend  that  the  reauthorization  reiterate  that 
NASA  should,  wherever  possible,  purchase  commercial  services. 
Buying services encourages the innovative powers of the American 
entrepreneurial  spirit  in  small  and  large  companies,  creating  dy-
namics  that  will,  over  time,  grow  our  economy,  lower  the  cost  of 
space access, and enable NASA to focus its efforts and funds on ex-
ploration  of  the  frontiers.  The  Senate  should  commend  NASA’s 
leadership for its active pursuit of services, including, in particular, 
COTS,  parabolic  flight,  and  the  new  area  of  commercial  suborbital 
spaceflight. 

Finally,  I  would  like  to  close  with  three  areas  in  which  NASA 
should make highly leveraged investments that could generate sig-
nificant  return  in  economic  utility,  public  support,  and  global 
health and welfare. 

First, space-based solar power, in which solar energy is collected 
in  space  and  beamed  down  to  Earth,  is  a  strategic  goal  worthy  of 
our imaginations and national spirit. While SSP is not a short-term 
solution  for  national  energy  production,  the  Nation  must  begin  in-
vesting  in  such  technologies  now  if  it  is  to  meet  the  energy  needs 
of  the  future.  Congress  should  authorize  NASA  to  perform  a  new 
study  of  the  concept  and  to  plan  for  space-based  solar  power  dem-
onstration. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Second, though it may seem unlikely, if we do nothing, sooner or 
later we will be hit by an asteroid large enough to threaten life on 
Earth. Given the nature of this threat, NASA should have an ongo-
ing  program  for  developing  defensive  strategies.  This  is  environ-
mental protection of the highest order. 

Third, and finally, NASA should begin designing public participa-
tion  into  its  mission  from  the  start,  using  the  Internet  and  other 
modes  of  communication  as  a  way  to  enable  private  citizens  to  ac-
cess, engage with, and experience future exploration missions. 

Thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  share  the  perspectives  of  the 
members of NNS with you today, and I look forward to your ques-
tions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Whitesides follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GEORGE T. WHITESIDES, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL SPACE SOCIETY 

Chairman Nelson, Ranking Member Vitter, and Members of the Subcommittee: 
Thank you for the opportunity to share with you the views of the National Space 

Society on the upcoming reauthorization of NASA. 

I serve as the Executive Director of the National Space Society (NSS). NSS is an 
independent,  grassroots  organization  with  over  20,000  members,  founded  with  the 
goal of promoting space exploration and development. NSS communicates the excite-
ment  and  benefits  of  space  to  the  public,  and  represents  the  perspectives  of  the 
space-interested public to policymakers. 

Our members are citizens who live and work in every state in our great country. 
They include a wide swath of America, from teachers, to students, to business lead-
ers,  to  elected  officials,  to  even  a  few  astronauts.  Most,  however,  are  simply  every-
day  citizens  without  ties  to  the  space  industry,  citizens  who  understand  the  impor-
tance of space to our Nation and its future. 

I  am  proud  to  represent  the  voices  of  our  members  to  you  today.  In  preparation 
for  this  testimony,  we  solicited  their  views  on  these  issues,  in  addition  to  those  of 
our  board  and  policy  committee,  and  the  members  responded  with  eloquent  and 
nuanced  comment  on  future  space  activities.  I  will  share  some  of  their  words  with 
you as part of this statement. 

NSS  was  founded  over  30  years  ago  by  a  group  of  leading  Americans  that  in-
cluded  Wernher  von  Braun  and  Hugh  Downs.  Their  vision,  and  that  of  our  current 
Governors,  such  as  John  Glenn,  Tom  Hanks,  and  Buzz  Aldrin,  continues  to  inspire 
us today. The ultimate vision of the society is: 

‘‘People  living  and  working  in  thriving  communities  beyond  the  Earth,  and  the 
use of the vast resources of space for the dramatic betterment of humanity.’’ 

While the first part of that vision emphasizes exploration and settlement of space, 
the  second  emphasizes  how  the  resources  of  space  can  be  used  to  improve  life  on 
Earth.  These  are  both  crucial,  as  I  will  discuss  in  more  detail  below,  for  they  hold 
the key to the long-term future of the agency and its mission. 
A.  The  Value  and  Importance  of  U.S.  Space  Exploration  From  Economic 

and Strategic Perspectives 

We  live  in  a  new  age  of  discovery,  in  which  we  learn  on  a  regular  basis  of  new 
oceans under the crust of distant moons, new planets around distant stars, and new 
possibilities for life beyond Earth. Our astronauts regularly perform heroic feats on 
orbit,  as  they  build  the  International  Space  Station,  the  largest  and  most  complex 
science  project  in  history.  Meanwhile,  a  new  generation  of  space  entrepreneurs  is 
emerging,  with  plans  to  transform  the  space  sector  with  new  services  and  lower 
costs. It is an exciting time. 

It has been said that a thousand years in the future, our era will be remembered 
most for the birth of spaceflight, the moment in human history when we developed 
the  ability  to  travel  to  space.  It  is  humanity’s  ultimate  destiny  to  explore  the  uni-
verse, to develop the ability to live for extended periods off planet Earth, and even-
tually, to build communities in space. I firmly believe that the individuals who have 
advanced the space frontier during these early years will be remembered as among 
the greatest heroes of our era, as those who recognized the historical importance of 
space to our Nation and the world. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

But  we  live  in  the  present,  and  together  we  must  confront  three  interlinked 

groups of challenges of our time: 

36 

• Education, competitiveness, innovation and our economy; 
• Energy, resources, climate, and environmental protection; 
• Security, diplomacy, and peace. 
My  primary  message  to  you  today  is  that  space  is  a  key  part  of  the  solutions  to 
all  of  these  present-day,  national  challenges.  That  fact  is  something  that  we  do  not 
hear  enough  of  today,  and  it  is  critical  to  ongoing  public  support  for  future  space 
activities. What America must understand is that the full breadth of NASA’s skills, 
people  and  technologies  will  be  required  to  meaningfully  respond  to  and  solve  the 
biggest challenges of our time. 

Our great country must apply its full abilities to solve these serious tests over the 

coming years: 

• We must inspire and educate our young people to become the scientists, engineers 
and  innovators  of  tomorrow.  Nothing  inspires  children  toward  the  study  of 
science  and  engineering  like  an  ambitious  space  program  that  matters  to  our 
country’s  future.  At  a  time  when  our  education  system  is  falling  behind,  we 
must  do  all  we  can  to  motivate  children  to  enter  STEM  careers,  and  to  offer 
them jobs once they enter the workforce. 
• We  must  maintain  and  build  our  industrial  base,  and  create  innovations  which 
build  prosperity.  NASA’s  spaceflight  capabilities  are  a  strategic  asset  of  the 
country,  and  its  engineers  and  contractors  have  long  driven  critical  techno-
logical advances that drive our economy. The space sector has grown to a quar-
ter-trillion dollar global industry, and is one of the few in which the U.S. main-
tains a positive balance of trade. 
• We  must  shift  to  new  forms  of  energy  production,  and  develop  new  resources  to 
power  and  supply  our  global  economy.  Space-based  Solar  Power  offers  a  poten-
tial future energy source that is clean, fully renewable, and that provides base-
load  power.  Helium  3  resourced  from  the  Moon  could  provide  a  much  cleaner 
fuel for fusion power. 
• We  must  protect  the  Earth’s  environment,  and  seek  to  forestall  rapid  climate 
change. NASA is the world’s foremost climate science agency. Going forward, its 
world-class  system  engineering  capabilities  could  help  design  solutions  for  cli-
mate change on a national and global scale. 
• We must forge new alliances with allies and competitors, and strengthen our eco-
nomic  and  national  security.  As  space  becomes  increasingly  important  for  the 
global  economy  and  global  security,  America  must  lead  to  establish  a  new  sys-
tem for lasting peace and stability in space and on Earth. 

NASA  can  be  the  keystone  to  the  future,  critical  to  the  great  challenges  of  the 
present,  central  to  solving  the  issues  that  Americans  care  most  about.  But  only  if 
we can put forward a bold program that links the needs of Earth with the potential 
benefits of space. 

The Vision for Space Exploration provides the foundation for such a bold program, 
and  as  such,  it  should  be  reauthorized  by  the  Congress.  Endorsed  with  bipartisan 
support,  the  Vision  sets  out  an  inspiring  path  toward  human  habitation  of  the 
Moon,  Mars  and  other  destinations  in  the  solar  system.  It  builds  on  the  hard-won 
wisdom following the Columbia accident: that the risk faced by American astronauts 
deserves  a  worthy  goal,  that  of  exploration  of  the  solar  system.  Under  the  Vision, 
an  official  path  for  human  exploration  beyond  low-Earth  orbit  was  set  out  for  the 
first time in at least a decade. 

We  would  recommend  that  two  themes  within  the  general  direction  of  the  Vision 

be explicitly directed by Congress within the Authorization: 

• To  link  the  work  of  human  and  robotic  exploration  more  closely  with  the  re-
sponse to the pressing needs of planet Earth, particularly those issues related to 
climate and energy; 
• To  recommit  to  engaging,  building  and  using  commercial  space  services  as  the 

preferred option for NASA’s needs whenever available. 

The  first  theme  anchors  the  Vision  to  the  real  challenges  facing  America  today, 
creating real sustainability. That, in turn, will help build public understanding and 
support for NASA’s mission. The second utilizes the full powers of the American en-
trepreneur, creating dynamics that over time will grow our economy, lower the cost 
of  space  access,  and  enable  NASA  to  focus  its  own  efforts  and  funds  on  exploration 
of  the  frontiers.  Both  themes  will  ultimately  support  the  sustainable  expansion  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

our  civilization  outward  to  the  Moon,  Mars  and  beyond,  and  the  expansion  of  the 
Earth’s economic sphere to include those bodies. 

Ultimately,  space  is  the  main  path  forward  to  resolving  the  great  humanitarian 
and  environmental  challenge  of  our  time—the  global  disparity  between  rich  and 
poor. One of our members, James Martin of Springfield, Virginia, captured the real 
scope of the issue at hand: 

It seems to me that the great challenge facing the world in the coming decades 
is a growing contention for resources—most acutely energy—between the indus-
trialized  world  (the  ‘‘haves’’)  and  those  rapidly  industrializing  countries  (the 
current ‘‘have nots’’) that seek a lifestyle similar to ours. China and India, with 
the world’s two largest national populations, are leading this quite natural urge 
of  the  ‘‘have  nots’’  to  improve  their  lot  in  life.  This  is  leading  to  increased  de-
mand  on  global  resources  by  economic  growth  in  these  two  countries—a  situa-
tion that can only get worse. It has been said that we would need three Earths 
to provide the energy and mineral resources to support the entire human popu-
lation at a standard of living equal to the current industrialized countries (who 
make up only 1⁄6 of the planet’s population). This leads to a grim conclusion that 
the  ‘‘haves’’  will  increasingly  have  to  fight  to  defend  their  current  advantaged 
position  (a  dubious  moral  proposition),  or  we  will  have  to  change  the  ‘‘playing 
field’’  by  accessing  energy  and  mineral  resources  beyond  this  planet.  Moreover, 
fossil fuels cannot support a massive increase in global industrialization without 
pushing us even further into environmental collapse. 
There has never been a better time for a fundamental change in our perception 
of  the  future.  If  mankind  can  access  resources  beyond  Earth,  we  can  offer  the 
hope  of  economic  well-being  and  a  clean  environment  for  all,  and  avoid  debili-
tating  future  resource  conflicts  that  will  only  make  us  all  poorer.  America’s 
space program must be oriented toward creating this future. 

B.  The  Implications  and  Consequences  of  Any  Gaps  in  the  Nation’s  Space 

Capabilities 

Curtis  Schroeder  of  Atlanta,  Georgia,  wrote  to  me,  in  preparation  for  this  testi-

mony, 

‘‘We  cannot  outsource  our  manned  space  flight  needs  to  other  countries  if  we 
are to be a world leader.’’ 

Perhaps  the  most  urgent  space  issue  our  Nation  faces  in  the  next  few  years  is 
the  human  spaceflight  gap  between  the  retirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle  and  the 
start  of  Constellation  Program  operations.  This  gap,  right  now  estimated  to  be  five 
and  a  half  years,  will  be  about  as  long  as  the  gap  the  Nation  experienced  between 
the retirement of the Apollo hardware and the launch of the Space Shuttle. 

Our  Nation’s  space  program  survived  that  gap,  but  the  environment  was  much 
different  then.  Where  we  once  had  a  single  competitor  in  space,  we  now  have  sev-
eral. Where before we faced competition in orbital operations rather than lunar ad-
ventures,  today  there  are  three  other  nations  orbiting  hardware  around  the  Moon, 
with  Russia  and  China  both  expressing  interest  in  sending  humans  there,  possibly 
before Constellation’s target date of 2020. We are running the risk of falling behind 
in space, even if no ‘‘space race’’ has been declared. 

The  consequences  of  the  gap,  as  seen  during  the  transition  between  Apollo  and 
Shuttle,  are  well  known  and  ominous.  Loss  of  funding  translates  into  a  loss  of 
NASA’s  most  critical  assets:  the  knowledge,  corporate  memory,  and  hands-on  skills 
of  its  people.  With  a  loss  of  jobs  comes  a  loss  of  economic  vitality  in  communities 
like Brevard County, Florida; and New Orleans, Louisiana, as people move away to 
look  for  jobs  and  take  their  money  and  families  with  them.  Once  those  people  are 
gone,  restoring  diminished  capabilities  and  communities  will  not  be  as  simple  as 
issuing a call-back after a brief layoff. 

Jerry  Carr,  Commander  of  the  final  Skylab  flight—a  man  who  knows  about  such 

issues firsthand—wrote me the following comments: 

‘‘I thought that we had learned the lesson during the seven-year hiatus between 
the Apollo and Shuttle programs. A huge body of NASA and contractor skill and 
experience  just  left  to  do  something  else.  Then  the  workforce  had  to  be  built 
up  all  over  again  at  no  mean  cost  in  order  to  proceed  with  the  Shuttle  and 
Space Station programs. 
‘‘Where is the incentive to build up our scientific and technical base if we have 
no space program to which those young minds can aspire? Space exploration is 
where the United States has shown leadership, and in the current climate . . . 
we can’t afford to abdicate the heritage we have established in space.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

Over 20 years ago, a prescient report came out following the Challenger accident, 
The  Report  of  the  National  Commission  on  Space.  It  made  a  similar  observation 
then, and today the situation is significantly more pressing: 

‘‘Should the United States choose not to undertake achievement of these econo-
mies  in  launch  and  recovery  capability,  then  the  Nation  must  face  the  prob-
ability that other nations will rapidly overtake our position as the world’s lead-
ing  spacefaring  nation.  The  competition  to  get  into  space  and  to  operate  effec-
tively  there  is  real.  Above  all,  it  is  imperative  that  the  United  States  maintain 
a  continuous  capability  to  put  both  humans  and  cargo  into  orbit;  never  again 
should  the  country  experience  the  hiatus  we  endured  from  1975  to  1981,  when 
we were unable to launch astronauts into space.’’ 

Another  gap  is  indeed  upon  us.  NSS  believes  that  this  Committee  should  make 

that gap as short as possible, and should use multiple means of doing so. 
Fund Acceleration of the Constellation Program 

NASA  and  its  contractor  team  are  well  on  their  way  toward  development  of  the 
Ares I launch vehicle and Orion capsule. Starting over or even stopping to re-evalu-
ate  the  designs  would  further  extend  the  gap.  Therefore,  we  believe  NASA  should 
receive  the  resources  it  needs  to  develop  the  Ares/Orion  architecture  as  it  now 
stands. 

With  an  additional  $2  billion  a  year,  NASA  could  close  the  gap  to  three  and  a 
half  years.  This  would  also  reimburse  the  agency  for  the  expenses  it  sustained  in 
adding  safety  systems  to  the  Shuttle  following  the  Columbia  accident.  However, 
many  of  the  processes  needed  to  develop  the  new  Ares  launch  vehicles  and  Orion 
Crew Exploration Vehicle are linear in nature and cannot be hurried along by addi-
tional  money  or  resources.  NSS  asks  Congress  to  fully  fund  these  development  ef-
forts to meet their best-case schedules. 
Authorize and Fund COTS Option D 

In  addition  to  supporting  NASA’s  current  efforts  to  reduce  the  gap,  NSS  favors 
providing  additional  funding  for  commercial  development  of  crew  transportation  to 
the  International  Space  Station.  In  recent  letters  addressed  to  the  Senate  and 
House  Appropriations  Committees,  Gary  Barnhard,  NSS  Executive  Board  Chair-
man, and Greg Allison, Executive Committee Chairman, argued for additional fund-
ing  of  Part  D  of  the  Commercial  Orbital  Transportation  Services  (COTS)  program. 
We support COTS Part D because we believe that it could: 

• Shorten the ‘‘gap’’ in U.S. human space access after the Space Shuttle is retired; 
• Foster  technological  diversity  and  competition  among  the  companies  providing 

these capabilities, which also can be used to support other operations; 

• Allow  innovative  providers  to  use  their  best  practices  to  develop  and  provide 
needed  capabilities,  outside  traditional  government  organizational  or  procure-
ment channels; 

• Add budgetary flexibility to NASA’s ISS servicing efforts, potentially at a lower 

cost than NASA could do otherwise; and 

• Attract outside investment, if the program is properly structured. 
Improve Opportunities and Incentives for Commercial Space Activities 

As  the  COTS  program  matures,  Congress  can  further  both  commercial  develop-
ment  of  space  transportation  systems  and  provide  productive  uses  for  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  after  its  scheduled  defunding  in  2016.  This  can  be  done  by 
encouraging  NASA  to  buy  services  for  ISS,  to  conduct  space-based  research,  and  to 
develop space-based education opportunities where it can to help stimulate services 
where none exist today. A combination of Space Act agreements and traditional con-
tract  vehicles  could  increase  demand  for  commercial  transportation  services,  fund 
new  space  ventures,  and  serve  as  a  bridge  between  ISS’s  status  as  a  government 
laboratory and its future as a commercial outpost. 

The American taxpayer wants to know that the efforts made and money spent to 
complete  the  Station  have  been  worth  it.  One  NSS  member,  Mr.  James  Grosbach, 
wrote to me in an e-mail: 

Almost  as  distressing  as  the  upcoming  ‘‘gap’’  is  the  projected  date  of  2016  as 
the  retirement  date  of  the  ISS.  My  God,  we’ll  no  sooner  have  the  thing  built 
than  we’ll  be  looking  at  abandoning  it.  Funds  should  be  made  available  to  up-
grade  and  refurbish  ISS  systems  to  keep  it  usable  well  into  the  third  decade 
of the century! 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

In  short,  NSS  members  believe  that  it  is  both  good  and  proper  for  the  Nation  to 
continue funding and using ISS as a lab for productive science and commercial ven-
tures—either through NASA, the private sector, or a combination of the two. 
Develop New Heavy Lift Vehicle 

It  is  critical  for  exploration  of  the  Moon  and  Mars  for  NASA  to  be  authorized  to 
continue past development of the Ares I to a new heavy lift vehicle. NASA currently 
has  baselined  the  Ares  V  vehicle,  a  new  development  program  which  will  possess 
the capacity to launch the payloads required for lunar surface exploration. 
C. NASA’s Needs for Accomplishing the Vision for Space Exploration 
Full Funding Under the VSE’s Original Budget Run-Out 

According  to  the  Congressional  Research  Service,1 when  the  Vision  was  first  pro-
posed  in  2004,  the  Bush  Administration  stated  that  $12.6  billion  would  need  to  be 
added to the NASA budget over the course of Fiscal Years 2005 through 2009, with 
NASA  projected  budget  chart  suggesting  that  $150–$170  billion  would  be  spent  on 
the Vision from FY 2004 to 2020. Most of the money was to come from other NASA 
programs,  such  as  the  retiring  Space  Shuttle.  The  $12.6  billion,  for  example,  com-
prises $1 billion in new money, and $11.6 billion that is redirected from other NASA 
activities. 

In  the  FY  2005  budget,  the  White  House  projected  that  NASA’s  total  budget 
would  increase  about  5  percent  per  year  for  FY  2005–2007,  then  at  less  than  the 
rate of inflation—about 2 percent—for FY 2008–2009. However, according to Admin-
istrator Griffin’s budget testimony and actual budget figures, NASA’s budget did not 
meet  the  expected  profile  in  2006  and  2007,  and  received  a  budget  increase  of  3.1 
percent for the entire agency for FY 2008. 

What  do  these  figures  mean?  In  simple  terms,  NASA  needs  the  money  originally 
proposed for the Vision to ensure its continued success. At present estimates, NASA 
will require an additional $1–$2 billion to accelerate Constellation, repay for Colum-
bia, support COTS–D, and protect our national commitments to science. 

This  funding  will  require  the  joint  efforts  of  the  next  president  as  well  as  both 
parties  in  both  houses  of  Congress  to  look  after  our  national  interest  and  make 
good-faith  efforts  to  sustain  the  Vision.  The  NSS  believes  there  is  sufficient  cause 
for hope, given this body’s bipartisan support for the 2005 Authorization. 
A Sustained National Commitment to Space Exploration 

One  of  the  virtues,  but  also  one  of  the  challenges,  of  living  in  an  elected,  rep-
resentative  government  is  that  personnel  and  priorities  constantly  change.  Fortu-
nately,  the  Nation  as  a  whole,  the  Congress,  and  the  President  have  all  seen  the 
value of supporting space-related activities since the initial space race of the 1950s. 
While  that  support  has  waxed  and  waned  over  the  years,  the  Gallup  organization 
reports that the percent of Americans who want NASA’s budget to remain the same 
or increase has never been lower than 51 percent since 1984.2 I take that as a hope-
ful sign for what we can accomplish in the future. 

This Nation has always stood for progress, expanding the frontiers of the possible, 
and improving the lot of its citizens. If the American people are willing to maintain 
a consistent belief in the value of space exploration, then I believe any future Presi-
dent  or  Congress  would  be  safe  in  continuing  this  valuable  national  investment.  It 
is about more than following the polls; it is about continuing to support an activity 
that,  to  the  majority  of  Americans,  stands  for  progress  and  a  better  future.  It  also 
means demonstrating this Nation’s commitment to being a leader in high technology 
of  all  kinds.  Space  exploration  is  a  national  emblem  of  achievement  and  soft  power 
of  which  its  citizens  can  be  justly  proud.  Support  for  the  Vision,  then,  is  not  just 
a  matter  of  material  support  in  the  form  of  passing  budgets  every  year;  it  is  a  na-
tional enterprise that deserves our constant verbal and moral support. 
An Environment That Encourages Private-Sector Participation 

NSS  greatly  admires  NASA’s  exploration  efforts;  that  is  why  we  are  here  to  sup-
port them. And we want NASA to continue its role on the cutting edge of technology 
and  the  space  frontier.  However,  if  we  are  going  to  have  a  true  ‘‘space  economy’’— 
one where individuals and businesses are buying and selling goods and services be-

1 Smith,  Marcia  S.  ‘‘Space  Exploration:  Issues  Concerning  the  ‘Vision  for  Space  Exploration’ 
Resources,  Science,  and  Industry  Division.’’  CRS  Report  for  Congress  Code  RS21720,  Updated 
June 9, 2005. 

2 Jones,  Jeffrey  M.  ‘‘Support  for  Space  Program  Funding  High  by  Historical  Standards.’’  Gal-
http://www.gallup.com/poll/9082/Support-Space-Program-Funding-High-Historical- 

lup.com 
Standards.aspx August 19, 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Other activities Congress and NASA can perform to ensure a welcoming environ-

ment for the private sector include: 

yond Earth orbit—then space activities must be opened more fully to private-sector 
participation. The long-term viability of space requires it. 

As  I  stated  earlier,  NASA  needs  to  buy  services  for  ISS,  research,  and  education 
where  it  can  to  help  stimulate  commercial  services  where  none  exist.  ISS  can  be-
come,  over  time,  a  pioneering  commercial  outpost  in  low-Earth  orbit.  If  there  are 
activities in which the private sector stands to make a profit, then competing, enter-
prising  companies  of  all  types  will  race  to  fill  the  niches.  They  will  diversify,  low-
ering  the  cost  of  services  available  for  purchase  by  the  government,  as  well  as 
broaden the tax base and create new, spinoff niches that the government hadn’t con-
sidered—that is what it does best. 

for certain, smaller R&D projects. 

• Allowing  commercial  firms  to  make  fixed-price  bids  on  cost-plus  procurements 
so they do not have to reorganize their business processes to meet the adminis-
trative burdens of cost-plus contract accounting when dealing with NASA. 
• Increasing the use of fixed-price, milestone- or performance-based procurements 
• Using emerging commercial space flight capabilities for space and earth science, 
aeronautics, and exploration-related crew familiarization and training missions, 
including but not limited to parabolic flights, suborbital vehicles, and emerging 
launch vehicles. 
• Not  demanding  a  broad  use  license  for  intellectual  property  originating  in  the 
private  sector  as  a  term  of  funding  demonstrations  of  the  relevant  technology, 
or the development of applications for the technology, but rather agreeing to li-
cense this intellectual property for public uses. 

The  private  sector  has  historically  relied  on  the  government  to  spend  money  on 
the  difficult,  unglamorous  things  that  do  not  readily  generate  revenue  but  are  nec-
essary for the functioning of a healthy economy. These include building physical in-
frastructure,  establishing  legal  ‘‘rules  of  the  road,’’  and  protecting  the  individual 
consumer.3 Congress  and  NASA  have  several  excellent  opportunities  to  do  all  of 
these things through the following programs: 

• COTS/COTS  D  Demonstration  Programs—As  stated  earlier,  NSS  strongly  en-
courages  NASA  to  fully  fund  the  existing  COTS  cargo  and  crew  launch  dem-
onstration and development programs. Even if the competitors currently receiv-
ing  funding—SpaceX  and  Orbital  Sciences—do  not  manage  to  close  ‘‘the  gap,’’ 
I  believe  the  capabilities  they  develop  will  only  serve  to  strengthen  U.S.  com-
mercial space transportation. After all, if it is truly NASA’s goal to focus on ex-
ploration, then it will be left to the private sector to handle basic transportation 
services to low-Earth orbit. The more providers in the market, the lower the po-
tential cost to the government when it needs services in the future. 
• ISS Crew and Cargo Operational Services—Once SpaceX, Orbital, or other pro-
viders begin to show results, it is incumbent upon NASA to select those services 
to  support  ISS  first,  with  Ares  and  Orion  providing  the  backup.  If  the  private 
sector is truly able to generate the economies of scale necessary to dramatically 
reduce the cost of LEO access, it would truly be a waste of highly capable explo-
ration hardware to make those trips. 
• Suborbital  Commercial  Vehicles—Suborbital  commercial  spaceflight  will  trans-
form the public’s relationship with space, and unlock new opportunities for sci-
entists  and  astronauts  to  fly  to  space  with  unprecedented  frequency.  These  ad-
vantages  have  been  recognized  and  supported  in  multiple  speeches  by  NASA 
Administrator Michael Griffin. 
These new vehicles will serve as platforms for critical climate science research, 
and  offer  space  professionals  authentic  space  training  at  higher  volumes  and  a 
fraction of the cost of orbital spaceflight. 
Under  the  leadership  of  Administrator  Griffin  and  Deputy  Administrator  Dale, 
NASA has already taken the lead on this opportunity by creating the Suborbital 
Scientist  Participant  Pilot  Program,  which  would  enable  scientists  to  fly  with 
their  experiments  as  they  do  onboard  high  altitude  research  airplanes.  NASA 
should take the next step for the program by issuing a Research Announcement 
this  year  to  investigators,  to  implement  the  program  as  commercial  vehicles 
come online over the next 2 years. 

3 Sadeh,  Eligar.  Space  Politics  and  Policy:  An  Evolutionary  Perspective.  ISBN  1402008791, 

Springer, 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

This  program  should  be  supported  via  Congressional  authorization,  receive  ap-
propriations as part of the new NASA initiative in suborbital flight, and be en-
couraged to expand, for it offers students and researchers the chance to operate 
space  experiments  affordably  and  at  high  flight  rates.  It  will  also  encourage  a 
new  generation  of  young  people  to  pursue  science  and  engineering  degrees, 
knowing that they have a good chance to fly to space. Additionally, the U.S. as-
tronauts  corps  may  find  it  valuable  for  space  training,  particularly  during  the 
gap in American orbital spaceflight capability. 
• Parabolic  Flight—NASA  has  recently  engaged  an  outside  provider  of  parabolic 
flight  services  after  a  lengthy  competition.  This  direction  is  the  right  direction 
for  the  agency,  because  outside  companies  can  defray  their  costs  over  multiple 
customers,  saving  the  government  money  while  building  commercial  American 
capability.  The  Senate  should  support  this  activity,  and  encourage  the  agency 
to pursue similar efforts. 
• Centennial  Challenges—Congress  should  reinforce  the  important  role  Centen-
nial Challenges can play in developing new technologies and capabilities critical 
to NASA’s mission, and in creating economic benefit for taxpayers. This is a rel-
atively  low-cost,  low-risk  way  for  the  government  to  obtain  the  benefits  of  new 
technology, paying only for success. 

All of these activities enable private citizens, especially our young people and stu-

dents, to learn, develop, and be rewarded for new technologies. 
Participatory Exploration Activities 

As  a  tactical  and  practical  matter,  NASA  must  integrate  public  participation 
meaningfully at the initial design phases of its missions. This means using the tools 
of  the  Internet  as  means  of  allowing  private  citizens  access  and  input  into  future 
exploration  missions.  This  goes  beyond  the  simple  distribution  of  images  via  the 
Web, to an era in which the public truly experiences space exploration, in real-time 
and  in  high  resolution.  Participatory  exploration  offers  the  opportunity  for  NASA 
and other space organizations to redefine the public’s relationship with exploration, 
and energize the public about space exploration goals and missions. 

Ames Research Center’s open forum in the ‘‘Second Life’’ web-based graphical en-
vironment, known as Co-Lab, provides one such model for participation. Private citi-
zens are allowed to join in discussions about goals and experiments being developed 
for robotic exploration of other worlds. 

OpenNASA.com has become a sounding board for NASA’s Generation Y employees 
to share their experiences and thoughts about how to improve the agency at a tech-
nological and cultural level. 

To  encourage  future  interest  and  mass  participation  in  future  missions,  NASA 
could incorporate Web-based interactivity into robotic landers from the start. For ex-
ample, viewers could vote on where a rover might travel to next, where to place the 
American  flag  on  a  future  human  mission  to  the  Moon  or  Mars,  or  what  to  name 
particular features of a landing site. 

All of these methods are electronic means of attracting and holding the attention 
of  a  generation  that  has  grown  up  with  the  Internet  and  expects  interactivity—in 
technologies as well as organizations. 
D. Other Relevant Items for the Attention of the Committee 

It might seem paradoxical, but while support for NASA remains consistently high, 
the  public  often  has  little  specific  knowledge  of  the  benefits  they  receive  from  the 
agency’s activities. NASA’s human exploration missions can be used to address most 
of  the  major  issues  threatening  our  uncertain  world,  from  energy  independence,  to 
economic,  national,  and  environmental  security.  In  other  words,  the  space  program 
can help address issues Americans are concerned about most. 
Energy Resources: Space Solar Power 

Space-based solar power, supported by lunar resources and human settlements in 
space,  is  a  solution  that  could  1  day  have  tangible  benefits  directly  affecting  all 
Americans,  and  is  a  strategic  goal  worthy  of  our  imaginations  and  national  spirit. 
While  SSP  is  not  a  short-term  solutions  for  national  energy  production,  the  Nation 
must begin investing in such technologies at higher levels, so that we will be ready 
for  transitions  away  from  traditional  fuel  sources  in  the  decades  to  come.  Congress 
should authorize NASA and related agencies to create a space-based solar power pro-
totype  satellite,  to  be  operated  in  Earth  orbit  or  at  the  International  Space  Station, 
as well as other space-based technologies that can address these problems. 

The  historic  investment  in  aerospace  capabilities  which  America  has  made 
through NASA, and related space investments from DOD to Comsat, have matured 
at  a  critical  time.  Robert  Hirsch  testified  before  the  House  Science  and  Technology 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

Committee  on  February  29,  that  the  dean  of  world  oil  analysts,  Charlie  Maxwell, 
‘‘expects gasoline at $12–$15 per gallon within a few years.’’ 

Competition  for  global  oil  production  has  produced  these  soaring  prices.  Shell 
Chief  Executive  Jeroen  van  der  Veer  said,  ‘‘We  are  experiencing  a  step-change  in 
the  growth  rate  of  energy  demand  due  to  population  growth  and  economic  develop-
ment, and Shell estimates that after 2015 supplies of easy-to-access oil and gas will 
no longer keep up with demand. As a result, society has no choice but to add other 
sources of energy.’’ 

Coal use in China, India and elsewhere is rapidly expanding. In 2006, China built 
100,000 megawatts of coal-fired power plants, according to the International Energy 
Agency,  which  far  exceeds  the  entire  generation  capacity  of  the  United  Kingdom. 
India  built  22,000  megawatts  of  new  electricity  plants  in  the  last  5  years  and  has 
plans to add 70,000 megawatts in the next 5 years. 

By  2010,  plug-in  hybrid  vehicles  are  scheduled  to  replace  some  gasoline  demand 
with electric vehicles using ‘‘smart’’ utility meters to charge these at night. The Pa-
cific  Northwest  National  Laboratory  found  that  existing  U.S.  power  plants  could 
meet the electricity needs of 73 percent of the Nation’s light vehicles if the vehicles 
were  replaced  by  plug-ins  that  recharged  at  night.  Such  a  huge  shift  could  cut  oil 
consumption by 6.2 million barrels a day, eliminating 52 percent of current imports. 
But where will all the energy come from in the decades to come? 

Many  energy  ‘‘solutions’’  have  been  proposed,  including  conservation,  windmills, 
bio-fuels plants, ground-based solar cells, ‘‘clean’’ coal and nuclear power. While use-
ful,  these  still  merely  nibble  at  the  vast  energy,  economic  and  environmental  prob-
lems we face. Robert Hirsch has repeatedly emphasized in Congressional statements 
what  the  International  Energy  Agency  has  been  saying,  that  we—as  well  as  the 
other  developed  countries,  are  ‘‘doing  nothing  on  the  scale  required’’  to  address  our 
growing global energy shortfall. 

One future option is Space Solar Power. SSP offers the potential for reliable, vir-

tually unlimited, clean, baseload energy. The potential advantages are clear: 

• SSP can take advantage of our current and historic investment in aerospace ex-
pertise  to  expand  employment  opportunities.  SSP’s  technologies  are  near-term 
and have multiple attractive approaches. Many thousands of STEM jobs, on in-
spiring work that we understand how to do is needed to bring them to practical 
fruition. 

• Unlike  coal,  oil,  gas,  ethanol,  and  bio-fuel  engines,  SSP  emits  very  little  CO2, 
only an antenna is on the Earth (the proper term is rectenna, or ‘‘rectifying an-
tenna’’). 

• Unlike bio-ethanol or bio-diesel, SSP does not compete for increasingly valuable 
farm land or depend on natural-gas-derived fertilizer. Corn and other foodstuffs 
can continue to be a major export instead of a fuel provider. 

• Unlike  nuclear  power  plants,  SSP  produces  no  hazardous  waste  or  nuclear 

weapons-grade material. 

• Unlike terrestrial solar and wind power plants, SSP is available 24 hours a day, 
7  days  a  week,  in  endless  quantities.  SSP  ignores  cloud  cover,  night,  storms, 
dust  and  wind.  Our  understanding  of  the  magnetosphere  and  solar  wind  inter-
action—SSP’s  GSO  operating  environment—has  become  highly  mature  since 
1962. 

• Unlike  coal  and  nuclear  fuels,  SSP  does  not  require  environmentally  problem-

atic mining operations. 

• SSP  may  1  day  provide  true  energy  independence  for  the  nations  that  develop 
it,  eliminating  a  major  source  of  national  competition  for  limited  Earth-based 
energy resources and dependence on unstable or hostile foreign oil providers. 

• SSP  can  be  easily  ‘‘exported’’  anywhere  in  the  world,  and  its  vast  energy  can 
be converted to local needs, from appliances in Asia to desalination of sea water 
in the American West. 

SSP would revitalize America by showing that a multitude of space-development- 
related  educational  fields,  from  telerobotics  to  space  transportation,  from  wireless 
power  transfer  to  photovoltaics  and  environmental  sciences,  are  vitally  relevant  to 
these  great  problems.  Reduced  launch  costs,  the  key  enabler,  will  provide  unprece-
dented  access  to  space  and  space  operations  beginning  with  clean,  baseload  SSP— 
reliable power delivery and global energy security at greatly reduced environmental 
impact. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Resources: Helium 3 

Another potential space-based alternative energy source is atomic fusion using he-
lium-3,  an  element  rare  on  Earth,  yet  abundant  on  the  lunar  surface  and  in  the 
atmospheres  of  the  gas  giants.  This  connects  well  with  the  Vision  for  Space  Explo-
ration, and offers a concrete material which NASA could prospect for. 

America’s  new  launch  vehicles  and  manned  spacecraft  are  suitable  to  support  a 
return  to  the  moon  and  development  of  mining  and  refining  technologies,  and 
should  therefore  continue  as  planned.  Our  first  outpost  on  the  moon  can  be  sup-
ported  by  engineering  projects  to  create  infrastructure  supporting  solar  power  sat-
ellite production as well as extraction and use of helium-3. 
Global Climate Change 

NASA  may  be  the  most  well-equipped  agency  in  the  world  to  help  to  solve  the 
monumental  challenge  facing  our  generation:  climate  change.  NASA  was  instru-
mental  in  diagnosing  the  problem,  and  now  is  well  equipped  to  help  ameliorate  it. 
The connections between NASA and the Earth’s environment are deep and power-
ful. NASA is one of the world’s foremost climate change research organization, pro-
ducing  more  climate  data  than  any  institution  on  Earth.  It  also  possesses  world- 
class  engineering  capabilities.  There  is  growing  agreement  that  NASA  must  make 
climate  and  energy  research  more  central  to  its  mission  and  purpose,  and  that 
NASA  can  play  a  central  global  role  connecting  scientific  results  with  solutions  for 
the planet. 
Modeling, Simulation, Visualization 

NASA plays a leading role in the international community by analyzing the Earth 
observation data forecasting potential futures. Modeling and simulation can help to 
understand  how  quickly  the  climate  is  changing  and  assist  with  sustainable  agri-
culture, urban planning and disaster response. 
Systems Engineering 

NASA  has  a  long  history  of  successfully  executing  major  engineering  efforts  such 
as  the  Apollo  moon  program,  the  Space  Shuttle,  and  the  International  Space  Sta-
tion.  In  order  to  architect  such  large  efforts,  a  mastery  of  systems  engineering  is 
employed. Moreover, in the case of the International Space Station, these engineer-
ing solutions have been created in an international context. The next step is to task 
NASA  to  conduct  system  engineering  of  the  planet,  organizing  global  efforts  to  un-
derstand and mitigate the drivers of climate change. 
Technology Innovation 

Space is a challenging environment. To learn to live and work in the engineering 
constraints  of  the  space  environment  has  challenged  NASA  engineers  to  come  to  a 
deep  understanding  of  the  challenges  of  closed  environmental  systems.  Under  tight 
engineering  constraints,  NASA  engineers  have  innovated  by  creating  lightweight, 
low  power,  highly  efficient,  and  closed  loop  systems.  These  innovations  have  direct 
applicability in the clean technology and green technology sector today. Further, so-
lutions  like  Space  Solar  Power,  in  which  energy  is  collected  in  orbit  and  beamed  to 
earth,  offer  long-term  prospects  for  clean,  renewable  energy  that  deserve  measured 
investment today. 

The world has known about the ‘‘greenhouse effect’’ since the 19th century, when 
scientists  first  began  to  understand  the  nature  of  our  planet’s  atmosphere  and  how 
it  works.  It  acquired  new  urgency  during  the  rise  of  the  environmental  movement 
in  the  early  1970s.  Since  that  time,  NASA’s  Earth-monitoring  satellites  and  sound-
ing rockets have continued to record the planet’s temperatures, both highs and lows, 
at all levels of the atmosphere. If the world is to act responsibly in response to glob-
al climate change, it will require the climate data NASA collects as one of its many 
useful missions. 

Exploring other worlds has also taught us about Earth’s climate. The first images 
transmitted from Venus in 1975 caused astronomer Carl Sagan to call it a ‘‘runaway 
greenhouse.’’  With  its  thick,  poisonous,  carbon  dioxide-rich  atmosphere  and  500-de-
gree temperatures, Venus provided a theoretical model of what could happen to our 
own  planet  if  we  allowed  our  civilization’s  emissions  of  greenhouse  gases  like  CO2 
to  get  out  of  control.  It  was  the  first  real  example  of  how  space  exploration  could 
affect  not  just  our  consciousness  as  a  people,  but  also  our  behavior  and  policies. 
Venus became an object lesson in comparative planetology. 

And yet, nearly fifty million miles beyond Earth lies the planet Mars. It, too, has 
an atmosphere composed largely of carbon dioxide. And yet that atmosphere is very 
thin,  and  its  surface  temperatures  range  from  barely  warm  to  unbearably  frigid. 
Why? What lessons does Mars have to teach us about planet Earth and how we be-
have  on  it?  Unlike  Venus,  we  can  visit  Mars  using  current  technologies,  and  thus 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

we  can  go  there  and  find  out  for  ourselves.  Climate  change  is  an  issue  Americans 
are  passionate  about.  We  owe  it  to  our  citizens  and  the  people  of  the  world  to  do 
all we can to collect the data we need to act wisely for future generations. 
Planetary Defense 

There  are  vast  numbers  of  asteroids  in  near-Earth  orbits.  Though  it  may  seem 
unlikely, if we do nothing, sooner or later we will be hit by an asteroid large enough 
to  threaten  life  on  Earth.  Given  the  nature  of  this  threat,  the  space  program  is  a 
logical  place  to  start  developing  strategies  for  overcoming  it.  This  is  environmental 
protection of the highest order. 

In October 1990, a very small asteroid struck the Pacific Ocean with a blast about 
the  size  of  the  atomic  bomb  that  leveled  Hiroshima,  killing  roughly  thousands  of 
people  in  seconds.  If  this  asteroid  had  arrived  10  hours  later,  it  would  have  struck 
in the middle of more than a million U.S. and Iraqi soldiers preparing for war. How 
would America have reacted to what looked like a nuclear attack? 

In  1908,  a  small  asteroid  (perhaps  50  meters  across)  hit  Tunguska,  Siberia  and 
flattened 60 million trees. That asteroid was so small it never even hit the ground, 
just  exploded  in  mid-air.  If  it  had  arrived  4  hours  and  52  minutes  later,  it  could 
have  hit  St.  Petersburg.  At  the  time,  St.  Petersburg  was  the  capital  of  Russia  with 
a  population  of  a  few  hundred  thousand.  The  city  would  have  ceased  to  exist.  As 
it was, dust from the blast lit up the skies of Europe for days. Asteroid strikes this 
size  probably  happen  about  once  every  one  hundred  years.  There  was  another 
Tunguska-class strike in the Brazilian rain forest on August 13, 1930. 

Sixty-five  million  years  ago  a  huge  asteroid  several  kilometers  across  slammed 
into  the  Yucatan  Peninsula  in  Mexico.  This  is  the  event  that  is  thought  to  have 
caused the extinction of the dinosaurs (and many other species). The explosion was 
the equivalent of about 200 million megatons of dynamite. The blast turned the air 
around  it  into  plasma—a  material  so  hot  that  electrons  are  ripped  from  the  atomic 
nucleus  and  molecules  cannot  exist.  This  scenario  has  been  repeated  perhaps  once 
every 100 million years or so. As many as two-thirds of all species that ever existed 
may have been terminated by asteroids hitting the Earth. 

We  know  about  the  asteroid  that  killed  the  dinosaurs  because  we  found  the  cra-
ter. But when an asteroid hits the ocean, there may not be a crater. If a 400-meter 
(four football fields) diameter asteroid were to fall into the Atlantic Ocean, it would 
cause a tsunami 60 meters high. 

The  only  way  to  eliminate  the  threat  of  asteroids  is  to  detect  and  divert  them. 
A vigorous space-based civilization capable of reaching, exploring, and diverting as-
teroids into useful, safe orbits would have enormous economic incentives to find and 
use  every  asteroid  passing  near  Earth.  The  asteroids  could  be  found,  diverted,  and 
mined  for  their  materials,  including  platinum-group  metals,  water  ice,  and  iron, 
which could be used to make steel. This would defuse the threat, make a lot of peo-
ple extremely rich, and keep an entire world safe. 
Peace and Security 

Civil  space  must  be  a  key  element  of  diplomacy  for  the  coming  years,  because 
space  is  uniquely  suited  to  addressing  certain  challenges  of  the  current  inter-
national  landscape.  The  use  of  space  as  a  strategic  means  of  diplomacy  can 
strengthen  relations  with  allies,  reduce  future  conflicts  with  strategic  competitors, 
and  engage  members  of  the  developing  world  in  productive  directions,  all  while  ac-
complishing projects of value to America and the world. 

The success of ISS and its international partnerships has formed a model for how 
nations can come together to build great things in space. While mistakes have been 
made  and  progress  has  not  been  as  rapid  as  we  would  like,  ISS  has  established  an 
important  precedent  for  strategic  cooperation  in  space.  We  will  need  such  coopera-
tive  ventures  as  we  move  on  to  explore  and  settle  the  Moon  and  the  planet  Mars. 
And  cooperation  in  space  can,  we  believe,  lead  to  strategic  and  diplomatic  goodwill 
on Earth-based matters as well. 
Concluding Thoughts 

Our  Nation’s  human  spaceflight  program  can  be  about  more  than  just  being 
‘‘great,’’ it can also be about being ‘‘good,’’ by meeting the urgent needs of all Ameri-
cans  and  the  planet  as  a  whole.  Such  efforts  offer  NASA  a  vision  the  public  will 
follow  for  the  long  haul,  embracing  as  it  does  both  economic  opportunities  for  indi-
viduals and technological benefits for the common good. 

The Nation faces an historic opportunity with regard to space this year. In a time 
of  uncertainty,  Congress  and  the  next  president  can  use  human  space  exploration 
as a means to advance and improve this Nation as part of a sustained commitment 
to  solving  the  challenges  we  face  today.  Space  exploration  can  provide  a  common 
keystone  for  the  many  issues  confronting  us  today,  from  education  to  economic  un-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

certainty  to  energy  production,  planetary  health  and  safety,  international  coopera-
tion,  and  economic  competitiveness.  A  re-authorized  Vision  for  Space  Exploration, 
with  the  recommendations  I’ve  suggested,  would  be  an  excellent  starting  point  for 
building a truly spacefaring civilization. Therefore, I encourage you to continue sup-
porting  human  exploration  beyond  LEO,  and  onwards  to  Moon,  Mars,  and  beyond. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  thank  you  all.  Your  statements  were  ex-

cellent. 

There is a symmetry of opinion by all of you, and I think I could 

sum that up by asking Mr. Kranz a question. 

During  Apollo,  the  resources  of  this  country  for  Apollo  were  3 
percent  of  the  discretionary  budget.  Today,  they  are  six-tenths  of 
1 percent of the discretionary budget. If today’s budget of six-tenths 
of a percent had been applied to Apollo, I suspect we wouldn’t have 
gotten off the ground. Tell me what you think. 

Mr.  KRANZ.  I  believe  you’re  right  on  track.  We  would  have  been 
stuck somewhere in the early Gemini program. I believe that the— 
the  advancement  that  we  had  was  really  a  combination  of  factors. 
We  had  the  resources  to  do  the  job,  we  had  the  vision  that  said 
what  the  job  was,  the  talented  people  were  available  to  us,  they 
were highly motivated. 

And  one  of  the  things  that  we  tend  to  overlook  goes  back  to  the 
university.  They  had—in  1958,  they  had  passed  the  National  Stu-
dent  Defense  Loan  Program,  which  then  took—provided,  basically, 
a GI Bill for young people to go to college, many of the first in the 
family  ever  to  do  that,  and  the  universities  were  basically  pouring 
out the young people, the talented young people that we had to pro-
vide our ramp-up to the support the program. 

Frankly,  without  the  resources  that  we  had  in  the  early  1960s, 
we wouldn’t have made it. We would have seen a Soviet flag on the 
moon. 

Senator NELSON. Well, if we can ever get this message to the ad-
visors  to  the  three  Presidential  candidates,  who  are  concerned,  as 
they  should  be,  about  the  future  ability  of  America  to  compete  in 
a global economy, and are concerned about the educational achieve-
ments  of  our  young  people,  that  in  the  early  1960s  wasn’t  it  the 
space program that turned kids on so much, to want to go into en-
gineering  and  math  and  science,  and  produced  a  revolution  in 
microminiaturization? 

Mr. KRANZ. We had the—the real breakthrough, and it was—you 
go  back  to  the  Soviet  missions—twice,  they  attempted  to  ren-
dezvous,  and  didn’t  make  it.  The  spacecrafts  passed  within  about 
3  miles  of  each  other.  By  this  time,  America  had  developed—they 
couldn’t  brute—we  weren’t  brute-forcing  it  like  the  Soviets  were, 
we had developed the technology, we had the inspired people in the 
laboratory,  and  we  had  generations  of  young  people  that  were  fol-
lowing them. We lived on this seed crop that the universities were 
providing us, but were inspired to go through these difficult studies 
of engineering, math, science. 

You know, there’s a fine report out right now—in preparation for 
my talks, annually I get a report on what they call the U.S. Council 
on  Competitiveness.  It’s  right  down  here,  on  K  Street.  They  just 
produced a report, several months ago, and it’s got some very good 
news for America. It’s also got some threats that you can see in the 
future,  one  of  which  addresses  this  China  question,  and,  where  do 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

we  stand  in  relationship  to  the  other  nations  of  the  world  in  pro-
ducing  the  young  people,  inspiring  the  young  people?  The  news  is, 
is  that  many  of  these  countries  are  outproducing  us,  but  we  still 
have  the  best  university  systems  and  the  best  talented  young  peo-
ple  and  the  most  inspired  people.  We’ve  got  to  continue  that  job. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  yet,  we  are  producing  a  fraction  of  what 

China and India are producing in engineers at this point. 

Mr. KRANZ. Yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  So,  the  question  is,  how  do  we  inspire  young 
people to want to get into these fields? And certainly history would 
tell us that the Apollo, Gemini and Mercury programs clearly were 
inspiring. 

Let  me  ask  you,  Dr.  Johnson-Freese,  since  you  are  an  expert  on 
the  Chinese  space  program,  tell  us  where  you  think  that’s  going 
and what’s going to be the ultimate competition between China and 
the U.S. in space? 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Well,  I  would  pick  up  on  what  Mr.  Kranz 
was  saying,  that,  in  fact,  China,  like  Japan  earlier,  and  like  India 
currently,  now  that  it’s  announced  it  intends  to  have  a  human 
spaceflight  program,  is  using—part  of  what  it  is  doing  with  that 
program  is  inspiring  people  to  go  into  engineering.  In  Japan,  15 
years  ago,  the  space  companies,  90  percent  of  the  workforce  was 
making  washing  machines  and  cars,  but  they  drew  the  best  and 
the  brightest  in  by  showing  them  their  space  division.  So,  space  is 
a motivator around the world. 

In  terms  of  China,  where  are  they  going  and  where  do  I  see  the 
competition  headed?  And,  by  the  way,  the  best-selling  book  in 
China in 2002 was, ‘‘How to Get Your Child Into Harvard,’’ so they 
get it. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  They  get  it.  Where  do  I  think  they’re 
going?  I  think  they  have  a  very  deliberate,  incremental,  yet  ambi-
tious,  plan  laid  out,  that  is  broadbased.  Like—as  in  the  United 
States,  it  has  a  military  component,  it  has  a  civil  component.  I 
think  their  civil  component  is  largely  based  on  reading  the  Apollo 
playbook  and  all  the  benefits  that  the  United  States  got  from  it. 
We will likely see another flight from China, this coming fall, with 
probably  a  move  toward  docking,  with  a  small  space  laboratory  to 
follow,  and,  once  they  have  their  new  heavy-launch  vehicle  in 
place, a space station, down the road. 

I  would  note  that  they  have  not  officially  announced  a  manned 
lunar  landing.  They  don’t  like  to  announce  anything  until  it’s  sure 
that  they  have  the  technology  to  carry  through.  Credibility  is  im-
portant. They have said, more than once, they will not do an Apollo 
program.  They  will  go  to  the  moon,  they  will  use  infrastructure 
that  allows  them  to  keep  going.  They  don’t  want  to,  as  they  say, 
go and say, ‘‘Been there, done that.’’ 

Ultimately, I think the competition—personally, I hate to see the 
U.S.  and  Chinese  space  programs  characterized  as  competitive. 
They fly two manned spaceflights over a 5-year period and are per-
ceived  to  be  ‘‘beating’’  the  U.S.  space  program.  That’s  just  wrong. 
Where I see the ultimate competition is from the technology, the 
engineers,  and  the  science  that  will  be  generated  through  the  pro-
gram. A political scientist in China made the comment to me that, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

‘‘Now that they have a manned spaceflight program, people will un-
derstand  they  make  more  than  cheap  sneakers  and  ripped-off  de-
signer clothing. They are a technology leader.’’ 

So,  I  think  the  economic  and  technology  competitiveness  will 
come  back  to  haunt  us  if  we,  in  fact,  don’t  keep  our  quest  to  stay 
ahead. 

Senator  NELSON.  Given  the  constraints  of  classification,  would 
you share with us, for the record, what you think that the Chinese 
were  trying  to  demonstrate  when  they  did  their  anti-satellite  test 
by taking out one of their old weather satellites? 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Senator,  it’s  difficult  to  get  into  Chinese 
intentions,  because  we  simply  don’t  know.  There  are  many  dif-
ferent  scenarios  that  have  been  laid  forth,  and  I  think  the  one 
that’s  increasingly  gaining  credibility  is  that,  in  fact,  during  the 
1980s,  when  the  United  States  had  an  active  ASAT  program,  the 
Chinese started one, as well. It was a technology development pro-
gram that took, basically, 20 years to reach fruition. And, as many 
people  have  said,  if  you  have  a  technology,  it’s—one  test  is  worth 
a  thousand  words—that  it  reached  fruition,  that  it  was  character-
ized  by  the  engineers  running  it,  China  is  over-bureaucratized,  it’s 
very  stove-piped;  the  engineers  who  were  in  charge  of  that  tech-
nology  development  program  put  it  forward  as,  ‘‘It’s  time  to  test.’’ 
I  think  they  severely  underestimated  international  response.  I 
think they now regret underestimating that response. They charac-
terized  the  debris  situation  in  engineering  overall  increase  in  de-
bris  rather  than  the—looking  at  it  in  terms  of  risk  to  spacecraft. 
And  it  was  a  lot  of  bad  decisionmaking  on  their  part.  When  they 
did  the  prior  nonimpact  tests,  and  there  was  no  response,  I  think 
they  miscalculated  on  what  would  be  the  U.S.  and  the  inter-
national reaction. 

But,  the  bottom  line,  I  think  it  was  a  technology  program,  tech-

nology demonstration program. 

Senator NELSON. Is part of their miscalculation that they miscal-
culated  the  reaction  of  the  world  community  with  regard  to  the 
tens of thousands of pieces of debris that now threaten everybody’s 
space assets? 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Absolutely.  Again,  I  think  that  the  engi-
neers  who  were  putting  forth  the  estimates,  the  debris  estimates, 
were  not  thinking  in  global  terms  at  all,  and  they  were  quite—we 
actually, I think—now think that their debris estimates were pret-
ty on target, but very foolhardy, very reckless and self-destructive, 
now—we  now  look  back  and  see.  So,  yes,  I  think  they  were  totally 
out of line on that, in terms of their estimations of perception. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  you  think  the  world  community  has  re-
sponded  with  a  sufficient  degree  of  outrage  as  to  the  tens  of  thou-
sands of pieces of debris? 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  The  Chinese  took  very  careful  aim  and 
shot themselves in the foot with that test. I think they are now rec-
ognizing  that  the  international  condemnation  due  them  was  actu-
ally  moderated,  that,  in  fact,  when  they  cancelled  the  meeting  in 
China  on  the  debris  committee  that  was  supposed  to  meet  several 
weeks  after,  they  cancelled  it,  knowing  that  the  condemnation 
would  be  harsh  and  would  be  due  them,  and  they  simply  didn’t 
want to face it. I think the Chinese will be digging themselves out 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

of  that  hole  for  a  long  time,  and  that—again,  that  they  are  now 
deeply regretting the situation that they brought on themselves. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  others.  We  had  testimony  in  the  Senate 
Armed  Services  Committee,  by  the  then-Commander  of  U.S.  Space 
Command, on just how many of these pieces of debris threaten the 
assets  of  any  nation’s  space  asset,  and  how  we  have  to  be  particu-
larly  careful  now  with  the  Space  Station  because  of  the  altitude  of 
the debris field it’s going to take quite a while for the Earth’s grav-
ity to finally pull it back down to where it’ll burn up. 

Well,  thank  you  for  that.  I  wanted  to  get  you,  shortly  after  that 
ASAT  test,  and  it  just  never  worked  out  in  your  schedule,  so  I’m 
glad to get this on the record. 

General  Dickman,  you  had  mentioned  the  commercial  aspect  of 
space.  I  want  to  say  that  I  am  delighted  that  there  seems  to  be  a 
new  attitude  in  the  Air  Force  in  cooperating  with  the  use  of  old 
pads  at  Cape  Canaveral  for  commercial  space  launches.  Thanks  to 
General  Helms,  who  is  going  to  be  departing  Patrick  for  her  next 
assignment,  they  negotiated  successfully  one  of  the  old  abandoned 
pads  to  be  used  by  one  of  these  new  commercial  ventures,  called 
SpaceX.  We’re  trying  to  get  them  to,  likewise,  on  any  future  com-
mercial  launches,  to  utilize  abandoned  pads,  which  is  the  logical 
thing. 

And General Kehler, the new head of Air Force Space Command, 
seems  to  be  of  that  bent,  of  wanting  to  continue  that.  Any  insight 
that  you  have  with  your  wealth  of  experience  in  Air  Force  Space, 
I would appreciate you sharing that. 

General DICKMAN. Well, I think you’ve characterized the views of 
General  Helms  and  General  Kehler  exactly  correctly.  General 
Kehler was the Commander at Vandenberg, and, in fact, conducted 
more—or,  oversaw  more  commercial  launches  than  he  did  military 
ones when he was there. He clearly understands the importance of 
commercial space, not just in the economic sense, but in the impor-
tance of having a launch rate that allows the infrastructure to con-
tinue to fly. 

I  might  point  out  that,  while  we  look  at  Mr.  Musks’s  work  at 
SpaceX  and  the  transition  to  a  commercial  pad,  that  that’s  really 
just  one  in  a  long  series  that,  in  fact,  have  gone  on.  For  many 
years,  the  Atlas  pads  and  the  Delta  pads  were  shared  between 
commercial  missions  and  government  missions.  Complex  37  was 
converted  to  a—to  the  Delta  IV  EELV  in  the  early  days  of  the 
EELV  program.  We  believed  that  there  would  be  more  commercial 
launches  than  government.  Complex  41  was  converted  to  handle 
the Atlas V; again, intending to be a major commercial venture, as 
well  as  government.  Complex  46  was  transitioned  from  Navy  use 
to  being  used  by  Spaceport  Florida.  So,  I  think  there’s  a  long  his-
tory  of  that  marriage  between  commercial  launch  and  government 
launch.  What—as  I  think  you  would  correctly  characterize,  that 
ebbs and flows with how easy it is for a commercial operator to fly 
out  of  Cape  Canaveral  or  out  of  Vandenberg,  and  I  think  you’re 
also right in characterizing the current leadership as being very fa-
vorable to making that happen. It, at least, is my view that unless 
that  happens  and  unless  we  build  a  robust  commercial  space  pro-
gram,  the  government  program—the  only  ones  that’ll  be  flying 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

from  the  United  States  will  be  government-funded  payloads,  and 
that doesn’t make any sense. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Whitesides, you had talked also about com-
mercial space. We’ve mentioned SpaceX, which is part of the COTS 
Program. They have this parabolic flight experience that’s going on 
down there. What additional steps do you think NASA should take 
to better leverage these commercial opportunities? 

Mr. WHITESIDES. That’s a great question. We live in a very excit-
ing  time,  Senator,  where,  you  know,  really,  it’s  sort  of  the  new 
Space  Age,  where  many  of  these  companies,  like  Virgin  Galactic, 
SpaceX,  and  others,  are  building  new  capabilities  which  the  coun-
try can take advantage of. And I really think that, in the long-term 
future, sort of the future of humanity, it’s these commercial entities 
that are going to go forth and really take the country into a prom-
ising economic direction. 

I think that the answer to your question is that NASA should try 
to buy services from these companies wherever it has needs. So, for 
example,  COTS  should  be  encouraged,  developed,  and  then  should 
be  prioritized  if  one  of  these  companies  does,  in  fact,  demonstrate 
the  capability  to  get  to  Station.  That  will  free  up  NASA  to  explore 
the frontier with the Constellation program. 

Similarly, as Dr. Tarantino noted, there’s a suborbital spaceflight 
program  that’s  under  consideration  by  NASA.  That  could  dramati-
cally increase the flight rate opportunities for scientists, and astro-
nauts for training, and that could be recognized and called out and 
encouraged, going forward. 

Finally,  the  Parabolic  Flight  Services  Program  that  you  note  is 
a  really,  I  think,  important  example  as  a  pathfinder  for  future 
types of this work. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Tarantino, you were talking about the uni-
versities.  How  many  graduate  students  and  undergraduates  are 
typically  involved  in  working  on  those  small-scale,  hands-on 
projects that you mentioned in your testimony? 

Dr. TARANTINO. Yes, sir. Anywhere—you will find anywhere from 
three  to  five  graduate-type  theses,  Ph.D.  and  Master’s  theses,  in-
volved  in  these.  And  then,  as  you  roll  that  down  to  the  under-
graduate  level,  there  can  be  a  dozen  or  more  each  semester  in-
volved in some aspect—in some aspect of this. 

I  would  like  to  point  out  something,  though,  that  connects  with 
what  Gene  Kranz  was  saying  when  he  was  talking  about  the  dif-
ficulty of maintaining the workforce during the previous gap. Engi-
neering  is  a  very  tough  profession,  when  you  think  about  it,  be-
cause, if you think about it, the better you are as an engineer, the 
sooner  you’re  putting  yourself  out  of  work.  And  so,  engineers  are 
constantly  looking  for  what  is  going  to  be  their  next  task  or  their 
next  challenge.  And  if  we  don’t  have  stability  in  these  programs, 
then, not only are they putting themselves out of work, but we are, 
also—the  government  is,  also.  And  the  same  thing  happens  in  the 
scientific  field,  as  well,  when  you  talk  about  professors  on  campus 
that  want  to  go  into  the  space  sciences,  when  you  talk  about  stu-
dents  making  decisions  on  whether  or  not  they’re  going  to  enter 
aerospace engineering or space science or not. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  do  you  want  to  expand  your  comments  on 
how the universities could work with private spacecraft developers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

to  expand  research  in  space?  And  what  do  you  think  NASA’s  role 
ought to be? 

Dr.  TARANTINO.  Well,  you  know,  we’re,  quite  frankly,  quite  ex-
cited  about  the  possibility  of  this,  because  the  real  barrier  that— 
one  of  the  largest  barriers  we  face,  of  course,  is  the  cost  of  access 
to  space.  And  so,  we’re  very  interested  in  the  potential  of  these 
commercial  space  opportunities,  to  reduce  the  cost  of  access  to 
space,  and  to  be  able  to,  therefore,  give  us  more  opportunities  to 
get university research payloads. 

Senator  NELSON.  General,  you  know,  we’ve  got  this  $100  billion 
thing  up  there,  called  the  ISS,  and  it  is  designated  as  a  National 
Laboratory.  And  yet,  NASA  claims  that  the  loss  of  Columbia  set 
that  back.  The  budget  has  severely  curtailed  the  research  that  the 
U.S.  is  going  to  be  able  to  do  on  the  Station.  Where  do  you  think 
that ought to go in order to see that it is utilized to the fullest ex-
tent possible? 

General  DICKMAN.  Well,  I  think,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  that’s  not 
unrelated  to  the  question  of  the  gap,  because  the  gap  is  what,  in 
part, will keep us from using the Station to its full capability with 
American  scientists  and  America  experiments.  And  I  think  that 
gap can be approached, perhaps, differently. 

If  I  understand  the  current  approach,  one  is  that  COTS  may  be 
successful,  COTS–D  capability  for  hauling  humans  to  low-Earth 
orbit, but relies on a vehicle that is some months, or perhaps years, 
away from being able to demonstrate continued successful flight be-
fore you would want to put humans on it, and also a capsule to do 
that  from  one  contractor,  SpaceX;  and  Orbital,  I  think,  isn’t  even 
looking to capability D. 

And the other would be to put substantial amounts of funds into 
the  exploration  program  to  accelerate  the  availability  of  a  capsule 
and  a  launch  vehicle  that  simply  are  not  designed,  intended,  or 
very  efficient,  carrying  relatively  small  numbers  of  people  to  Sta-
tion. They’re designed to go to the moon. 

We have the option to approach that differently. We have launch 
vehicles  that  can  haul  a  capsule.  Atlas  V  or  Delta  IV  have  a  very 
proven  record  that  can  do  that.  For  a  relative—for  less  than  the 
cost  of  a  single  Space  Shuttle  mission,  they  could  be  human-quali-
fied  and  a—forgive  me,  Mr.  Kranz,  a  relatively  simple  capsule  to 
go  to  low-Earth  orbit  could  be  built—certainly  different  than  what 
we would require to go to the moon—to carry scientists, astronauts 
to Station, and then get full utility out of that. 

And  so,  my  vision  for  the  Station  is  not  to  shut  down  in  2015, 
or  2016,  or  2017,  it’s  to  keep  that  operating  as  long  as  it’s  doing 
effective science. Exactly what Administrator Griffin has decided to 
do on other programs, like Hubble and like some of the robotic pro-
grams,  keep  flying  them  as  long  as  they  do  good  science.  Don’t  in-
vest  in  something  all  brand  new  when  you  can  continue  to  use 
something that’s available already. 

Senator NELSON. Now, you realize that there are people who dis-

agree with what you just said. 
General DICKMAN. Of course. 
Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Kranz  is  one  of  them,  in  that  he  doesn’t 
want  to  see  the  design  of  Ares  and  Orion  change.  Because  he 
thinks  it’s  going  to  be  setback.  But,  you’re  saying  that  you  ought 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

to  take  another  vehicle,  another  rocket,  and  put  a  simpler  capsule 
on  it,  and  let’s  get  it  to  low-Earth  orbit.  Is  that  what  you’re  sug-
gesting? 

General DICKMAN. That’s what I would suggest. I don’t think we 
should change Ares and Orion. I think they are the right architec-
ture  to  do  lunar  exploration,  they  aren’t  the  right  architecture  to 
support Station with human transportation. 

Senator NELSON. Well, are you talking about an alternative such 

as COTS–D, which is the human rated version. 

General  DICKMAN.  Again,  COTS–D  is  a  risky  program.  We  are 
months, or perhaps longer, away from the first flight of the vehicle 
under the COTS program from the one contractor who would build 
one  large  enough.  We  have  vehicles  that  can  carry  that  kind  of 
weight to Station today. They’re the EELVs. They’re proven launch 
vehicles built by the government and by private investment. 

Senator NELSON. So, what rocket are you talking about? 
General DICKMAN. Atlas V and Delta IV. 
Senator  NELSON.  Man-rate  them,  and  then  stick  a  simpler  cap-

sule on top of them. 

General  DICKMAN.  I  believe  that  could  be  done  for  less  than  the 
cost of one—divide the Space Shuttle cost by the number of flights, 
and you can do that entire program for less than that cost. 

Senator  NELSON.  The  question  is,  where  are  we  going  to  get  the 
money? If all the dollars are absorbed in running out Shuttle until 
completion  of  the  Space  Station,  and  then  putting  your  money  full 
bore into the Constellation program. 

General  DICKMAN.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  simply  say,  the 
same  question  of  where  you’re  going  to  get  the  money  is  the  ques-
tion if you try to accelerate Constellation. It’s the same dollars, it’s 
just a question of whether you use it to accelerate Constellation or 
you  keep  Constellation  on  its  current  path  and  build  something 
that  has  a  unique  capability  to  haul  humans  to  Station  and  back. 

Senator NELSON. Does anybody want to respond to that? 
Mr. WHITESIDES. Can I, sir, just add one note? Just so that we’re 
all  on  the  same  page,  I  think  that  the  architecture  that  you  de-
scribe  could—you  know,  COTS–D  hasn’t  been  exercised  yet,  of 
course,  as  a  program,  and  a  capsule  that  goes  on  top  of  an  Atlas 
V  could  be  contracted  within  the  COTS–D  option,  just  for  the—— 

General DICKMAN. Sure. Dragon might be—— 
Mr. WHITESIDES.—record. I mean—— 
General DICKMAN.—the perfect capsule. 
Mr. WHITESIDES. Yes. I’m—yes. I’m—— 
Senator  NELSON.  I  am  told  that  the  cost  estimates  for  human 
rating of an EELV range from $500 million to a billion dollars. And 
under  this  funding  profile,  I  just  don’t  know  where  we’re  going  to 
get that. 

Mr. Kranz? 
Mr.  KRANZ.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  was  involved  in  the  man-rating  of 
the  Titan.  I  was  involved  in  the  man-rating  of  the  Atlas  vehicle. 
They  were  expensive  programs  that  took  about  a  year  and  a  half 
each  to  accomplish  their  objectives.  They—some  of  the  things  that 
we  found  out,  particularly  in  the  early  Atlas,  when  we  attempted 
to  man-rate  it,  was  that  structurally  it  did  not  have  the  ability  to 
handle  the  Max-q  loads,  which  took  a  redesign  of  the  system.  So, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

I  believe  this  question  of  man-rating  is  one  that  is  good  from  a 
viewgraph standpoint, but when you step up to the cost, the sched-
ule,  and  then  you  say  you’re  going  to  put  a  ‘‘simple  spacecraft’’  on 
top of it, it would be something I would—at best, it would be some-
thing  like  a  Mercury  on  steroids,  I  guess,  because  Mercury  was 
the—— 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. KRANZ. Well, it wouldn’t be Apollo. That’s what they’re build-
ing with Orion. But, yes, the simple spacecraft is what I would con-
sider  Mercury  on  steroids.  Well,  that  took  about  3  years  to  put  in 
place.  So,  I  don’t  see  that  this  helps  close  gap.  I—and  all—I  see  it 
as, again, a diversion from the basic plan that you’ve got. As I said, 
I  think  you’re  building  the  DC–3  or  the  B–52,  and  I  think  this  is 
the right plan. 

Yes, it’s a bit overdesigned to support the Earth orbital missions, 
but it gets the job done until something comes along, possibly later 
on, through COTS or whatever it is that can get the job done. But, 
I  think  you’ve  got  the  right  plan,  and  I  think  you  ought  to  stay 
with it. 

Senator NELSON. Let’s talk about the brain drain. Now, all of you 
have  already  concluded  that  if  you  can  shorten  the  5-year  gap  so 
that you don’t have to lay off a bunch of people, you’re a lot better 
off.  That’s  a  function  of  us  being  able  to  get  the  present  President 
and the future President to be willing to support the additional, $2 
billion, $1 billion in this year, and $1 billion in next fiscal year, in 
order  to  achieve  that.  But,  what  else  can  be  done  to  prevent  the 
brain  drain,  since  there  is  going  to  be  this  hiatus  as  we  shift  from 
the Space Shuttle to the new vehicle? What else can be done? Any 
of you all. 

I’ll—— 

[No response.] 
Senator NELSON. Well, on the experience of Apollo? 
[No response.] 
Senator  NELSON.  Well,  let  me  suggest  something.  You  all  reflect 
on this. NASA’s got a bunch of programs. So do other departments 
of  the  U.S.  Government.  What  about  getting  some  of  these  people, 
that otherwise might be laid off, into some of those other programs 
on whatever temporary basis that we have of the gap? 

Mr. WHITESIDES. Senator—I’m sorry. 
Mr.  KRANZ.  Go  ahead.  Go  ahead.  Why  don’t  you  go  on,  and 

Mr. WHITESIDES. I’ll always—— 
Mr. KRANZ. Mr. Chairman, that—— 
Mr. WHITESIDES.—defer to you, man. 
Mr.  KRANZ.  Well,  that,  to  a  great  extent,  is  the  option  I  had 
available  to  me  during  the  Skylab-to-Shuttle  transition.  I  had  the 
Earth  Resources  Aircraft  Program,  and  I  was  able  to  move  a  sig-
nificant  number  of  my  people,  particularly  those—probably  the 
most critical asset I had were my trajectory-related people, my mis-
sion-design people, because they are the ones that will, sort of, lay 
the  groundwork,  build  the  conceptual  mission  profiles,  do  all  the 
initial  analyses  that  you  need.  So,  this  was  one  of  the  areas  that 
I  wanted  to  protect  very  much.  They  turned  into  excellent  engi-
neers  in  the  Earth  Resources  Program.  They  were  scientific  equip-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

ment  operators,  they  did  the  design  installation,  they  worked  with 
the principal investigators and the—that was marvelous. 

But,  this  was  a  relatively  short  term,  and  we  knew  that  the 
Earth Program was diminishing so that they would then come back 
to  us.  My  concern  would  be,  as  I  said,  I  sent  some  people  off  into 
the medical business, and doggone if they didn’t decide they want-
ed  to  be  a  doctor.  So,  that’s  a  two-edged  sword.  You  provide  them 
the  business  opportunities,  but  these  are  young,  talented,  mobile 
people  that  like  challenges,  and  some  percentage  of  those  people, 
maybe  your  best  ones,  are  going  to  stay  there.  So,  this  is  a  very 
difficult issue to address, and I don’t have—and I don’t see an easy 
solution. 

Senator  NELSON.  When  you  say  that  you  moved  from  Skylab  to 
Shuttle, you’re including Apollo-Soyuz in that, so that you actually 
had a 6-year gap between 1975 Apollo-Soyuz and 1981 Shuttle. 

Mr.  KRANZ.  Yes.  That  was  the  true  gap.  But  Apollo-Soyuz  was 
a  relatively  simple  mission  that  didn’t  use  a  significant  amount  of 
manpower. Probably the—the majority of the manpower was spent 
in  just  the  various  negotiations  with  the  Soviets,  the  exchanges— 
we  spent  probably  more  time  in  transportation  than  we  did  actu-
ally  in  working  many  of  the  aspects  of  the  mission.  That  did  not 
require significant numbers of people. 

Senator NELSON. All right. 
Mr. Whitesides? 
Mr. WHITESIDES. Senator, if I could, I think what’s coming down 
the road in the next administration, almost no matter who it is, is 
a greater emphasis on global climate change and energy. And I be-
lieve  very  strongly  that  NASA  can  play  a  very  significant  role  in 
that. It doesn’t precisely line up with the gap, but I think, broadly 
speaking, NASA needs to align its missions and become more pub-
licly  relevant  to  that  effort.  And  I  think  that  what  we’re  going  to 
see  on  a  national  level  is  tremendous  funds  being  allocated  to  ef-
forts related to those issues. And NASA is perfectly situated to re-
spond to those issues, not just on the science-diagnosis side, but as 
we,  as  a  society,  start  to  plan  how  we’re  going  to  actually  imple-
ment mitigation steps toward that issue, I think NASA is very well 
placed to do that. 

Senator NELSON. Flesh that out a little more. 
Mr.  WHITESIDES.  Well,  what  you  have  inside  NASA  is  certain 
centers starting to think very seriously about—they see the writing 
on  the  wall.  I’m  thinking,  in  particular,  Kennedy  and  Ames  and 
other centers, where they’re beginning to work on system engineer-
ing  approaches  to  how  you  would  think  about  seriously  mitigating 
global  climate  change.  That  involves  things  like  technology,  solar 
cells,  fuel  cells,  other  things  like  that,  that—to  the  entire 
‘‘architecting the system’’ of how we make this transition, as a cul-
ture and as a society, that even could go all the way to the far fu-
ture,  with  mitigation  steps  in  space  and  space-based  solar  power. 
And  so,  I  think  that  there’s  a  tremendous  amount  of  program  and 
planning  that  is  very  well  suited  to  NASA  engineers,  as  they  are 
the  people  who  do  the  big-picture  engineering,  really  better  than 
almost anyone in our government. And so, I think that there’s tre-
mendous opportunities there. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

Senator  NELSON.  Got  any  thoughts  about  cooperation  between 

NOAA and NASA on some of this climate observation? 

Mr. WHITESIDES. Absolutely. I mean, I think we need to build on 
that. But, what I would emphasize is that, in my experience, NASA 
is  very  good  at  constructing  the  largest  systems,  and  that’s  what 
our civilization is going to be headed toward, is potentially building 
very large systems to respond to some of these changes. 

Senator  NELSON.  Given  the  so-called  funding  that  is  projected, 
the  projection  for  funding  of  the  Space  Station  is  not  there  in 
NASA’s  out-year  budget  beyond  2015,  it  seems  to  me  that  with 
$100-billion asset up there, we clearly ought to correct that. I think 
we’re  going  to  try  to  do  that  in  this  NASA  authorization  bill.  But, 
I  see  you  all  smiling,  which  would  indicate  to  me  that  you  agree 
with that. Any comments about that? 

Mr.  KRANZ.  I  think  it’s  a  excellent  idea  to—we’ve  got  a  massive 
investment  up  there.  One  of  the  most  difficult  times  I  had  as  an 
engineer  is  when  we  had  all  of  these  Apollo  lunar  surface  experi-
ment  packages  up  and  operations  going  on  the  moon—they  were 
sort  of  like  the  Mars  rovers—perfect  operation,  still  getting  large 
amounts  of  data,  et  cetera,  and  the  funding  ran  out,  and  we  were 
directed  to  cut  the  umbilical  to  that.  That  was  a  decision  that  I 
think  impacted  the  scientific  community,  but  basically  it  was  sort 
of  like  this  throwaway  mentality  that,  at  times,  we  have  as  na-
tions.  We  sort  of  get  tired  of  this,  and  we  decide  it’s  time  to  cut 
it off. 

And I think you’re right on track there. We have to come up with 
some  plan  that  addresses  the  long-term  utilization,  because  it’s  a 
marvelous  vantage  point,  it  provides  an  environment  that  cannot 
be replicated any other place. It provides a global perspective. And, 
as  you  said  earlier,  it’s  a  great  opportunity  to  meet  the  inter-
national community in a peaceful environment. The question that’s 
been brought up is, how do you get up there cheaply and economi-
cally. But that’s a problem that can be worked. But, I think the key 
thing is, is this has to be part of the long-term plan. 

Senator NELSON. In the money that is allocated in NASA’s future 
projections,  even  though  there  seems  to  be  unanimity  of  opinion 
here  that  it’s  not  enough,  particularly  to  shorten  the  gap.  Do  you 
believe  that  what  is  projected  there  is  an  appropriate  balance  be-
tween the programs that are in NASA’s future? What do you think 
about that? 

General DICKMAN. I—— 
Mr. KRANZ. Go ahead. 
Senator NELSON. General? 
General  DICKMAN.  Well,  I  think—NASA  has  been  charged  with 
doing an exploration program that is now taking a disproportionate 
size  of  an  unfunded—underfunded  program,  93  percent  of  NASA’s 
budget  going  to  human  spaceflight  or  exploration.  Earth  and  plan-
etary sciences are down $260 million from between 2008 and 2009. 
Aeronautics,  down  $150  million  from  2007,  doing  maybe  a  third  of 
the  aeronautics  we  were  doing  3  or  4  years  ago.  There’s  an  enor-
mous amount of work that NASA simply isn’t doing today that they 
were  doing  5  years  ago,  and  that  I  think  that  what—if  I  can  ex-
trapolate  what  Mr.  Kranz  was  saying  earlier,  the  enormous 
amount  of  work  in  aeronautics  and  in  other  programs  are  really 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

what  gave  us  the  base  to  be  able  to  do  the  space  program  in  the 
1950s  and  1960s.  We’re  losing  that  base  in  NASA.  And  so,  I  think 
there—across  the  board,  we  are  paying  too  high  a  price  in  other 
areas in order to do exploration. Not to cut exploration, but to con-
tinue  to  increase  the  budget  to  be  able  to  do  the  things  that  we’ve 
cut. 

Senator  NELSON.  Back  to  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program, 
the  funding  for  the  research  programs  under  this  program  began 
to  decrease  in  Fiscal  Year  2005,  with  the  largest  cuts  seen  in 
NASA’s  budget.  There  is  a  projected  increase  for  NASA’s  part  of 
the  Climate  Change  Science  Program  for  the  Administration’s  re-
quest  for  Fiscal  Year  2009.  So,  that’s  going  to  be  something  that 
we’re going to have to attend to. 

All  right.  What  we’ll  do  is,  we’ll  leave  the  record  open  for  any 
questions  that  need  to  be  proffered  in  writing.  We’ll  leave  the 
record  open  for  a  few  days  so  that  we  can  send  that  to  you,  if  any 
additional Senators want further questions. 

Any other final comments by any of the panel members? 
[No response.] 
Senator NELSON. Well, you all have added mightily to the reposi-
tory  of  information  that  we  need  in  trying  to  craft  policy  etched 
through  a  NASA  authorization  bill.  So,  I  am  very,  very  grateful  to 
you. It’s been a stimulating hearing. 

Thank you. 
And the meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:11 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:24 Jun 22, 2012 Jkt 074618 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74618.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

